One thing you should take into consideration before going in...1.) This place is located across the street from the abandoned Festival Mall. 2.) Sit in the parking garage lot and watch the clientele that enters. Yeah. So, one the hostess was terrible and rude. Did not greet us. We walked the buffet line. Very odd dishes to say the least and disorganized in the way it was presented. I wish I could have taken pictures. Tacos next to soup next to crab legs. We sit down at a table and look up--spider webs, dust, table was terrible sticky. Think of the worst episode of kitchen nightmares and times that by 7. Food was the most store bought garbage. I've definitely had the same spring rolls in a sample station at Costco. At least those were warm. So unless your into taking risks and eating sketchy chinese/ taco/ store bought macaroons would not recommend. 2 1
I was hesitant to rent from this place based on the bad reviews. Literally every other rental company didn't have a van, so I was basically stuck from renting from them. Overall the customer service was very good and so was the prices. My issues was with the vans. They are all dodge caravans and in horrible condition. The first van I got the ac was broke and beat up. They gave me another van and this time I was heading to California. I couldn't go over 60mph and it would shake if you went over. 1 5
i have been here a few times. it is not the prettiest laundromat, but there were a lot of open machines, the inside is clean, and the people that work there are very nice and helpful.  And super capacity washers, great for cleaning beddings. Oh and automatic doors! they are also a dry cleaners. i have noticed they have a drive up window for your dry cleaning. 3 4
Decent place with nice deco but the noodle soup is too too too salty, even for Chinese visitors. My friend guesses that maybe the owner is Japanese and goes with Ramen style. 2 3
RA sushi is wonderful. Every waiter/waitress that has ever served me at RA (any of their phoenix metro locations) has been wonderful. They're fantastic at making recommendations on sushi that you might like based on your taste and the drinks there are also great. I have never had anything there that I didn't enjoy. It has a hip and fun atmosphere and it's a great place to go with a group of friends so you can get different flavors of sushi and just split them. The only thing that bothers me sometimes when I'm there is the volume of the music. It could be a little bit quieter just so conversation is easier, but other than that I have no complaints. 4 5
It seems we got taken in by similar things as other yelpers.  The idea sounded really good and the menu is very inventive.  While the salt air margarita was tasty, the twenty vegetable fried rice was average, and for average way over priced.  I don't know which food network chef thought this was the best thing he ever ate, but that chef should get out more.Noodle dish was weak(ocean's nest) but the pork buns were tastey.  And at the end all was extremely over priced. 2 3
I was surprised that we were able to get a patio table on a Hot sunny Friday afternoon with no wait. Now I understand why. Slow service, bored staff, mediocre food and an over all unpleasant experience. It's burgers and salad...! How do you mess that up? Apparently you can. You're better off dining on street food. 1 2
Pros-Always seated quicklyFood is great - 5 stars for food Price point is very good - you definitely get your money's worthCons -Depending on who you get the servers are often very slow, disorganized, nonchalant ~ such a shame! 4 3
After my last visit, I have to wonder why anyone would spend their money at this restaurant.  With the many FINE quality burger joints In the area, this by far is sub par.  Once a nice place to take the family is now run by a crew of misfits starting at the top.  When taking one step in this eatery it's painfully obvious there is tension among the staff, making for an uncomfortable experience from the get go.  I over heard fowl language from "Savana"?  I believe her name was.  When I have a small child with me this is not what I want them to hear.  I asked another employee who was tending to the condiment station who was the manager and they pointed to a short blond young woman who's appearance left something to be desired.  I decided then & there I would observe before speaking with her...just as I thought.  She too conducted herself like a child & not like a leader. I have spent the better of 30 years in a profession where I was required to notice small details. These details tell a lot about a person, situation or environment. Fuddruckers fell short in all areas. If the "feel" is off when u enter a place the meal is less enjoyable. I hardly noticed the quality of food because i was so put off by the first 10 minutes. The food was somewhat enjoyable, but nothing like it used to be. I feel as though if I'm going to pay 12 bucks for a burger meal, it should be served to me. (I can go across the street & get a nice steak dinner for 10 bucks!) With that being said, if everything is spectacular, these are the little things I'd over look. The charm of the place, if u will...I can get a cheaper, better tasting burger in 5 other places with in a mile of Fudds.  Overall this place need a complete makeover from management to menu.  If u don't care about your restaurant then why should I?  I sure hope this place can be saved,  it once was a great fun family spot! 1 3
Just tired their churros today and they were pretty great! The caramel filling was an unexpected by pleasant surprise. 3 4
Stopped in for lunch. My wife had an iced Starbucks drink and the waitress greeted us with that was not "acceptable in here."  We gladly left because it didn't look that nice anyways. I think there are better choices around town 1 2
I used to order from Stephanos at least twice a week but not anymore! Last THREE times I ordered they messed up my order which is not very hard. Two gyro plates pita on the side. No salad. The nice guy that works the counter isn't there anymore and the new girl just doesn't get how to work the register or understand the menu. I'm on a search for a new Greek place! 2 1
Been here three times. My last time here!! Service was ok apart from the fact the server had no idea about the wine or how much it cost. Calamari was sent back we ordered several plates of this and all were sent back. Mussels came half open half closed , clams were like rubber. Our whole party had issues with their apps! Nachos had one shrimp and was so congealed it was unrecognizable ! If your going to offer Moscow mules on the menu please know how to make it and have the right cups ! 1 2
Their baked and regular pancakes are great, we went there two weeks in a row which we never do. The service is also upscale. 4 5
Great place for a traditional fresh french bistro meal. Wine list was good - great service too. The duck was a little overdone so I'd say head over for an earlier meal. They cater to an older crowd who dines earlier it seemed. 3 4
Went on a Monday night and it was half full only, which was nice as I heard there are usually line ups. We sat at the bar where we saw all the food being made by a couple of guys who didn't look very happy lol. Everyone who reviewed the restaurant had the momofuku ramen and the pork buns, so I ordered those and the mushroom dan dan. Upon looking at the prices, I was actually a little shocked at how pricey they were. Coming from Van where I tried a lot of ramen, I thought this better be delicious!Pork buns - This dish came really fast and it was good, but not amazing. Brisket was very soft, and probably best tasting dish of the night.  4/5Momofuku ramen - Was only ok as I had way better broth and noodles before for less $. For the small portions and taste, not worth it. The 3 small slices of pork in it was pretty good though. 3/5Mushroom dan dan - I actually liked this dish quite a bit when I started eating it. The sauce was pretty good until you're half way through the noodles because all of the sauce was sinking to the bottom and it got REALLY salty. 3.5/5Everything plus tip came to $50 and both of us weren't exactly stuffed. It was a good experience, but will probably not come back. 3 4
We had the short ribs with polenta and green beans and they were outstanding.  Service was okay - nothing to brag about. 4 3
Pretty good Mexican sit down restaurant. More on the Americanized side but still flavorful and tasty. I like that authentic Mexican food better though. 3 4
We had the Shrimp Burrito & the Carne Asada Chimichanga special. The special came with rice, re-fried beans and a drink. The food was really good, the chimichanga & the burrito were both large. The rice and re-fried beans are very average so don't get your hopes up. The decor is a combo of cafeteria and take out style, kinda like a "Baja Fresh" remix, but not many people go there for the ambiance. However I will repeat , the main entrees were good. A great value when compared to taco bell or dell taco, we had more than we could eat with drinks and spent less than $17.        :-) 4 3
The setting is spectacular. Brunch menu was interesting but a little limited.  The Eggs Benedict was average (very little sauce,eggs a bit too runny) but the (albino) carrot soup was excellent.  The chocolate dessert was a bit much for me, but my companion ate every mouthful.  The creme brulee with chambord and pomegranate was excellent.  Nice selection of teas.  The service was pretty slow, but the assistant manager came buy to let us know that dessert was complimentary because of our wait.  Now THAT is good business! 4 3
Four stars for being a godsend. I was so sick of paying $3-5 for a bottle of soda or water. I got my drinks, my snacks, a big Icee, and the $40 limit in cash back (take that, $4.99 ATM fees!), all right in my hotel. Lots of cheap souvenirs, which I might be back for. I can also see this being awesome if you didn't bring enough lotion to avoid skin lizardification from the desert and hotel showers, or maybe some Tums after a night at the buffet. 4 3
Pretty hilarious that you have to watch your language in a bar for 21 and up only but whatever.  This bar isn't in the best location,  Boulder Highway has lots of transients and this location is no exception.  The food, bartenders,  and atmosphere is barely average.  Wouldn't suggest it to friends, family, or anyone else 2 3
I spent over $10,000 on new carpet, appliances fans and lighting at this Home Depot to renovate my home and the customer service was horrible, especially in flooring.  They were rude and not very helpful. 2 1
The waitress we had was a school teacher working during her vacation to supplement her school salary. She was the best part of the experience.. The cheese crisp was so so, the beef chimi's were not the best or worst we ever ate.The buss service was terrible, no setups on the table . We finished our cheese crisp and the buss person brought our chimi's, never took the empty plates. I asked for additional verde salsa it never came.. To be honest with usually go to Nando's on Mcdowell but they were closed for the holiday.Rosa'a can't hold a candle to Nando's. 2 1
I honestly don't understand how and why people could find so many complains from this place, if this place is so bed then why is it that they are the only hotel who hosts miss USA and American idol among so many other venues. Where in the world can you find top of the line hotel 4 1/2 stars for 90 $ per night in a hotel less then few years old. i had my family there for 7 days for New Years and there was not one time that they did not deliver anything we had asked for. My friend who booked the room in UK and who owns the share had nothing but great things to say. So if you have a problem with a view then move up and pay the 360 $ a night on a Friday. I have stayed there before when it was PH and I did pay a lot less through Priceline ( 65$ ) and for the room you get I don't care if my shower thing is loose or anything else. this lady who complained about not getting her bill ready, are you serious, couldn't she just check her bank statement or is it the hotels fault cause she had no time to check out at the front desk, not just that, complaining about housekeeping picking up trash, whatever, when is it enough. 5 2
Not great. Been here twice and not impressed. The crust of the pizza is unusually chewy and I always find hard pieces hidden in the dough. The Margarita pizza is bland. There are 3 better pizza places in the area. 3 2
Same menu as the other 4 bars. If you know that you know what to expect. A little on the pricy side but some of it is worth it. 3 4
Love this place!  Great food and healthy too.  A great variety of choices on the menu. 4 5
Check your receipts. I bought an onion and a couple of jalapenos here and was wondering how it was $3.50, but after I got home I noticed the onion rang up as 2 pounds and the jalapenos as 1 pound. Their scale is definitely off, resulting in being overcharged by probably at least double. If you pay the proper price though, this place is very cheap and a good deal. 2 3
Saw an outdoor concert there this weekend and had a decent experience. Only recommendation would be for AE stage to have their staff clear the outdoor trash cans. They were overflowing beyond belief and trash ended up all in the walk way - so gross. Additionally - because of the las vegas incident last week - once we were inside on the grass - we looked for all the "exits". Nothing was marked anywhere in sight. Please fix this asap!!!! 2 1
Usually this bar is fun and friendly.. however not on sunday nights apparently!!!! Liam our waiter was condescending and aloof to our group. The late night menu is terrible and the nachos were soggy with very little toppings. No one cared about our satisfaction, in fact no staff seemed interested in any patrons that night!!! Never going back. 1 2
nice restaurant, all you can eat but it is not a buffet so you have to order.  Foods are good however, the rolls are very big.  only 3 pieces will make you full already.  you can't enjoy much if they make too big. 2 3
I think I have been spoiled in that I have eaten in some amazing Mexican food eateries, so I had little to no expectations for Quesada. Upon entering the restaurant, I noticed that it looks like Mucho Burrito or Baja Fresh (in the States). A quick look over the menu board, I settled on a large burrito with grilled chicken filling. Choices are numerous, but not overwhelming in terms of combinations as some places can be. Unfortunately, there was no beef/steak offering as they were out - how this happens, I have no idea but it clearly disappointed a couple of guys in line ahead of me.The counter service was quick and friendly. Burrito was assembled with toppings as I requested from a good selection. There are a variety of sauces and salsas to choose from as well. Once wrapped, there is the option to have your selection toasted. I opted for that and took my order to go - I was in and out of Quesada, burrito in hand in about 15 minutes. The seating area, it should be noted, is bright and has a decent number of chairs and tables.So what about the burrito? Was it any good? I arrived at my home, a short drive away, and chowed down. Rice and chicken paired with a medium salsa was nice. I skipped the beans and guacamole, but added lettuce, tomato, and some cheese which tasted fresh. The large size is about all I needed, so I am glad I did not go one size up.Give it a try. It may not be my favourite place, but I definitely will go again. 3 4
LOVE this restaurant. My family has been going to the downtown location for a long long long time. We couldn't be happier when we knew they have a second location at Bayview Village, since it's our favourite mall and it's closer to our home. The food and the service are excellent. We go there almost every Sunday; sometimes for Dim Sum, sometimes for dinner. It's suprised to see they were temporarily closed due to some health issue few weeks ago. I checked their inspection history on DineSafe. They got a green on April 7, and about a month later, they got a red. How bad things would go in just a month? Since we shop around the mall quite often, we know the managers in all the restaurants quite well. Pearl's managers as well of course. They told me because the Public Health Department received a complaint from just one customer, saying she didn't feel well after eating at Pearl. There are a lot of reasons to cause one person felt sick. I hope the Health Department checked all the restaurants that she went to on those days. It seems to me maybe the inspector thought it's a slap in his face that he passed the restaurant not long ago, and then someone felt sick after eaten there. One of the owners of Aroma espresso bar said they got a yellow one month after their opening. That's quite funny to me. How unsanitized they can get for a month?I believe in Bayview Village and Pearl. As the upscale shopping mall in North York, Bayview Village won't allow any restaurant to put customers' health in risk. They must have their professional cleaning and pest control team to ensure the great health conditions. As for Pearl, they had been in the industry for so many years. I think they know about what sanitized environment means. They wouldn't risk customers' health like that. Just saying..... 4 1
My primary care physician recommended him to me. I am glad that she did. The experience was great. Staff at LEI is very friendly and cooperative. Dr Matthew is experienced expert and highly professional. He understood my husband's problem and took care of it.I would surely recommend him to friends and family.Salma khan 4 5
I visited this restaurant only a few weeks after returning from Rome, Italy. I was very surprised to find authentic Italian tastes in Old Montreal! Their mushroom risotto was very delicious and and recommended. Our waitress was very friendly and helpful when we were making our dinner decisions. I'd definitely go back for a romantic dinner or when I crave authentic Italian! 4 5
Been here at pickup area for 45 minutes after spending 480 bucks on a mattress. I guess it would be helpful if these people didnt have heads so far up asses. 1 2
I've been here twice now because sometimes you just want a burrito. However, I can do better myself (and in fact, every time I go by this place I think I should quit my job and open a near-campus taco stand). The chicken tinga burrito was quite good and pretty close to California style. The burrito portions are small enough to finish and not make you too fat, which is a plus I think.Nachos are likewise quite good. Good for sharing, disappear fast.However, this place serves the worst enchiladas I've had in long time. Decent tortillas and shredded chicken filling, but the sauce is canned and they top them with wilted lettuce and cheese that is dry and crumbly like parmesan in a can. Ick.Also, the stools are really uncomfortable, and they serve their sodas in styrofoam cups. 2 3
I have to start by saying I have been going to Southwest Contemporary Women's care for over 5 years now. I have had fantastic experiences with the Nurse Practitioners & MDs. My concerns are more for the triage nurse line. Throughout the week I have had to call multiple times due to various reasons. I have had amazing nurses that are compassionate & helpful. There was one bad experience where the nurse told me she would call me back after she spoke with the Doctor. After waiting 2 and a half hours, I decided to follow up. By the time I got a follow up call, she said to me "You just need to be patient". This nurse was not compassionate or empathetic to any of my concerns. This was my 3rd time calling this week due to various problems, and I understand the frustration. I was just as frustrated having to go through it. I just feel like there is a better way to go about customer service, especially in the health care field. 3 1
I went for iPad screen repairs I had three  I was handed me two of them back and told I'm not even going to try to fix these  I knew they weren't  I said I appreciate you trying! But this one I can have back for you tomorrow I told him no he's not even getting the chance when about a mile down the road to Arizona's best iPad repairshe said no problem I can fix all three and be ready in three hours 1 5
I must be missing something.  People on here giving this 4 and 5 stars?  I have been eating Mushy Peas my whole life and these are the first I couldn't get down. There is a peculiar taste to them that I can't identify. The chips have a funny taste also.  The pies are average at best.  Service is shaky at best.  I have tried this place at least three times and I am a regular next door at Pipers so it's not like I haven't given it a chance..The people giving this multiple stars have never been to England apparently. Although one night I heard some people talking about Downton Abbey......maybe that counts. 1 2
I took yelps advice and it didnt do me wrong . When i arrived i was greeted by some very friendly staff. I felt very welcomed. Means alot when your traveling alone. First thing i noticed about this place was the cute decor different but i liked it. Especially the use of different kind of chairs. They gave me time to figure out what i wanted and made great suggestions. I ordered food was good and i was full. Only thing that wasnt my favorite was the water but i think thats a city problem . I checked in with yelp to get a free mimosa. Mmmmm. Kinda strong but they dont play in Vegas. My bill was very affordable. The mananger was even nice enough to seat down and give me suggestions on what i can do here. Very nice and sweet of him. Go check them out. 5 4
Paid for an Escalade but got picked up by an old Yukon. Driver also talked on the phone while driving. 2 1
REALLY dry ribs, pulled pork tasted like watered down sauce was added after cooking. Mac and cheese was creamy and good not over cooked Slaw was good- just normal slaw I honestly could not believe how dry my ribs were.... It was pretty heart breaking as I had been looking forward to going there just for that for sooooo long ! Brisket was cooked well ... For most of the pieces I got because again part of it was dry. Tip***The sauces are good but they need to leave the ribs in for a longer cooking time seriously tho .... Please do.... Ribs are suppose to fall of the bone not be like jerky .... If I wanted jerky I wouldn't order ribs. Customer service was great! Very friendly and helpful. This place has a LOT of potential to go so far ... The major loss of stars for me was because when you are a bbq house that advertises ribs like that I expect them to know it is suppose to fall off the bone. 2 3
5 Stars: This place is fantastic!  I love it, think you'll love it, hope all my friends love it, wish I could eat here all the time and hope I'll own a place just like it in my retirement.or5 Stars:  As in, it meets the expectations it sets for itself perfectly well.This falls into the latter category.This is a place in my area I go when I'm craving Pad Thai now now NOW.It's cheap.  They give you lots.  It's pretty fast.Done.I've had shrimp pad thai--  found the amount of noodles soak up all the sauce-- I ask for extra.. sauce that is, not noodles- it's obscene, the lid barely shuts.  Hey, value for money.  Their green curry's also quite good.It seems like they did the interior decor recently.  However, although quite nice-- they did try to bring a bit of Thailand with the wooden furniture I suppose, I wouldn't describe the atmosphere to be all that wonderful.  Also a little fancy to drop in just for lunch imo- cloth napkins and all.  Tries too hard, you know? 5 4
There is really not much to say than a great atmosphere and the most courteous service. One of the most innovative things about it is that you get to order from a tablet other than using pen and paper. The food comes almost instantly. Pro-tip if you ever want to go there. Start of by eating anything that doesn't have any rice otherwise your belly would be already packed. My experience was indeed enjoyable and delectable... 4 5
I walked a mile to Mr. Sammich, and it was so worth it. The banh-mi sammiches are kinda compact, so you can easily eat several different ones.  I had #45, the tofu version.  Something about the sauce plus the cilantro plus the perfect french bread unified to rule my universe like a gakked-up unicorn with a laser horn.  I had a coconut drink to wash it down, you know, the coconut with the lobotomy hole in the top, and a spoon to scrape out the white brains.  So back to the bread.  Let me tell you how perfect it was.  I went to the Mr Sammich bathroom facility (clean, totally ok).  I walked in 3 circles, doubled over with headache pain, and resurrected half the #45.  What a waste of a tasty sammich.  Before you get all grossed out and close this browser tab, let me say this: "the bread was just as awesome on the way out".  I'm not a regular puker, so don't think I have experience tasting food twice.  I don't.  But that doesn't change the fact that I noticed how tasty it was, twice.  Mr Sammich, you rule. 4 3
The place is good and the hotel rooms are also great. What I did not like about the whole thing was they tricking us into a 'timeshare presentation'. They will just tell you that you need to fill a 'survey' and there is a free brunch and some gifts. Well, the gifts are not really 'free' gifts, its discounted show tickets in Vegas. So spending 3 hrs on this 'timeshare presentation' (they take you around the resort to sell their timeshare property) for a free brunch and tickets, don't make sense at all! All my friends and I were so irritated by the end of it. They do not tell how long the whole thing will take, and one would never guess a 'survey' taking 3 hrs to say no to it.So, just stay from this 'timeshare' scam and buy your tkts elsewhere if you can! 2 3
Eating a whataburger. It's fantastic. Haven't had one in years. It's a perfect compliment to a football game that may be a blowout. My burger had no less that 8 pickles on it. I'm sick of this one pickle bullshit. The bacon could have been thicker, but this burger was easily 1.8x larger than a McDonald's burger. French fries could have been crispier but the had a good flavor. And they offer spicy ketchup. What a burger 5 4
Delicious, clean and the conveyor belt was a hit with the kids.   Lots of different types of sushi, salads and dessert items to choose from.  Regular/kids menu available for the anti-sushi appetite.   We will be back.   Such a fun experience! 5 4
We've been to Tokoyo lobby twice. Both times were great. I'll start by saying I gave it four stars instead of five because it is small, small, small inside and the ambiance isn't fantastic. But the things you must do for good sushi! I can't recall for certain the name of our favorite roll, but I believe it was the Glendale roll. Deep fried goodness is all I can say! I know, it isn't traditional sushi, but I just can't do raw fish! Nuff said. We tried two other kinds which were good as well, but the deep fried goodness overshadowed the other ones and I have erased them from my memory. The pot stickers were ok, not fabulous. The green tea was great and came in cute little tea pots. I haven't had sake here and I don't know why, since I usually get sake. Guess I'd better head back for some more sake and sushi! 4 3
If you are college student trying to use the discount coupons, don't go here they don't accept coupons. Just walk across to Yonge street. Thank me for saving your time. :) 1 4
Food is good (not amazing), service is inconsistent and at one point deceptive.  The food is a less fancy version of the main restaurant next door, so if you like "new" French cuisine, you'll enjoy this place.  I like traditional French cuisine with big, rich, and deep flavors, so I was not amazed by the food.  On the food end there isn't much to complain about except that the foie gras course was lost in the soup.  That course needs to be reworked.The service at this place needs retraining. When you pay a certain amount for a meal, you expect a minimum level of service which was not met in the following ways.1. The foie gras course was described as ravioli to me and then as tortellini to the couple next to me.2. My turbot course was visually smaller than the portion recieved by the couple next to me.  The server assured me that it was the same portion because everything gets weighed out, but even if this were the case, why would you serve a visually inconsistent dish to to someone sitting next to a couple eating 2 visually standard portions?  Since I sat at the bar area I observed several turbot courses being plated and mine was the only ine that was nonstandard.  The couple to my left got 2 standard portions and I ordered before them!3. The couple to my right was served salmon with a different preparation instead of turbot without being informed that they ran out of turbot.  Apparently my nonstandard piece was the last one.  The chef did provide them with an extra dish of dover sole as compensation though.  4. They made me wait about 10 minutes after I finished my last course (dessert) before asking if I received the dessert yet, then the server asked if wanted coffee or the check.  They even set a spoon in front of me to make me believe that something was coming.  The waiter then played it off like he made me wait because he didn't want to make a mistake since he almost served the wrong dish before.  If you screwed up and forgot about me just own up to it!Bottom line 3.5/5 for food 2/5 for service. 3 2
Great food and drinks. Hate that I always have to make a reservation to eat there, but other than that, great place. 4 5
Good food but misses the mark overall. Bathrooms are horrible, 2 single stall unisex ones that have long lines even at slow times. Service is slow. Seating for many people is awful , where we were lined up  in a picnic table like row of tables with half of the seats facing the butts of people at the bar.  Food is good but expensive . Rib Eye is $40, scallops are $9 ea.   One time was enough for me. 2 3
Haven't yet tried this Oyster Bar in Santa Fe....because unlike Texas Station, this one doesn't open until 4 or 5 pm.  Hey!!! F & B Manager....people love fish for LUNCH too!! 2 1
This place is terribly slow. There is never anything ready in their hot n ready zone. I come because it's supposed to be convenient but it's not convenient to wait 15 min for a cheese pizza. 2 1
I ordered spicy chicken curry that comes with tom yum soup, grilled calamari appetizer and a glass of white wine. It was $26 and change with tax in.Service was ok. Attentive but not very well trained. Breaded calamari was tasty but I realized that most of it was breading and very thin strips inside the breading was calamari. Nice presentation though. On a bed of fresh lettuce in a dish in a shape of a boat. It also had a sauce that was half mayo and I found the mayo too western tasting addition. Soup was very good too. Very comforting on a chill night and just right amount spicy. Spicy chicken curry came in a very big portion and was very spicy. The waitress tried to explain me that albeit not very well. I have a friend who  finds Doritos spicy and I can take quite a bit of heat in my food and this was definitely at my limit if not a bit more. I could not taste the food very much and was sipping water after each bite. I took the leftovers home and warmed it up in coconut cream and that was definitely better. It was just past the dinner hour rush when I finished eating and the restaurant emptied out so I sat sipping my glass of wine watching the world go by outside on the street sans the usual ding of a busy restaurant in the background. My phone was also low on battery so I found an outlet and plugged my phone. Shortly after, the bus boy came and told me that his boss needs the electrical outlet and for me to unplug my phone. It was an odd request that I obliged. When I was on my way out, I passed by the little bench where the outlet was and saw that the owner plugged in 2 machines that were not cordless and battery powered but both had a cord (I would understand if she needed to charge them) so the whole point was that she (owner) did not want me to charge my phone there (and use their electricity). Judging by a comment from the woman with the baby in the review section, this is a good place to come for some cheap thai food but don't expect much from service and having a great experience. If you do, it will only result in a disappointment. 3 2
I was very excited to be staying at Luxor when my friends and I booked here for 4 nights but left wishing I had stayed somewhere else.First when we got to Luxor the check-in line was ridiculous. I swear of everywhere i've stayed in Vegas this has got to have the longest/slowest lines. After about 45 minutes waiting in line we finally got our room on the very top and we were dissappointed. The room was plain and very uninviting & I didn't dig the slanted wall at all.I really didn't like the layout or the feel of the casino floor so I didn't end up playing that much there.Spent some time at the pool and did like that because it was a decent pool and was not crazy busy.Nobody at the casino was mean or rude to us just didn't like the vibe.On a high note my friends and I ran into Criss Angel 3 times while there. Once we were in the elevator (inclinator) and I didnt even notice until a friend poked me and said something. The next time was right outside of the elevator and I was going to go ask for an autograph but his bodyguard looked like if I came close he was going to tackle me and he was on his cell phone yelling at someone so I declined to get near him. The last time was once again at the elevator.I dont hate this place but until their rooms are more inviting and the vibe is better I wont be booking a room there...I might come for a short visit though. 3 2
If you like music, bands, dancing this is for you.  If you like food and drinks, it is okay if you can get past poor service and staff that do not seem to like to work there.  We enjoyed for the music and dancing, so it was okay for us, but service really needs to be improved. 3 2
I have been a customer for the past few years and love this place, unfortunately about 3 hours ago their rude staff got the best of me when I brought clients to discuss a brief over coffee (at their request).I brushed it off more than a few times in my years of being a patron thinking it might have just been a bad day for whoever was working. I've worked in similar situations and understand that you can't always be perfect but this was just unacceptable. I'm talking huffing and puffing, rolling their eyes & slamming cups! Not once, but TWICE when my clients ordered.I was absolutely mortified! I had to apologize to my clients for even suggesting the place.I won't be returning. 1 2
i loved the hazelnut coolatta, my son loved the doughnut holes. the quality of the product is what will be will be bringing me back to this location, the staff was a little mixed up but the coolatta and the doughnut holes made up for that. 5 4
Friday night they got a really bad JD, who plays the same music every time a few sons only and keep repeating it all night it gets boring. Some people call this a salsa club, but it is not, they don't play salsa. This place does not attract a lot of people; it is small and plays bad Latin music. Don't waste your night there! 2 1
Food City is a "Meeh-he-co" experience in itself. The deli is good for cerviche, burritos and the like. The bakery has those great empanadas, try the pineapple. The fruit and vegetable section is par none, with great variety and prices. Lets just say, their are always mexicans and asian folks buying fruits and vegetables there. They know this stuff. To top it all off, on somedays, they BBQ whole chicken outside on real wood coals, not that charcoal bullshit and not gringo gas, but real bonafide wood. This yardbird is good, and if your real nice, buy some green chiles and ask the person to roast them for you outside and slip them a few dollars ;) Like I said, Meeh-he-co experience. 4 3
Lovely little coffee shop :) It's cozy and you can get delicious coffee and simple eats. It's great! 5 4
Went here with a party of 8 for my birthday last year.  We ordered two of the Feast thingy's (All American Feast, I think it's called)...They serve them on a garbage can lid. Comes with ribs, chicken, and brisket or pulled pork, with 2 big sides and cornbread muffins.  Oh, and the fries, that are scattered all over the lid. My god, ALL of the food was good.  The ribs, were delicious fall off the bone, variety, the pulled pork was amazing (I had the pulled pork sandwich for lunch one time as well).  I love the different kinds of bbq sauce.  Their desserts are actually pretty friggin' good as well.  Their bread pudding is diabetic shock, but it's absolutely delicious.  The prices, really aren't that bad, either.  It's about $60 for one of the Feasts, and it really does serve about 5 people.   I've been here 3 times now, and will definitely come back again. 4 5
It's pretty good for the burgers. The fries though weren't good. Seemed like they were frozen. The have a nice bar area. And even an outdoor area. Once the weather is better that will be great! 4 3
Are you kidding me with the 4 star reviews?! This place lacks quality fresh fish and is very expensive for the type of food they serve. We got a small roll combo, and legit half of it was California rolls and rolls with sweet potato in the middle. If you want better sushi, head to north York. Better prices, better fish. 1 3
I go there for breakfast sometimes, but the last couple of times they've not had the muffins to make their breakfast sandwiches, which is odd because I go into work earlier than most.  Location is near the Clinic, so I imagine it would attract a lot of customers, but whoever is running this place seems to have no interest in actually managing the place.  There's a Burger King nearby and you can just go there. 2 3
I know live in Vegas and always wanted to try pinks. It's nothing special. I'd rather buy a better tasting & more robust hotdog & a drink @ Costco for just $1.50 than spend $6-$7 for something less appealing @ pinks. 2 3
Reviewed Dish: Palabok (Noodles with an egg on top)Reviewed during: Mon - Fri Lunch timeService Speed: 3 / 5Cooking speed: 3 / 5Food Quality: 3 / 5Food Quantity: 2 / 5Price: 3 / 5 Cleanness: 3 / 5 Repeat: Repeat for a snack, but not for a full size lunchIt took them a while a get the noddle ready. It came in a smaller container than I expected. Unfortunately it wasn't very flavorful. It's good for a snack, but not for a full meal. 2 4
True disappointment. Bland food and long wait for it. The service was the only positive part. 1 2
We arranged a shoot with Townsley to get some family portraits done of our 3-member family. We selected the Union Station locale as we felt it matched well with our love of travel. It also happens to be the closest offered location to where we live in SE LA County :)  Stuart was pretty much on time and we got right down to photo shooting. We did not use the interior of Union Station, rather we went into the courtyard between the station and the next-door MWD building. This is a nice enough area but it doesn't really have any travel connection. I suppose lighting would be a real problem inside the station.The shoot was pretty quick and painless, even with a 15 month old along. You do need to go to the Townsley office in Beverly Hills to review proofs and order your pictures, so be prepared for that. We haven't gone yet, so we don't know what the finished product will look like. Will update the review when we get our portraits. 4 5
This place is right down the street from my house. It's close and in a great location (small shopping mall with a Zipps).I really, really want to like this place, but for some reason the Barista's cannot get my order right! I do not like 3 pumps of any flavor in my latte, it's frankly too much flavor. Especially vanilla, it is already strong on it's own. Not sure why all these places claim to have the best coffee and espresso yet mask if with all the sugary flavors! All I ask for is a one pump vanilla latte, that's it! By the time I get to my car to take my first sip, it's ALWAYS WRONG. Guess I should drink it at the table to make sure it's right. I even see the barista write it down on the cup. Hmm not sure the disconnect here.If you are looking for free wifi and a decent selection, check this place out. Just make sure you bring enough $$ so they don't charge the ridiculous .50 charge for using a card! 3 2
ok do you guys know that fresh restaurant sells some items  GMO I was told that by a watier an i was very mad because I go there all the time.. and I really thought they celebrate more Farmers Market & local market knowing full well the studies done on genetically modified organism will never go back again tks 1 2
The service was great. I ordered the Works Scramble and while it was tasty it was a bit heavy on the salty feta. The portions are big. 4 3
Joso's definitely offers a unique dining experience. We always drove past it's beautiful patio and always wanted to try it. On our visit we were seated inside, very interesting decor all around will entertain you until your food comes. The menu is pricey but I would say worth the experience. You can pick and chose different things on the menu as you like. Staff is very helpful in making suggestions and extremely professional. The only negative for me was the smell of seafood. I know its asking for too much since this is a seafood restaurant but I hate the smell of fish while waiting to eat, it's kinda unappetizing for me. 5 3
Love the great home decor and housewares section! Almost too many racks of clothes to sort through, high quality brands but usually a little out dated. Prices can be a little high but do go down the longer the item has been there. Staff is friendly and helpful. They have a rewards program to earn store credit and send emails with special discount days! 3 4
After calling just about every Westside mechanic and asking about programming my Vance and Hines fuelpak they all said , "nope, haven't done one of those". I finally called Synyster and telling him I had the instructions and settings, he told me to bring the bike by and he would look at it, like now, anytime today. I putted over and Jeremy looked over the instructions, talked with one of his techs and Bam, have a seat, I'll get right on it. Just over an hour later with a miniscule bill of $78 bucks I was cruising down the road with a well running 1200 Sportster. Now you can't do better than that. Give them a shot. I know I will be back 5 1
I'm a regular here however I received a pedicure and a gel manicure but the older gal stepped on my toe and ruined the polish while giving me a manicure. She then cut me 3 times drawing blood and totally skipped the hand massage at the end bc 4 women walked in. She also insisted i pay before helping to re-pain the toe she ruined. Service is huge and she rushed the best part and caused me pain. 3 2
Yuck! We went there tonight and first found the cutlery to be dirty, second it took a lot of time to be served. Third my food was tasteless. The bean paste was bland, not a speck of salt, i know I can salt my own but it should just be an adjustment.I ordered the beef fajitas, the beef was chewy, I just chewed it and discreetly spit it out.I told the server(nicely) and he did say sorry but did not take it off the bill.We will not be visiting again! 2 1
I have always had great experiences at Downtownfood and would highly recommend. I have been here for lunch, dinner and special events, and dtf has done all of these well. During the work week, they do a $25 3 course prix fixe menu, which is an excellent value. The service is always great, and a nice atmosphere as well.  Can't wait for Chef D-Mac to open his new restaurant in Mission! 4 5
Disappointing - met a friend there for dinner; he had been there several times but this was our first visit. My friend and I had the quarter chicken natural, which was fine, but on the small side. It was tasty enough, but not particularly juicy ( the kind of moist chicken that I would expect for $11). My wife ordered the " famous" six small shrimp for $17. Seriously?We also ordered three sides - the corn, the beats and the succotash - all were fine but not unique in any way.Since we split the bill with our friend, my part was $45 and some change for the chicken, 6 shrimp and two rather small sides. We left feeling a bit hungry.There are many, many more excellent restaurants in the area where $45 + tip would have gotten us a more interesting and unique meal for that amount. Cafe Monte on Fairview, Upstream, and Village Tavern immediately come to mind.Bottom line: food didn't have any pizazz, the prices were way out of line and we'll not likely give Roosters our patronage in the future. Just too many other good places in the South Park area 2 3
Perfect for a cheat day. Love going there and love taking my kids there! Always a friendly staff. Been there a lot of times and always had a positive experience 4 5
I really expected something more refined. The entrance is so grand with its own elevator and lobby area. They use universal wine glasses for water glasses, which I found quite off. I ordered the flat iron steak special, it was bland. Thankfully there was bacon on the side to the rescue  my husband ordered the lamb sausage hash. It very tasty but wasn't balanced. They sausage was overwhelming and needed more potatoes to level the dish. The brio he bread was really good. For some reason, the waitrons have table cloths wrapped around their waist. Service was just like their food, bland, nothing special. If you want a fancy breakfast with good food, go to tableau at the Wynn. 2 3
One of the most wonderful Thai massages I have received in Toronto. A beautiful space and my therapist was focused, attentive and very effective in relieving some back and neck pain I was having. A truly amazing experience.My *only* complaint is that is seems strange to tip an RMT -- I consider this a medical service, and it makes the price prohibitive for some when you include tax and tip on top of the base price. Otherwise, highly recommended. 4 5
I was here February 2013 was a long wait. Food wasn't that bad was following Adam of Man vs Food. 3 1
Sweat is great. Great if you can afford outrageous prices for personalized training that isn't personal as it is done in groups.That isn't the main problem with that place. It's the owner himself. He is rude, arrogant and divides his attention amongst his favorites of the fittest women in there. If you're not his idea of fit, you're not even in the room. The place is small, stuffy and cramped. Josh, the owner, is not pleasant to be around. I am amazed that he's still in business. Keep your money, join any gym in the area and get a trainer that gives only you their attention. 1 2
Hey I wouldn't recommend that you have your honeymoon here, but for a last minute room when every casino is booked cuz of queen madonna, the worlds series of poker, and the air show... I'll give it a whirl since I still have fond memories of spending a whole day trying to win stuffed animals and walking 12 miles going around and around considering what to play.  (And i didn't want to stay off the strip)  For nostalgia, memories, or trying to be 12 again, I went upstairs to see if I still had the stuffed animal winning touch.  I was surprised to see that most of the same games were still there!  I concentrated on the Tic-tac-toe since it had the cutest and best price for a first win.  I'm not playing a game where you have to trade 15X to get something decent!  Hint, if you have a room they give you a book of coupons that let you play 2 for 1!  I played a total of 6x or $3.  I won twice!  I guess I still have it.  Hint #2 if your asian and your nice, the gamekeeper might let you lean over the table to float the ball in the right hole.  I got a blue bear and a pink bear that wears a "Property of circus circus hoodie".  Awww how cute!Regarding the rooms... Like I said it's no honeymoon suite, but my room was clean.  I'm a guy, as long as it's clean, i'm straight.  Strangely the lock on my room was broken and I only  realized it when I was leaving for Madonna.  Luckily I didn't have any valuables.  I called the front desk and they said they would send someone to fix it.  No one came and in the morning I called to bitch again.  I ended up talking to a sup and she sent a housekeeper to verify.  She thought I was one of those freeloading leeches that just bitches to get a free room.  Apparently there are alot of freeloading leeching customers.  The housekeeper opened the door while i was completely nekked trying to put my clothes on.  Apparently she didn't mind and just kept on messing with the door.  Finally I got my boxers on.  She left, the sup called me back and I got a free room.  Comped baby! 3 2
Myself and a friend were visiting the area from The United States.  We have a friend in Montreal who was able to get us a reservation at this restaurant.  We were very excited to be able to eat here during our trip.  We had an 830 reservation and we walked from our hotel not that far away.  We arrived about 20 minutes early and we were told we could sit and have a drink at the bar.  When we approached the bar to sit the bartender asked if we had "permission" to sit at the bar, which i thought was kind of strange.  After informing him that we did have "permission", he asked us what we would like to drink.  Two of us ordered a Pinot Noir and one ordered a mixed drink.  We sat chatting until our table was ready.  The waitress was very nice but must have been very busy that evening because she was slow coming to the table.  We ordered another round of drinks.  When she came back she poured a different wine and we told her we had the Pinot Noir.  She came back to the table and told us that they didn't have any Pinot Noir that evening and wasn't sure which wine the bartender had given us. They finally figured it out and it wasn't what we had even asked for originally.  We decided to just have the original wine and let it slide being we were so excited to be there.  We ordered the Lobster Poutin to start and also placed our dinner orders.  We were served bread thankfully because it took forever to get the Poutin which the three of us ate in no time because the portion (and we ordered the meal size) was quite small.  We had to cut the lobster pieces on top so that the three of us would at least get some lobster.  We sat talking and waiting for dinner for a very long time.  Finally the food came out and we started to eat.  The waitress then came over and kept trying to clear dishes while we were eating.  We finished up dinner and were waiting for the waitress to come back to give us the desert menu but that didn't happen.  A male came over and put a small piece of cheesecake down and said this is on the house and could we please hurry because they needed our table!!! Are they kidding me.  It was not our fault that they took so long serving us dinner but now they didn't offer us a desert menu or coffee and they throw our one small desert for 3 people and ask us to hurry so they can have the table.  We paid the overpriced bill and left and got our coffee elsewhere.  Not happy was an understatement.  Overpriced, small portions, slow service (until they need your table), never offered a dessert and coffee menu.... We ate at much better restaurants during our week long trip... 2 1
The fish is fresh and the portions are generous, but as is common with Chinese run sushi restaurants, they tend to put more rice in the rolls than the fish itself. The all-you-can-eat buffet menu has about 40 different types of rolls which are good, many of which have interesting made up names to them. The hot foods are also tasty too! The tempuras are crunchy and the variety of teppanyakis are scrumptious! The service was fast and the servers are all smiles and patient. Not bad indeed. 3 4
Stopped here for a quick dinner with a friend as we were both craving some Korean fried chicken reminiscent of our time spent in Korea. I have to say, I really wasn't expecting much walking in (mostly just picked this place because it's a really convenient location - just steps from Finch stn), but I left very pleasantly surprised/satisfied!The interior is pretty much your standard Korean restaurant/bar setting - dimmed lights, Korean music, K-pop videos showing on the TV screen. I was pretty happy that the music wasn't turned up overly loud as a lot of bars in the area tend to do so my friend and I could actually hold a conversation. It is not a big space at all but it didn't feel cramped even with another table sitting next to us.The server was very helpful with navigating the menu and we ended up ordering the cheesed corn, standard half+half chicken (fried and sauced) and the spicy grilled chicken(?). They brought out some complimentary popcorn with our drinks and the corn came out pretty quickly - served on a sizzling plate and definitely a nice app to start with! The chicken is of course the most important factor in judging a chicken restaurant and this place did not disappoint! Of all the Korean fried chicken places I've tried in Toronto, I think this place comes the closest to what I remember eating so regularly back in Korea. The fried half was very crispy, perfectly seasoned and made of smallish (but meaty) dark meat pieces. The sauce was the right mix of sweet/spicy and was not used excessively like some places do (on a side note, we did confirm with the server that the side radishes and the sauces for the chicken are both made in-house and not store bought).We barely tried the spicy grilled chicken as we were both so full from the fried chicken but from what little I did try, it was a little too spicy for my tastes but a great complement to the fried chicken, in that it somewhat eases that "greasy" feeling you get after eating a few pieces?All in all, will definitely be coming back here whenever I get a Korean friend chicken craving and would recommend to all looking for the same! 5 4
I'm not sure why there are so many negative comments, I had a good experience here.  The main reason I tried this place is because of the location, only being about 5 minutes away from my house.  Christina did my nails, extremely helpful and nice.  She took her time to get me the the exact color I wanted, talked to me and offered me a drink.  I went in an hour before closing and the receptionist was afraid I wouldn't be able to squeeze in a pedicure, but Christina was fast and efficient to make sure I had enough time.  Another woman (I forgot her name :( ) did my pedicure when everyone was already packed up and ready to leave so I really appreciated that.  It seriously was the best pedicure I've ever had, all the tough skin I had on my feet gone.  A lot of people complain about the laziness of the owner, but I didn't see him fooling around.  A nail lady's phone was going off and he was attentive to put her ringer on silent, and sorting through the receipts with the receptionist. Only downside...the owner of the place was there today, and a bit standoffish.  I wouldn't say rude...but not friendly.  He interrupted my pedicure to have the lady check a yelp review (I'm assuming) because it was regarding a complaint and it was in a different language she could understand.  I didn't mind but it seemed unprofessional.  He kind of was staring at me, so I just said hello and he ignored me. :/ I would have given it five stars.  However, I work in an office, and a lot of ladies ask about my nails since I'm constantly working with my hands, and I will recommend this place and Christina! 4 3
Beer is good. Food seemed appropriate. Service was a bit scatterbrained. Everyone was very nice. If you're in the area stop in. Otherwise seek out a brewpub near you for similar fare. 2 3
Oh Metro. It is the only grocery store near my house so I find myself coming here even though honestly its terrible. The produce is never fresh. It is always busy (due to great location). In general the staff are unfriendly - but it's hard to blame considering most of the customers I have seen hear are nastier than the rotting oranges up front. One positive of Metro is that are typically good deals if you check the flyer. Unfortunately if anything that is on sale will not be in stock. However, they are kind of okay about giving out rainchecks. If you can go somewhere else do it, but if you are in a pinch Metro is okay - I just wouldn't buy produce here. 1 2
I usually love Chompie's, not today.. Service was bad, food was cold, when I order a HOT pastrami I like it HOT.. Fry's were cold too.. Had an appointment to get to or I would have had them warm my meal but the server was hard to track down and when she ask me how my meal was I told her it was not very hot and she told me its just suppose to be warm... Really this was not my first Hot Pastrami here... I don't like to complain but every thing about my $13.00 HALF  sandwich meal was terrible including the service.... 2 1
First off I am an nurse and ur optic nerve is the connection between the back of the eye and the brain. So the last review is a total joke. We bought a deal on groupon and were very very satisfied with Dr. Cramer. I would recommend him to my MOM. It really bothers me to see posts like that. Dr. Cramer was very friendly and down go earth.  I will definitely be going back 4 5
We love our leather loveseat and sofa that we purchased from sofa mart.The problem was the costomer service and the fact that it took 6 week longer than expected (we were quoted 2-3 weeks for delivery... it arrived 81/2 weeks later).  In this time of wait and waiting for our furniture there was no communication from sofa mart, I had to constantly call for updates, to which our salesman Micheal was no help what so ever.Would only get furniture from there if it was in stock or you can take it with you. 3 2
Have been to the Garage twice now and they are batting 1 for 2.   Went there on a Saturday for lunch and the food and service was excellent.  I had the pulled pork sandwich with sweet potatoe fries which was original for pulled pork served on a pizza crust bun.  My girlfriend had the buffalo chicken salad which was really good, grilled chicken in buffalo sauce on top of baby greens.  Excellent beer selection.Went there on a Friday for happy hour and got there a little before 6, there was a 30 min wait for a indoor table or immediate seating on the patio, so we decided to sit on the patio.  Hostess sat us and said a server will be by shortly, normal procedure.  About 10 minutes later no server had come by and the hostess returned and asked us if we ave been helped yet, we said no so the hostess said she will get someone.  Another 10 minutes and no server.  It wasn't busy on the patio about 5 tables occupied, all with food and drink.  We decided that they must not want our business, so we went next door to Sushi Eye.Will try again, just won't sit on the patio. 2 4
Heard some great things about this place so the boyfriend and I decided to check it out since we had no idea what we wanted to eat for dinner.   One word: disappointed.The food selection was decent.  They even had prime rib and snow crab legs.  However, it was the food quality that was horrible.  Everything tasted either too salty or just bland.  By the looks of it, most of food seemed to be sitting out too long.  The service wasn't that great either.  Our server came by at the most two times.  We needed refills on drinks that we never got.  The buffet does unlimited beer.  We are not fans of Miller High-Life so we decided to pass on that. All in all, we will never go back again.  There are far too many buffets in Vegas to venture to if we ever are in the mood.  This place just doesn't have what it takes. 1 2
The horrible thing about all the time people make to write reviews to help steer patrons away from The Gypsy Bar, is that The Gypsy Bar DOES NOT CARE.  It's futile and they seem to have their own vision that doesn't really include quality service anyway.  Funny thing is the current owner got rid off all the staff that made it this way before and still currently has the same problem.  So to understand where the problem lies is a complete mystery.  We have been patrons for the majority of the time The Gypsy Bar has been open.  Coming in for the amazing happy hour menu and the soothing tunes of the live music on Friday nights.  Jessica our server was always wonderful.  She always remembered our faces and what we drank and was a bright spot that we looked for every Friday night.  However, around mid January the establishment took a turn in feel and service.  Consecutive times of coming in (in grid lock traffic from south Chandler) we were turned away due to "private parties" booking the entire area that supports the live music.  I have been in the fine Resort/Hotel industry since I was old enough to work (over half my life) so I understand catering to a client and still taking care of the regulars who keep you alive.  The way they handled this however seemed to be a lack of what to do for the normal patrons by the front line service staff.  We don't choose to go out that often, and when we do we are very specific.  To be turned away the first time then the next consecutive week when we had family in town specifically there to do two things...one, see us and two see the music the gypsy had on friday nights to be treated by the staff where we actually were insulted and scolded for where we were sitting(mind you with no one sitting in this area but us...with 15 minutes left to open it up to the public)...this server was an asian female with two toned hair like the girl on last season's The Voice....then the bartender...James I think ,barked at  my husband when he was only asking for happy hour menus...saying, "Im not the one you need to talk to"...Graham, the manager tried to smooth it over with buying a couple rounds of drinks, which was nice, however we feel no matter when we go in there from now on we will be treated second rate and have evidence that we will.  Staff, outside of a couple female servers was arrogant. The people who run things from the kitchen are exempt from this statement.  I was a concierge for almost a decade and I would steer clear of this atmosphere until the management does another complete overhaul and the guest is really seen as the guest. 1 2
I wanted to treat myself to a fun gel manicure and decided to give this place a try. I looked through the photos posted on yelp by other customers and even on Nail Candy's Facebook and Instagram, and noticed that most of the beautiful designs were done by a technician named Hope. I called on a Friday asking for a same day appointment with Hope, but the receptionist curtly informed me that Hope was booked all day, and that the next available appointment would be on Saturday. I came in on Saturday early for my appointment, but still had to wait 20 minutes past my appointment time, even though the salon was empty. Furthermore, my appointment was not with Hope (she went out to get food), but with a technician named Felicia. During my nail appointment, the techs were all chatting about their love interests and were using vulgar language. I would not recommend bringing a child here. Beyond this, my actual nail art was STUNNING. I've received so many compliments on my nails. Felicia helped me choose the exact shape and design I wanted, right down to the colors. She seemed very excited to do the design I chose and was extremely friendly throughout the process. Although it took about an hour to complete, my nails looked gorgeous, AND they've lasted an absurd amount of time (FIVE WEEKS -- They even lasted through all the heavy lifting involved in moving into a new apartment. They're very grown out, but at this point I just want to see how long they'll last before starting to chip.) I did end up paying a pretty penny for them: $48 without tip. Overall, the customer service and price leaves something to be desired, but the finished product is everything you could ask for. 4 2
My daughter called to tell me her car will turn over but won't start at 4:30pm on a Friday. Problem, I live in Asheville she's going to college in Charlotte. Call AAA have the vehicle towed to this AAA service center. Then I see the reviews. I went into worry mode. I've managed auto part stores and have heard of horror stories. But I can't do anything being so far away, so I wait. Next morning I call them to hear the bad news, guess what Shane says the technicians started the car right up. Checked it out to make sure nothing else going on. He assumes that since the car was on an incline and had low gas that it wasn't getting enough fuel but everything was good. When I asked if I could give him payment over the phone, surprised again, he said not necessary that there was no charge. Thanks for letting a distant dad not have to worry. 5 1
While the flood greatly impacted the zoo, it is amazing to hear how they dealt with the flood emergency. Talking to the employees there, you can see how much they care about the animals and how much they love what they do. The new penguin exhibit is lovely. The Africa exhibit is also great. I was lucky enough to be able to do the Behind the Scenes experience with the giraffes, where you get to get up close and personal. Would recommend visiting on a weekday or perhaps in winter, when it won't be quite as busy. On a nice summer weekend day, the crowds can be a little much to handle and take away from the experience. 4 5
I'm sorry the food was so good I forgot to share before I eat! Hahaha,... #Anondo has one of the best #indianfood in town ever! #food #yyz #foodporn #tasty #nomnom #hungry #goodeats #letseat #silentsuspekts #ssmedia #yyz #toronto #lifestyle #design #fashion #media #socials #events 4 5
My favorite Mexican restaurant in the Valley, and there are a bunch of good ones here.  The atmosphere is a little schlocky but still cool.  The service is usually top notch, and the food is terrific.My wife gets the Salad Carbon - see the previous review.  I usually get the Pollo con Cheso - a chimi-style enchilada with a spicy white cream sauce.  Heaping portions with rice and beans that actually taste good.  5 Stars. 5 4
I love what they do. But I just had my puppy there for their spay/neuter clinic. He came home, the next day he showed signs of a UTI, (bloody urine, straining to pee). So I took him to his veterinarian and they said they were even disappointed, and prescribed him antibiotic. Yes, you're getting money for it. But be a little bit easier on the little guys, no he wasn't dropped all the way but pulling and tugging and poking resulted in a bloody UTI. I'm very disappointed. Just because it's cheap doesn't mean it's worth it. Please reconsider their clinic, but continue to adopt and visit them as the staff was somewhat friendly... I'm almost afraid to know how they treated my dog when I left. On a better note, his incision isn't infected and seems to be alright. 2 1
They have the lowest rates around Peoria and Sun City for manis and pedis but I can't stand to patronize any business that has Fox News on TV's for customers 3 1
One of the best philly cheese steaks I've had.  Have not really had anything else from them, but when I order this is pretty much what I get.  They deliver and that is awesome!  Really great if you are looking for a philly cheesesteak.  They chop the meat up very small and diced though. 4 5
That is correct. That was the first time I personally had to wait, but once in... all was forgiven. My go to Sushi is always the Caterpillar roll. 4 3
My mom and I have been coming here for years and it's been the same every time. No matter what, you will wait and wait and wait for AT LEAST an hour, no matter when your appointment is or if you show up on the dot or early. They have no concept of time management.  None. For example, I had an appt today at 11A. I showed up 5 mins early. It is now 12 and they JUST called me in. Mind you that was only for my temp, BP, and weight. Im still sitting here waiting. That's 1 hour and counting! Im trying very very hard to not curse quite a bit right now because this is so unprofessional. It tells the patient that their time doesn't matter & that they aren't important. It is extremely rude. They are a good enough staff. Everyone is nice and friendly. Years ago the old PA caught a life threatening issue that saved my life. That's why Im not giving it 1star.UPDATE:  It's 12:35 PM now and the PA just walked in. So that's a 1hr & 35 minute wait. Did I get an apology for my wait? No. Obviously me telling her that I was upset because of their lack of professionalism made her angry because she was super short with me afterwards.  I said, "I am very frustrated right now because I have been waiting for way too long. That is unprofessional and extremely rude." Apparently that made me a jerk. Whatever,  I am never going back there again. I have been to many doctors and that is NOT how a professional office treats their patients.  And I won't even get started on how when I walked back into the room she was talking about my results with my mother who had come with me. Im in my 30's. Patient confidentiality? Seriously, no respect or professionalism from this PA. 2 1
I've heard there are big plans for this place. But it is still in its early days. Nice community, well kept grounds, and quiet. Your drive to the Vineyards makes you wonder if you are in the right place because you mostly see small homes and trailers, some are not taken care of. Then as you arrive at the Vineyards, the surroundings change and you find perfect landscaping, new homes, and neighborhoods that seem family ready. I was only a visitor here, but I think this would be a great place to live in a few years. 3 4
First of all, I had a nice time swimming in the pool with no people around. The water was perfect temperature for me, so it was very relaxing. BUT the reason there was no people, is I am guessing because of the construction that was going on in the spa (on the upper level - didnt affect the pool area). I did not expect the construction and wasnt told on the phone when I was booking an appointment there. So here are the cons & pros:Pros: warm nice water, good steam room (even though very tiny - again because there were no people, it was perfect), very friendly personnel (EXCEPT for the manager - very rude!!!), nice rob and slippers, tea area with nice teas that you can make yourself, cookies, water, apples.Cons: RUDE manager who didnt want to address our concerns and was talking back at us. The clock is not working in the pool area, so there is no way of knowing what time it is (especially inconvenient if you have an appointment booked), construction on the upper level where I was doing my pedicure, a bit cold on the upper level, steam room is very small, and no water anywhere near the pool/steam room area. When we used the towels and wanted new ones, we had to ask personnel to bring them to us (wasnt enough in the pool area, an no one came by to check), water has a lot of chlorine, even though not supposed to. When we addressed our concerns with the manager, she didnt really want to do anything about it or give us a discount. For that price will not be coming back, which is unfortunate, because the personnel there is really nice and did a good job with my manicure. 3 2
I go to Fabulous Freddy's and when I moved on other side of town I found this Country Club car wash. The ultimate exterior wash was $11 which I purchased and man did they do a bad job. They don't wipe your rims down plus they don't shine your tires. When I go to Fabulous for the same price of $11 they wipe your rims with a towel and shine your tires for the same price as Country Club car wash. I will not be going back to this place at anytime. Find fabulous at your area. They do a fabulous job for your buck! 2 5
Overall: Asian fusion buns with a unique flavor profile twist that includes earl grey, matcha, Hong Kong style, Japanese,  Tawainese and French.Sample: there are  bread samples for you to taste before you buyCleaniness: unlike other Chinese bakeries that reuse the trays and tongs, they do clean it before reusingCost: range from about $ 2.90-5$ for buns- I didn't check the pastriesTaste:  bought the Earl grey twist, matcha red bean bun and it tasted great.Value and would I come back:  probably not - the price seems a bit inflated.  For a one time experience for breakfast or snack, it's not a bad idea. 3 4
The service was very good, and fast. But I did have a problem with the menu being dirty the pages where sticky and  had some dried peaces of food and so was the table. 3 2
Just like the previous reviewers, we arrived on time only to be told there would be a delay - about 30 minutes. The photographer insisted, even verbally fighting with me in front of my kids, that she wanted to take my son's pictures first. My son is shy and takes awhile to warm up so this was a terrible idea - but the photographer just wouldn't listen to reason and I decided it was easier to just let her take his pictures first since I had waited to the last minute to take holiday pictures. I asked for our toddler to be next, followed by group pics, and then my older two girls. The photographer again disregarded my wishes and wanted to do all of the individual pictures first, so by the time she was ready for the group shots - my toddler was in full meltdown and we left before we could finish. We made an appointment two days later to come back and take the group pictures - what a hassle with 4 kids during the busy holiday season. They didn't have time to review the pictures at that time so I'm still waiting for a call back to finally see if any of the pictures turned out! I was glad to have a Groupon, but still a waste of time and energy - probably better off using a different studio with better reviews next time. 2 1
Well.  Here's the thing:When it's good, it's good!  When it's bad, it's pretty bad.  I've had some pretty tasty dinners here, and the portions are such that I can get about three meals out of a dinner combo.  Awesome, considering it's costs like $8 or something.  But then I tried the Hunan Beef and it was awful.  No flavor and a strange texture.I give it 4 stars because I don't want to change their rating.  If you get the right things (which so far have been General Tsao's Chicken and Sesame Chicken), then it's good.  But some things are very mediocre to... not good.I will definitely go back.  Great price, generally good Chinese food, and pretty giant portions for the price! 4 3
Rooms were clean, and well accommodated, but the free internet was spotty at best; you could check your email, but streaming movies or videos was hit or miss.They had great shuttle service to/from airport, and nearby malls, but the places you can go are limited.Great staff, very helpful when dealing with requests. 3 4
Drive thru for hash browns and OJ. The lady was super efficient, which I loved.I noticed the drive thru line was quickly conquered by the morning team. Great job! 4 5
Have taken several cars to this place.  Always one time and it is fixed.  Recently had a noise issue.  It wasn't my transmission but they fixed it anyway and did not charge me because it was a simple fix.  Great service. 5 4
Last few deliveries the quality has been dropping :( our pouting last night had watery gravy with no taste. It was no thicker than a soup. Very disappointed this is the 3rd time the quality has not been great.  Please Nikas get your act together. 3 2
For high quality and good selection of vinyl, this store certainly has plenty to offer for audiophiles and novices alike. 4 5
Came on a recommendation from a friend. We had the chilli chicken dry, the chilli shrimp dry, the Manchurian mix fried rice and the chicken pakoras. My favourite dish was the Manchurian Mixed Fried Rice - it was just the right level of spice - it's definitely got some kick to it so if you aren't a big spicy food eater you might want to ask them to tone it down. Portion size was huge! We had enough for lunch and dinner the next day. Underwhelming was the chicken pakoras - they were not that great compared to others we have had from at other Hakka places. They were also quite pricy for what you were getting. They also came last which was a bit odd since usually they come as appetizers. We were halfway through our meal when they arrived and only had one each since our plates were full. I know people rave about the prices at this place but it was only reasonable - not a super great deal. Our go to Hakka place is about 20 dollars cheaper and it's good food too! I would still come again though 4 3
I think the product is good maybe not the best  but for the money it's very good. The website is very good for downloads for new and even really old products. If you ever have to deal with customer service live, they are the worst. Save yourself grief and use the website and do not call the company, they are really really bad when trying to deal live 3 1
Realistically, 2.5 stars...If you just need your standard shirts and slacks (no premium fabrics) cleaned quickly and cheaply, this is your place.  My husband has had several of these types of items cleaned here with no problem.However, if you're looking to get something more delicate cleaned, I wouldn't recommend this place.  I wanted to get a couple of dresses cleaned, but one has a little bit of beadwork and one is strapless and has that rubbery/plastic lining on the inside.  In both cases, the attendant said that I would need to sign off on a no-liability clause in the event that the beads broke off or the rubber/plastic melted.  Ummm... huh?  I've never had to do that to get these particular dresses cleaned at other cleaners.  No thanks!  I'm not taking any chances.  I'll go elsewhere to get them done properly and with no damage. 3 2
I was hopeful for this restaurant because it is close, but I was extremely disappointed at the service. The waitress (who appeared to be an owner) seemed very rude as though she was rushing to get my party of two out of the restaurant. As we were standing up and leaving, she was already clearing our table. Keep in mind the restaurant was very slow and we were one table out of a total of three occupied tables in the restaurant. When I tipped the waitress and thanked her, she just replied "bye".  We were only there for less than 30 minutes and business was slow so I didn't understand her curt behavior. The sushi itself was unremarkable. The rolls tasted quite dry, which I am not used to. 1 2
Food was Good - that is where they get the two star rating. Everything else, a lack of communication and caring. First off, I understand that this a business, I get that. I really do. But when a company puts in a large order online, one would think that there will be checks and double checks prior to someone coming to pick up the order. This was not done. A part of the order was incorrect, some of it was missing. (I know that I am not entirely blameless, but before I left the restaurant, I asked and was reassured that I had a complete order.) Called the restaurant back with my issue, wait time was long (but I was calling at the end of a peak time, no fault there) and it will be delivered.  Ok, cool. 2 hours and 4 calls later, I found out that they did try to deliver the missing order, wrote the number down wrong to contact me. The Rep on the phone told me that the missing order was the left at the front desk - that was a lie, The Delivery Driver took it and left.  When I called, I was told that there was a shift change; they have no idea what is going on and hung up. At that point, I believe that we will not be ordering from this establishment in the future. TL:DR - If you place a large order from this restaurant, don't. Save yourself the trouble and go elsewhere. 2 1
2.5 StarsMaybe it was becuz I order take out? but not after reading similar reviewsThe sushi I order was okay, except "the I love sushi roll", it was chopped of tomatoes and salmon chunks mixed in sum tangy sauce, not glazed over the sushi, but more like dumped on.  Visually not pleasing.Rice with Beef Teriyaki was super dry. Same as the salmon teriyaki I got for my mother.  My brother order the Spicy Salmon Bowl, which was the same concept as "i love sushi roll" but the stuff was dumped over your lettuce. I eat a lot of sushi, I don't think this place will make it in my rotation. 2 3
Went last night around 6 for he first time.  Had a good cocktail.  Food was OK; service was terrible.  Jess never said boo to us, just put the menus down, took our order, and walked away.  Never smiled once. We split the cranberry & blue cheese salad and fish & chips; both were good and ample for both us; therefore, good value for money.  However, we were disappointed at how slim and uninteresting the menu was.  Shopping at Bass Pro Outdoor World made it a fun evening. 3 2
I've heard so many good things about this place I decided to check it out! I had a fun night out planned and scheduled an appt 1.5hrs before I was meeting up with my friends. What an amazing idea!!!! Never will I ever do my own hair again! Walked in with my makeup and outfit on and walked out with great hair! This place is seriously icing on the cake to complete your look! My stylist nailed the style I was looking for, everyone was super friendly as well.Side note.... I was really looking forward to an adult beverage while getting styled but was never offered anything?? Maybe I misunderstood other reviews on that?? Would have been a nice touch on my overall experience!I will definitely be back!!! 4 5
Please read full review before eating there. Food is great! No doubt about that and the price is excellent as well. You will have no server problems until the end when you're about ready to leave. & this is the reason I give it 1 star... Is because of the service from the "manager" and "cashier" that was received from them. The manager's name is Debbie I think and the cashier's name is Cathy. Debbie is just a rude manager but Cathy is something else! I've dealt with her 2 times already and 2 of the 2 times; I've never had someone give me such terrible attitude. I mean you do get terrible customers but I've never had such a bad vibe and attitude that Cathy has given. She needs to be retrained as an "employee." 1 2
All I have to say is I changed my daughters dentist. First off they forget to call me when my daughters retainer arrived, they said I should be expecting a call 3 to 4 weeks. Okay 2 months past and still no call. I finally called and asked them about it so they but me on hold, umm yeah they couldn't find it. They call me back and asked if I wanted to set an appointment, of course I do since my daughter needed it to get her teeth pulled. That was the very last time she went there. Tips for finding the right dentist for your child: Make sure the place is kid friendly (Names will get you) Clean Staff is friendly Your child feels welcomed (there is nothing more important then finding the right dentist that makes your child feel comfortable) 1 5
Overall: Unless I was in the area, I wouldn't go out of my way to go back. Service: Our food took a while to arrive but they all came around the same time. Food: I liked the dosa and curries. My mango lassi was room temperature. 2 4
Came in Saturday around 1120, was told they were a bit busy and to come back at noon. No big deal, ran another errand. Came back at noon and waited 40 minutes for them to even take my car in for work. Lucky for them an oil change takes ~20min and we were able to get out about an hour after we arrived. Great customer service as always but not impressed today with the time it took. 3 2
Best vegan or vegetarian food in this area hands down! The brunch is amazing, the quinoa fries are insane!!!! Most options are healthy, lots if gluten or dairy free meals, including dessert. The juice is also amazing. Everything is fairly expensive, but you get what you pay for. It's crowded in here and not kid friendly, so make a reservation. A quick cheaper option is the sandwiches they have in a cooler for lunches. 4 5
pork belly appetizer delish.steak tacos, delish.bread pudding delish. waitress a sweetie.whole experience the best. 5 4
Took clients and their wives for dinner.  The experience was over the top.  The service the minute we sat down to the very end was exceptional.  The food was outstanding and the portions were very good.  Everyone at the table had a great time.  We definitely plan on going back......if you want to make a positive impression on someone special in your life......bring them here. 4 5
HATED HATED HATED it. Won't go back and here's why. TINY menu and 1/4 of that was breakfast. Some of our menus had TO GO stamped on them, not a big deal but wtf? There is a chicken in the logo but only one chicken item. Appetizers - needed the waiter to explain what they were. Only one vegetarian dish on entire menu. We had a party of 10, 3 of us ordered tacos, they were all served together even though we were at opposite ends of the table. It feels like this restaurant is just an experiment and if it doesn't work they'll replace it again. If you are going to do something, commit to it. Out of a party of 10 the BEST comment was the burger was good (followed by a shrug of the shoulders.)I sent the owner an e-mail letting him know about my experience. Got a snotty response saying things like "We serve it one way and one way only"BTW let's be very clear...the Clarendon and the restaurant are separately owned and different experiences. 1 2
Order a Bacardi and coke...... Except don't expect to get Bacardi rum in your drink. You ask for high level liquor and they give u well liquor 1 2
In my last review I was not thrilled with the service. I guess someone noticed. We've been back several times in the last couple of months and now the service is very good. We have also tried several more of their food creations and they are all delicious and nicely presented. They have a special summer menu offering some terrific salads and beverages. Also, their filtered coffee is some of the best in the city, served with a small biscuit drizzled with chocolate on the side! 5 4
Mac and Cheese is super as were the chicken philly and sourdough onion rings! Will come back for sure. 4 5
Service sucked!!! They take your order right away and then disappear. They reappear a year later with the bill in hand. Never checked in on us to see if we needed anything. When flagged down and asked them for something they make it seem like you just asked them for their first born child. Food 5 stars service 2 stars. 3 2
Food and drinks are really good but the servers are terrible and take forever, they don't check on you to see how everything is and if you need anything. The bussers and food runners do all the work. I don't even understand why they have servers they do nothing. I would rather tip the bussers and food runners. 3 2
This place is great! Very delicious food with very great service. Some of the best Indian food I have found in Toronto!! I would do take out though, not a lot of seating and it seems to be where cab drivers hang out. 4 5
I will start off by saying I did enjoy the food here although we were only there for their happy hour special for $3 sliders.The service was good as well, our server was friendly and helpful.  We tried the lamb, duck, chicken and soft shell crab sliders.  The duck wasn't my favorite but still good.  The buns used for the sliders is heavy and gets gummy after the second or third one.  Our cocktails were pretty good as well, mine was wrapped in a brown paper bag, would never ever pay full price for it though.Ok so sounds better than 2 stars right?  I would've given this place 4 stars however here's two things that really annoyed me.1. They charge for tap water...tap water, are you serious? Of course we weren't informed of this until the bill came.  2. It's an open kitchen, nothing wrong with this, however I could see everything.  The cooks were playing with their phones in between preparing the food and NOT washing their hands after.  Unless the phones have been sanitized before their shifts which I'm assuming they weren't, this is super nasty to see.  Also another cook started having a sneezing fit in the kitchen, yes she sneezed into her arm, however blew her nose in the tight kitchen area and again didn't wash her hands. 2 3
Boy this place has gone seriously downhill the past few years. Last time I took my car in for service (Apr-2017), I got it back and one thing was broken. And I was "missing" a personal item as well. Yes I try not to leave anything valuable in the car when I drop off for service. And this item wasn't valuable. But it was mine, and somehow grew legs and walked.Service people giving me the runaround since April about replacing the item that mysteriously broke. And for a ridiculously minor part no less. Wasted more of my time than it's worth and will fix it myself at this point.So it's So-long to Solon BMW for me. Too bad too, they used to be much better. 2 1
Drove all the way from the NW at the recommendation of a friend. Maybe the only Roberto's in town that has Carne Asada Onion Rings. Someone needs to tell the owners they should have that at ALL locations so I dont have to drive so far next time. Came around 3 in the afternoon on Monday and the placed was packed with kids so I ended up taking order to go. Other than that, same great late night eats as other locations! 3 4
Now this is goood stufff it better then any I've had in a long time time.... Good for groups n itss 5starrrrrr 5 4
We had a terrible experience at smelly dog. We take our dog to get groomed regularly. This was our first time trying smelly dog and they completely butchered our dog. We have specific directions for how we would like her to groomed. They said it would not be a problem. When we returned to pick up our dog she was groomed in a completely different manner than we requested. The woman at the front desk said she "didn't think the groomer cut her as we requested." When we asked for the groomer to fix it they refused. I am absolutely disappointed that groomer refused to cut her as we had asked. Not to mention the total cost was 100 dollars. Needless to say this was not a good experience and wouldn't recommend anyone taking their beloved dog there to be groomed. I do have to add that when we contacted management about the grooming the management did refund us out money. And therefore I am change the rating from one star to two stars. 2 1
Been to this store twice. First time was to check out selection. Didn't really find anything too great or worth buying for myself or my 2 daughters. Second time was to sell... Now that was a huge joke!  Had almost new and new high end clothing and shoes and after an hour of waiting they only offered to buy one shirt.. Now the whole time I was waiting I was checking out the clothing they had. I can tell you they had no idea what to buy and sale. Joke..just a joke.. Just go to Ross and sales etc to buy and don't bother to bring in items to sale to them. 1 2
I had tried to come here a few years back but they were closed - the hours of operation are quite short and obviously didn't pay attention to it.My girlfriends and I took a quick trip to Vegas all I can say about this place is WOW!  The food and the service were both fantastic!  We ordered soup to start.  Based on the waiter's recommendation, I had the Tom Kha Kai with prawns which was perfectly balanced sour and hot. I like heat, a lot.  The 6 was plenty hot.  For the main dishes, we ordered the Panang Curry, Pad Ped, and Seafood Drunken Noodles to share.  Oh.  My.  God.  Beautiful presentation, so incredibly flavorful, perfect texture, just the right amount of heat (4), absolutely delicious!  My girlfriends and I couldn't stop talking about how enjoyable the meal was.  I will definitely visit again on my next trip! 4 5
I will start off by saying that I have been to social house more than once and my first visit was excellent and couldn't wait to bring everyone i knew... that was 3 years ago. My second trip was medium to great and my last experience this past Saturday was absolutely horrible. The front desk reservation person was completely off the wall and gave the puppy eyes as if that was going to make the 45 minute late seating after our reservation worth it. Furthermore, she said it would be 5 min, not 45.  the bartender tried to remedy the situation by feeding me alcohol. ONTO THE FOODThe waiter was a super nice guy, understands the business and knows how to deal with people and the feed, sit in Nate's section if you can, he gets it. The manager came by, I tried to explain my disappointment with the host, and he gave me the I'm on top of it, but i could give two bits of crap. The fake smile and talking about how great his restaurant was and how great rolls were .... if you are proud of something and want people to try it... bring them a sample.   cucumber salad was excellent, sushi was medium to okay... kobi salad was great....  curry lobster roll ... that roll keeps them in business in addition to the explosions by treasure island. Michael, the sake sommelier, was very smart and knew his sake... talk to him if you want sake . hamachi with the tempura jalapenos...seemed like a knockoff from nobu ..nonetheless it was tasty.. i ordered a half lobster, it came out TWO TIMES UNDERCOOKED....    so no more social house for me... the manager did nothing to want to keep me there... i feel bad because nate and michael the waiter and sommelier knew their stuff....  impression from management..... we are social house... wait for our half bad food.... reservations are a joke... and we can get leftover tourists who want sushisad .. first time i was dreaming of eating there... its felt like it was a completely different restaurant 1 2
Totally looked up car washes on a whim and this was the closest. Super cheap, super fast which is just what I was looking for. Felt like I got a great deal for the wash at 13.99 plus tip. While I went thru the car wash in the vehicle they then cleaned the inside while I went into pay. Great service and great job 4 5
Fun place to be...esp.during spring training time. If you're into getting autographs it's easy here during spring training. I'm not even that into sports but I'm originally from Ohio and my friend (ohio friend) comes here esp.for spring training (she loves the Cleveland Indians who train here along with the Cincinatti Reds).  The amount of signatures and pics of players we've gotten over the years is amazing.  The games are fun to watch...I just chill and drink a margarita. The whole ball park is so family friendly. They do events. My family enjoys the halloween event. 5 4
Ordered for delivery to work today with a group of folks. I can't speak on the topic of their pizzas, but as for my portion of the order...First, the price quoted for a personal pizza over the phone was higher than stated on the menu on the website. As well, my portion of the order was charged a separate delivery charge from the main order - though it was all delivered together. Second, the garlic bread was burnt, tough, and gross. Even if you were willing to handle the texture and crumbling bread, you could taste burnt garlic, not just burnt bread. We threw it away. Third, the personal pan pizza (cheese with pineapple). I've had better pizza at various fastfood chains that don't claim to be "authentic Chicago pizza". The sauce especially - yuck. As stated in other reviews, extremely greasy and messy. If you want good pizza in Madison, go to Ian's. 1 2
I've get lunch here on a regular basis...so why do I keep going back if I only gave 3 stars? The pizza!! There pizza is one of the best I've had, good toppings, thick chewy crust that is amazing. However, I've tried a few other things from their lunch line but the quality and flavor just isn't there. If you go for lunch, get the pizza! 3 4
The following is a cautionary tale about the PRICE OF CONVENIENCE:I've taken my car here 3 or 4 times, due to fact that they're within walking distance of my apartment. I wish now that I had gone to another place a bit farther off and waited or taken the bus back. Here are some things I noticed:1) They're "those kind" of mechanics who offer services you don't need. I'm not just talking about those kind of mechanics who offer obviously unneeded rack and pinion jobs. After the first visit, they said one of the things I needed was a new air filter. Since this is such an easy DIY thing, I declined it and went and bought an air filter. When I went to change the filter, I discovered the one in the car was white as a ghost and completely see-through. On subsequent visits, they have also recommended this.2) They don't adhere to their own policy of not working on your car without approval from you. On what will be my last visit, I was told that a single tire change (yeah, I know it's dumb to get one tire but my guy became flat and I'm po' okay?!) would cost around $80. Maybe it was dumb to think that meant the total with labor, but ON PAPER I authorized up to a $90 expense, with anything further having to be approved by me, first. This was not done. They put on the tire and then told me it was going to be $117. As for the tire ordeal, there was more insult to the injury; I took the car in on Friday afternoon. Of course I knew I wouldn't be able to have it serviced that day, but left it there and was assured that it would be dealt with first thing. I told them I had to work the next morning as close to 7 as possible, and they said they'd get the tire ordered and put on as quickly as they could. I know it was a Saturday, but the car wasn't ready till about 1. That means it took them almost 6 hours to have somebody drive and get a tire and put it on. Like I said, I know it was a Saturday, but is it really that hard to order a tire from their supplier and have someone go pick it up? Did they even attempt to order the tire on the Friday afternoon? Who knows? 3) Also on my last visit, my ignition key inexplicably got stuck in the trunk when I was showing the tech my busted tire. He said not to worry about it, that they would get it out. Well, their method of doing that was to break it off in the trunk. Probably an honest accident and maybe I have a trunk-opening latch in the car, but they didn't even offer me a measly 2 bucks off to make a copy of the key at a hardware store- just a kind of "yeah, eh, sorry."I guess all I can really say else is that I never felt completely comfortable around these guys. It just feels like one of those big-name shops where you know you're bending over and they're giving it to you good. I'll just recommend Mitch's Econo Lube down the street for those who live near PV, and Larry Harker's Auto Repair for those in the West. 2 1
Just OK. Definitely not Ramen. Noodles are fresh but nothing that makes this place outstanding in Chinatown. 3 4
Upon my husband's and my arrival we were met with a hostess with an attitude.  We could sit outside immediately or wait for 25 min. to be seated inside. Which would have been fine but we asked about the empty table right behind her and she said, "oh, I didn't know it was available and showed us to the patio while we waited 10 min for the empty table inside. Why? it was already ready? After being seated we waited at least 10 min before we were acknowledged at our table.  Finally, we were asked what drinks we would like and that took another 10 min. And, then, my husband asked for bread and olive oil which also took another 10 min and had a "dollop" of olive oil. Our waitress never asked us if we had any questions re: the menu, once we ordered she never came back to ask if we needed anything else or if the food was to our liking.  Food is fresh and tastes good.  The portions are smaller than most restaurants but we did not find that a problem.  We shared the fennel salad, both had a main course, a glass of wine each and our bill was $70! Now that is expensive, especially when the restaurant's service is way below expectations for this chef's restaurant. The food is not worth the price, the service is awful and there too many other options in the valley to choose from. We won't be back and will not recommend it to anyone. 3 1
I Really like this place because it's small, usually not too busy other than occasional weekends and it's so refreshing to have a small farm in the middle of the city. Well worth visiting. Across the street is the necropolis cemetery which is also an arboretum and very pleasant to walk around and look at the old gravestones. We saw a fox walking around on one occasion! 5 4
Yay! I'm glad I finally made it here.  I have been Facebook friends for a while, I really want to take comedy classes or join the improv group or both.  I was there last night. A three star rating is "a-ok" and that's ok. There is plenty of room for improvement, and I'm sure we'll get there eventually.  I remember when this joint was Anderson's 5th Estate! I only realized it was the same location when I parked. This information has nothing to do with review.  I just thought I'd throw some stupid detail in.  It was, actually, kinda cool because I knew where the restrooms were and the layout of the place hasn't changed much - so my anxious self knows where all the fire exits are.I liked the guy who greeted the incoming crowd. Very friendly and just straight up cool. The bar area was so crowded, I would've shut it down if I was a fire Marshall.  But this was all pre-show. We were free to loiter on the patio, roam the parking lot etc. no problem. I need elbow room and I will find it!!  The seating system made sense.  (I went to the 9:30 Lynne Koplitz show, btw, management)  I liked that.My poor little waitress should've had a little back up!  See, I'm not going to bitch about having to wait while she attended the party of 12+ seated next to me. She was overwhelmed and probably over worked. I just had the feeling that the club owners haven't exactly nailed down this detail yet.  What I would have done was assign one person to handle the large party, and another to take care of the overflow in her particular section.  I understand the purpose of a 2 item minimum, but really, by the time my server acknowledged me, I was going to contest it.  I am not that bitchy, but I was about to bitch off.  Yeah. That part could use a lil work.  The show was great. I will go again! I like the acts that they sign. It's a legit comedy scene. Great calendar, and I love open mic. So I will attend again, and I'm sure my rating will improve. The 3 star is my first impression. Xoxo 3 5
So I do check Yelp from time to time, and I made an account today for this place. Just wanted to respond to people saying the ice cream was fake/didn't melt/tasted like "whip" cream.. I had it today, enjoyed it, and yes it did melt and it is only February folks. Saw it was family owned, and the workers there were super nice and very friendly with my daughter, so I just wanted to throw a positive review to counteract the weirdly negative ones.Ice cream was good. There was nothing weird about it. Employees were great. Didn't try the food but I had the Old Fashioned Cherry Amaretto, daughter had a dipped cone, and wife had Butter Pecan (all for about $7). The place is not new (in fact, I remembered having been there when it was a DQ as a kid.. 20 years ago. The windows curve over the last row of tables and it jogged my memory), so I do think a little effort into the atmosphere could help. The best Ice Cream I have ever had was Greater's in KY, so no it wasn't that. But this place is a solid ice cream parlor to take the family. 4 3
At first it was a rocky go but once all the kinks worked out we LOVE the community! The property is nice. The apartments are spacious and luxury. The staff is friendly. The amminities are what we wanted. We couldn't ask for more. The maintance crew is awesome. The parking is a serious problem. They need to designate bike parking. There is also no parking for visitors and ppl who don't live her park in others spaces. I'm really upset that there are a very tenants that continue to park in the handicap parking or where ever they please and the office doesn't do anything. Been trying to get a garage and the staff still hasn't got back to us after months! 3 4
I really want to give a higher rating because the food is great, but I've had my Just Eat delivery order cancelled by them twice. It really sucks when you're starving and stuck at work and you find out the burrito you ordered isn't coming. Yesterday I was willing to pay over $18 (including delivery fee, HST, and tip) just for one burrito. I was that desperate for a meal at work that wasn't pizza. But alas, no burrito for me. Why be on Just Eat at all if you're just going to cancel the orders? 3 2
I've been to the Location on the strip at the former Imperial Palace now called the Linq, and was excited that new location opened up around my area. The food was amazing as per usual, BUT The service was terrible! It looked like they only had one server covering six tables which is tough and I get it but you gotta keep your cool. The waitress comes up to us and asks us if we are ready to order and we we told her no since we were waiting for our third person to show up and she yells THANK GOD, and walks away to oversee her other tables. I'm like I get you're all by yourself and busy but lady keep your feelings to yourself and check it at the door. The entire experience was annoying she later on rushed us to get our orders and our third person showed up and was rushing her to get her order. To the point she drops off our food and not even 10 minutes later she drops off the check! We open to check out our total and put the check book down to continue eating, it felt like a minute later she comes to our table and opens our checkbook to see if we put our form of payment like I'm like excuse me ? And she just walks away. In the end I love the food which is why I'm giving this place 3 stars, but management really needs to evaluate how their servers act and retrain them on how to offer customer service. 3 2
Went to Joyride again tonight. Had the chicken burrito. ***AMAZING** That is one fine burrito. My wife and I each ordered a margarita. OOPS!!! Delicious, YES, but small and $9.00 each. NOT WORTH IT AT ALL!!!!! I will not order that again. WOW!~!! This is a 4.75 - 5.00 drink and it is really good but MASSIVE OVERPRICE. The service was excellent again. Definitely go to this place but, watch those drink prices. WHEW!!!! 4 3
Pho Hung has been going downhill in their food/service, so I've been searching for a replacement pho place. (I felt like a cheater for walking in...)I really don't understand the low ratings for Pho Orchid. I had great service and great food. The pho was nice and hot when it arrived and the beansprouts were fresh. The soup was definitely more flavorful than the watered down stuff Pho Hung's been serving. I didn't think the meat was microwaved or old like others did. Springrolls were crispy and perfectly cooked, but I wish they gave me more sauce. They had orange slices in the water (which was a little strange), but it was a hot day so I didn't mind. The food came quickly (under 10 minutes) and the waiter got me extra limes when I requested it. He came back to check on me once and got my my bill when I needed it. Pricing is similar to other pho places, but more expensive than Pho Hung. I don't mind though; enen the small is a huge portion.Sure, this place is in the basement and the windows face the street, but it is definitely not a dump. Everything at least feels clean and the atmosphere is nice (didn't smell a whiff of cigarette smoke) They have their namesake orchids all around too. I've been here twice now and I enjoyed it both times. It's not the best pho ever, but it does a good job. 4 3
Eh, what can I say? I had the pesto chicken fettuccine and my company had gotten the lasagna. I did not get to try the lasagna because it had sausage in it and I don't eat pork. They said that they would give it 2 stars. However for my dish I would give the same, it was pretty bland. They had no salt and pepper at the table so I couldn't have fixed it. I took it to-go to fix it later. I also got the cannoli, I've had better. They added like cinnamon to their cream, not like what I'm used to in Little Italy in Boston, MA. 3 2
I love this place! Whenever I can convince someone to get up early and eat some awesome biscuits and gravy, it is the best day ever! Seriously, I recommend the biscuits and gravy... plus the atmosphere is pretty neat. Kinda reminds me of a Grandma who hordes country decor lol.... they have great food though. 5 4
Honestly was expecting so much more for an Asian place. I ordered noodles and my meal came with both rice and noodles... I don't like rice so there's that. On top of that, noodles were barely flavored and tasted just like regular noodles you'd use to make spaghetti. I was very disappointed. Overpriced too. $8+. Not worth it. 1 2
Outstanding selection of beers including some local IPA and Double IPA that I strongly recommend if you like high hops and IPAs.  Dawren and the other barkeeps can draw them off for you.  Have eaten meals there many times and the food is always good as well.Have visited there many times over 12 years of annual trips and it's always a good visit. 4 5
We came here for my mom's 80th bday  It was our first time there. Reservations were made for 10 and we were seated promptly at 7pm on a sunday night. The restaurant was somewhat quiet but we weren't complaining since most restaurants are usually too noisy.We ordered a lot of food. Everyone ordered a plate for themselves and also lots of rolls and sashimi to share. The rolls were amazing and also hugh. One of our guests has never eaten sashimi before and she loved it ( she couldn't believe raw fish can taste so good and not fishy at all). The price was not the cheap but the food and service were very good. Our 20 something kids enjoyed it so much that they went back there a week after for more and introduced a friend to this place.We will definitely come back. 5 4
What is it about high-end restaurants these days-- they crank up the music so doggone loud that you cannot hear the person next to you talk, let alone hear yourself think!!!  I had looked forward to my meal here, but honestly, the very good food was overshadowed by the busy-ness of the restaurant and the too-loud rock music blasting away throughout the place.  Honestly-- I love music, I love rock music, and I enjoy ambiance with music-- but this was just insane.  Never again.  Where do you go these days to have a nice meal in peace and quiet, to have a little intimacy, to have just a conversation with the person next to you without shouting so much that you have a sore or froggy throat the next day? 2 3
This place is really great if you've never eaten at an authentic taqueria.I should have walked out when the unenthused, high-school aged employee didn't know what pastor was and stated they didn't have any. Unfortunately for me, I referred him to the list of meats on the menu. The meat was pretty bland and not even texturally like you'd find in an authentic taqueria. The second sign that I should have just walked out was the price, $6.50 for two tacos. Taqueria tacos are supposed to be simple and cheap, $1.00-$2.50 /taco. The third sign was when the employee asked what kind of rice I wanted on my tacos.Taqueria tacos are traditionally served with only meat, onions, cilantro, and salsa. Despite these warnings, I went through with my purchase, and now I'm writing this review. So to make a long story short, if you want authentic taqueria style tacos, you'll have to look elsewhere. However, if you like subpar customer service with food to match, give this place a shot. 1 2
I've spent almost 2 years here and just wanted to give a solid review before I move to another state. I think this is one of the best apartment complexes in the Vegas area. The property is attractive and immaculate. Apartments are modern. It's all set on a golf course with views of the strip. Within 3 minutes you can be to Whole Foods, Starbucks, banks or the Freeway. You can get to strip in a good day in about 10 mins. The one and only downside is you can hear your neighbors pipes and stuff, but isn't that every apartment. Yes, your rent might go up after your lease, but again, that's typical. 5 4
I love this place! I go here for breakfast 3 times a week and I'm never disappointed. Get their breakfast sandwhich with a latte to go ..yum!!! Cute family business with a friendly atmosphere. Even though they are always busy, their service is very fast.  I don't know about the review on 11/29 but the bagels are always fresh and out of the oven when i come. Their cream cheese is home made and delicious!! Definitely a 5 star restaurant. 5 4
Until recently I thought I had found the best cheese curds in town--now that I've tried Tipsy Cow's, I know I have found them! Decent to above average beer selection and friendly staff make this a great place to check out on The Square. 4 5
Just joined this gym a week ago...not impressed at all. The one in Scottsdale seemed to be ran a lot better when I was going to that one. I've come here every day, the spray bottles to wipe the machines and weights have been missing twice, this is unacceptable. I don't pay a fee to come use a machine covered in someone else's sweat. I can understand if a bottle needs to be refilled but to have NO way to clean the machines is unprofessional. I know I would never recommend this gym to anyone else.  I cannot wait until I move...I hope the Walnut Creek location is better than this Tempe one!! They got a star for being open and another for air conditioning. Not much else here. 2 1
My wedding, the BIG day that I have waited 33 years to say YES to.  My soon to be sister in law introduced me to Kaira's as she had bought her dress here - she raved about it and on first visit we were thrilled!  I found my dress, the price was right and I was a happy bride.The owner was polite and helped me with everything on my first visit, she let me know my dress could be "rushed" to come in three months from then and told me the day to call to follow up.  When I called on them on the designated day I was informed my dress was slated to come in AFTER my wedding and to their credit it was an error and was resolved verbally about 48 hours later.My fitting was a disaster - when I originally tried on the dress I had requested changes be made with the owner (a new sleeve) and she informed me it was "no problem" only when it came time to make the changes it was a problem - the sleeve was never ordered and it was apparently my fault.  After being told it was "very expensive" by the owner (again) it was resolved when I told her plainly that this was what I wanted, spare no expense and let's make it happen.Today I went to pick up my dress - I was so happy! The seamstress who did the alterations is FANTASTIC!  I was simply delighted.  After thinking my balance was pain in full (over $1300 which was reasonable in my mind) an associate asked me if I had PURCHASED a garment bag to take the dress home in!  As a former pageant girl this was so obnoxious that they would not include a $10 bag with a $1300 dress?  Even better - if there is an extra charge let your bride know in the beginning - after all was said and done I ran my credit card THREE TIMES!The resolve I have is that I have my wedding dress, it is splendid although I would save myself the headache and NEVER shop there again. 2 5
ordered dry yellow noodles w/ BBQ pork and it turned out to be pretty good, just that the sauce was a bit on the salty side otherwise it would be perfect (came with a side of soup which was nice). noodles were perfectly cooked with a good amount of crunchiness and they also gave a handful of it so it really was worth the money!also decided to try the sour sop (some tropical fruit) milkshake and it was sooo good! the flavour of the fruit was a sweet/sour taste soo it was pretty interesting. they just needed to put less ice in it next time because i couldn't drink it through a straw and instead had to use a pho spoon to scoop it out of the cup haha. 3 4
Just okay. Fish and chips...fish was a big soggy.  Same as always happens for me: I ordered a beer (Guiness Blonde) from their very limited menu (to what I'm accustomed to at the Flying Saucer in Columbia, SC)...only to find that they were out of it.  Same thing happened in the TK Charlotte with regular Guiness.  Really?!?Nice, big TVs all over the place, but not a one in sight with the big CBS game-Georgia/Florida. Disappointing. Went back to my hotel room to watch football, instead. 3 2
I have shopped here since 1998 when I got back into keeping tropical fish in a live plant environment. after a few year's off.I like that incoming livestock are kept in quarantine after arriving, that I can ask to be told when a particular species becomes available, that the staff are so knowledgeable and enjoy discussing the hobby, even though I notice some impatient shoppers just wanting to grab and go. Reminds me of the now closed Pirrhana on Avenue Road that was run by a hobbyist, or Fintastic in the east end run by Mike.Harold the head guy has saved a couple ailing fish with clear advice.Just in case this seems too high a rating, keep in mind that I have seen a lot of fish shops since I began the hobby sixty years ago.And plant and fish prices seem as fair as elsewhere. 5 3
Excellent view on the observation deck.  Had a great time, don't miss it. 5 4
This place is great and has surprisingly great cookies, too. Big portions and good flavor. 5 4
I highly do no recommend this place. I am sure the doctor is great but the prices were out of control. I was quoted close to $500 for a new set of lenses on one pair of glasses. She made up some bogus remark that the mounting position made it more expensive. I went down the street to Las Vegas Optometry Care and paid $475 for the same lenses and a brand new pair of sunglasses with prescription. Erika definitely had a better selection but the price was ridiculous. 1 2
I wasn't planning on posting a review for my visit to Heart Sushi cause I just wanted to chill out and not take pictures of every plate or pay close attention to everything. However, I'm posting entirely for the poor service we received from one particular waitress who waited on us during our entire visit. Extremely pushy and trying to get us to leave even though we were at least 45 minutes before closing time to prepare for dinner. Her attitude toward us was noticeable and unnecessary. When she brought our items out, she would place them on the table in front of her and slide them towards us. When it came time for dessert, we almost got thrown off of ordering anything because as we gave her our ice cream order, she would repeat them back in a rude tone and one of my friends asked for three scoops of mango ice cream and she said in a loud voice, "THREE?!?"  Finally, when she brought out our desserts she said something along the lines of, "that's everything you ordered, you don't have anything else on the iPad to order so you're all done."....lol I mean it was just rude. Sad to say I left very annoyed but what can ya do. Otherwise the food was fine, sushi quality was better than some but not as good as others so it was mediocre. 3 2
I'll give it a 3 of a 5 because they are always out of sizes and store is a mess , hard to find stuff, we love old navy but have to do most my shopping online to find stuff 3 2
The Salty Senorita is one of those places that's "not the worst, not the best." I've only eaten here when I've had family visiting, as the location is pretty convenient.This restaurant seems like it would be a lot better if they didn't have such a high volume of customers. I can never tell if they're going for piss drunk college kid-or fancy white pants Scottsdale. Maybe they're going for "I barfed up Jager on my $800 tuxedo." Who knows.Their menu is great, the concepts are great, but the execution is always sloppy, bland, and never quite hits the mark.And you can totally tell that they only hire based on looks because their staff is a joke. Literally some of the worst servers I've ever encountered. Like bloody hell get your act together people, this is your job not your spring break. 2 1
I sure miss this Boba experience! Every trip to Vegas finds me here. Their large is perfect! The Boba is perfect. Their honey milk tea is just the right sweetness! 4 5
Thanks to the brutal hangovers I experience several times a month, knowing where to get decent pho is absolutely critical.  It's the only thing that can ease my abused digestive and nervous systems into a state of complacency.  I did not get decent pho here.  In fact, it's the first pho I've ever eaten that made my hangover worse.  Maybe I just got a bad batch.  I don't know.  My bowl was awful.  The broth tasted of nothing but salt.  The subtle flavors of meat and spice that my body craved simply were not there.  I tried to enhance the flavor profile with the usual panel of hot sauces, to no avail.  The meat was alright, if a little tough.  The veggies were pitiful.  Half the leaves on the mint were grayish brown and wilted, and the bean sprouts were slimy.It all made for a bad brew.  I ate all the meat out of it, and that was about it.  I usually drink the broth like it's the elixir of life, but not this time.  I may as well have been sipping on hot brine.  I couldn't even eat the noodles, as they had been steeped in the brackish concoction.The pho left me excessively parched for hours, exacerbating my hangover, and did little to help my stomach ache.  I won't be back.  Which is a shame, because the bahn mi looked great.  At any rate, the food is cheap, and the service is lackadaisical, as is traditional for family-run Asian eateries.  I wouldn't go for the pho, but the bahn mi might be worth a try.One should note that they close somewhat early at 9pm. 1 2
Not the friendliest service.. I placed my order and the man held out his hand for money. Didn't bother to tell me my total until I asked. Chicken biryani is mostly fat. Samosas nothing special. For 2 samosas and a small biryani to go was just a some change under 20 dollars. Ridiculous. 2 1
The 2-storey brick building was very nice, complete with chandeliers. I stopped here before heading to the Cuyahoga trail, which is just down the hill. The food was hot and good. Staff was very friendly and I didn't have to wait long for the food. My only complaint is that the pop machines are behind the counter so it's annoying to have to ask for a refill. I'm from out of state, so perhaps this is normal in Ohio McDonald's. 4 3
I agree with all the 1 and 2 star reviews. This particular location just does not care about customers. I have had more than one bad experience and will not be back to this location. 1 2
Since i moved in here near the boca park area, this is the closest pet store that i could get my dog's food. As a dog lover myself, it breaks my heart that everytime i go there, those poor puppies looks sad and sickly, they are stepping on their own poop and seems skin and bones hiding on their fur. I tried not to look and just grab the food/stuff i wanted (which is kinda overpriced!), pay at the counter and leave as soon as possible. The staffs there, which consists mostly bunch of teenagers who have no idea what their doing rather than to asked a generic question "what kind of dog do you have?". They handle the pups poorly and one of them almost dropped the yorkie. Its just so sad that theyre very much engaged in gossiping and chitchatting (and theyre not even shy to tone it down even just a bit). 2 1
After seeing this reviewed in so many other places I am surprised that it hasn't been written up on yelp yet.After reading so many of those great reviews I am thoroughly disappointed in the food and service that my family and I received at the Hartwood Restaurant. We ate lunch on a Saturday afternoon in October. The place was not that busy and we were promptly seated. I don't know if it was because of all the dust in the air and on the bookshelves around us but my husband immediately began having an allergic reaction to something. After a few minutes the worst of it subsided but his eyes remained quite red and watery for the remainder of the meal.We all ordered our meals and drinks at the same time. I ordered a Pepsi and as soon as I took a drink had to spit it out. The syrup in the machine must have been low and it tasted like bland carbonated water. I asked the waitress to get me a new one and she looked at me like I was crazy but went and got one anyways. She must have got it from the same machine though and the second one was just as bad. Figuring that since a decent glass of Pepsi was too much to ask I wasn't expecting much from the meal.I ordered an Angus Cheeseburger and fries. My husband ordered the Beer Battered Fish Sandwich and Chips. My burger was so greasy I couldn't stomach eating more than a few bites and my fries were both burnt and cold. My husband said he would trade me so he gave me his fish and it was flavorless and also too greasy to eat.Since I don't live in the area The Hartwood Restaurant is not someplace I will be frequenting and if I visit the area again it is definitely not on my short list of places to eat. Pittsburgh has so many other fine dining restaurants I am sure there are much better places out there. 2 1
Pretty much perfect. Unless you want low carb or gluten free. Great food, great service, great atmosphere. Also perfect for mothers day! Ask someone in the hotel for directions if you get lost. 5 4
With $1.00 Icees (cherry, coke or mixed) and .50 cent vanilla ice cream cones, this is a great place to treat children to something "special."  The indoor play area is clean and never crowded.  BK also offers veggie burgers but make sure to ask them to hold the mayo if you do not want your sandwich swimming in it. 3 4
Good BBQ. OK but not great. Staff is friendly and fun. Atmosphere is always good. The food is real BBQ not the normal boiled and oven cooked fare. I always can go to a Famous Dave's and know I will get good BBQ at fair prices and sides are always good. I have had 5 star BBQ around the county but when a chain tries to make great BBQ they always seem to fall just short. You will get your moneys worth and have a great meal. 4 3
Busy holiday weekend, but all the staff from the ticket counter, concessions, and rest room attendants we really nice. Smiling without a hint of annoyance due to working on a holiday weekend with heavy traffic. It would have been a 3 due to smelly restroom but before I left, they were already on it. Service counts a lot.Seats were comfortable with good leg room. 4 3
*amazing customer service, staff were very friendly and welcoming *huge portions, great flavors, affordable prices *order the beef rice bowl! *would definitely recommend :) 4 5
Made the mistake of eating breakfast out on a Saturday. Morning....quite a long wait in the heat. Quite a small table for 2, crammed in. OJ was fresh squeezed as promised, was 20 more minutes before our pancakes and eggs arrived, nothing out of the ordinary, coffees ok. Have had better elsewhere. 3 2
My mom went as part of a deal: $30 for wash, cut, style, head and shoulder massage, and a winter hand moisturizing treatment.  There was NO shoulder massage and the head massage was a token 1 minute patting of her scalp.  The moisturizing treatment consisted of a masque applied to the hands and wrapped in plastic. When my mom arrived for her early morning appointment, the stylists from the night before hadn't swept up.  The stylist was nice and they had a good chat, and my mom thought the hair cut was fine.  Still, she won't be back and will likely go back to her regular stylist. 2 3
I arrived to the spa 30 minutes prior to my appointment as requested.  I was told I had missed my appointment.  I had called a week prior to have the appointment time moved; clearly a mistake had been made by the staff member I spoke with.  I was offered an appointment three hours later.  I felt as though I was being inconvenienced because of a mistake they had made.  I explained that the available appointment did not work for my schedule(or for my friend whose appointment HAD been set appropriately).  The staff member was not proactive with further suggestions(think ::awkward silence::), so I politely asked for a manager.  I provided a solution(allow me to use the spa amenities while my friend received her service, reschedule my service for another day).  Upon entry, I noticed the spa is quite small.  There is minimal seating(7 chairs throughout, we had to sit on the locker room benches part of the time).  The massage rooms are located off a hallway in the center of the spa(clearly a design flaw as the noise of flip-flops shuffling down the hall throughout your massage cannot be relaxing)...the same hallway that every visitor must walk through to get from point A(lockers, vanities, lounge) to point B(steam room, sauna, hot tub).  There are only two showers, both of which had clumps of hair and used razors in them on each of my visits.  Clearly, with only two, they need to be cleaned more frequently.  The staff, while hospitable overall, were too talkative for what is to be a relaxing environment.  As someone who frequents spas(of equal pricing), I have experienced much better.  I now understand why this spa was featured for a $60 for $120 Groupon offer.  While my facial itself was satisfactory(though the room light should not have remained on throughout it), this is really a "starter" spa. 2 3
Poor customer service by our waitress named "Natalie" ruined our first time here. We ordered a few glasses of wine and a couple of appetizers. None of which were worth the price we paid. (wings + lobster dip) Took forever to even get to order which I didn't quite understand seeing as it was not a busy night and there were only a few other tables occupied. Upon ordering an appetizer I went back less than 3 MINUTUES after asking if I could change the order due to allergies at which point Natalie bluntly said "no the order has already been put through to the kitchen". I should have requested to speak w/ a manager about her attitude but this yelp review will have to do instead.  Will definitely NOT be returning to this restaurant. 2 1
Although the pizza was good, the owner had terrible customer relation skills.  We grew up on Theresa's pizza and we were looking forward to enjoying it for a family get-to-gether.  We enjoyed 3 large pizzas.  As 1 family member finished her last piece, she pulled a long blond hair from between the sauce and cheese.  Since there was a large group, she did not want to make a big deal out of it. She simply stopped eating. I was sitting next to her and I told her we called the next day.  We spoke with a manager who said nothing but that she would have the owner call us.  When the owner called us, we explained and he gave no response.  I waited, still no response.  Finally I asked him if he heard me.  He said yes.  Finally, I asked him if he would remove the cost of the 1 pizza as it was obviously a bit gross. He said he didn't understand the whole situation. I explained again.  He was speechless.  We were expecting, "We are sorry for your experience, but we appreciate your business."  We thought we would hear, "Thank you for being loyal customers,"  He could have given us credit for 1 pizza or offered another pizza for another time or a 1/2 off coupon.....nothing.  We had even told him we enjoyed the pizza, however, I think most people would agree that pulling out a 12 inch strand of hair from between the sauce and cheese, is a bit disgusting.  The funny think is, we are reasonable people and understand things like a hair in food may happen, but no apology, no simple discount off a future order (I had told him my parents eat their almost weekly. Is unacceptable. 3 1
TERRIBLE SCHEDULERS - The doctors here are warm, welcoming, and knowledgeable. We love going to them. However, the scheduling ladies are rarely able to accommodate requests for appointments (even serious ones!), and are VERY RUDE in the process. The last two times I called to request appointments, the scheduler couldn't get us in for two weeks and refused to make the second appointment at all, respectively. For a child that sees the doctor one or twice a year, that seems a little ridiculous. Even their 'help hotline' respondent was extremely rude and refused to help, only sent us to the hospital- for an ear infection- and then lied saying there were no Saturday appointments! This place is great, but management should really reevaluate who is representing them on the phone and know about how they are refusing business. They have definitely lost ours. 2 1
I'm not really a fan of BMV.  The staff are not helpful AT ALL and I find it peculiar that they have all these books that are supposedly "used" but in fact look brand new.   Remember the guy who had all the bikes for super dirt cheap and they turned out to be stolen goods?  I'm just saying that when something is too good to be true, someone is paying for it.  Also, they only take cash which is inconvenient. 2 1
Definetely my favorite place to eat when I'm low on cash. This place is a wrestler dream. They make any pizza you desire and all you have to do is ask. For a 7 dollar buffet it's definetely your best bet for cheap! 4 5
Food: 4/5Service: 3/5Cleanliness: 3.5/5Price: $$I have a confession to make. I love cake. During my undergrad days, I ate a slice of cake a day. It was my food that allowed me to destress and its delicious taste in my mouth was so addicting. I can proudly admit that I was a regular at Future Bistro over the 5 years I was in Toronto because I was one of those who got their card stamped for every slice of cake that was ordered.My ultimate favourite cake is the Red velvet, but here at Future Bistro, I tend to gravitate towards cakes that I had never tried before. It's better if you go with a few friends or as a group, then you can try many different cakes at once. :P The service at the bistro seems like it can be a little improved; it does get quite busy during peak hours and many things are self serve (cutlery for example).The bistro offers over a dozen different kinds of cakes for you to choose from, not including its pies and other baked goods. I haven't heard one complain about how bad a cake tasted here so I think it's quite safe to go out of your comfort zone and try one that you had never tried before. I tend to gravitate towards cakes that have caramel in them while I'm here.The Super Caramel Crunch is my ultimate favourite at Future Bistro. It is layers of caramel and whipped cream which I absolutely love. Some might think it's a tad bit too sweet, but I beg to differ. It's the perfect amount of sweetness for me and I can (sometimes) finish this thing before you get to take a bite. It's quite light and fluffy compared to other denser cakes, so if you're a bit too full from that dinner you just had or want something less filling, this might be a good choice.If you go to U of T, chances are you have probably walked past this bistro many times. The bistro opens their windows for the summer and has a great patio outside for you to enjoy. Not only do they serve great desserts, the bistro has great tapas and drinks to share with your friends as well! It really is a great place to end your night whether you get something sweet or savoury (or both). I would highly recommend you to visit if you love cake like me or want to end your night at a nice bistro with lots of locals! 4 5
I generally like Majerle's.  I've used the Cotton Room for my birthday celebration a couple of times.   Food is good, it's a good central location and its convenient when we go downtown for a game, D'Backs, Suns or Mercury or shows.   Very disappointed in the service/attitude of the staff tonight.  We were seated in the back section,  we were the second group to be seated back there.  Several other groups came in and were waited on much faster.  Groups that came in after us, had drinks and food before we got drinks.  The groups were leaving when we finally got our food.   NOT happy with today's service and the fact we sat there for sometime without service.  Food was good, no problems with that, I think the waitress was inexperienced or just lazy. 3 2
I give it a 3 1/2, really. We arrived at 10:30 am, taking the advice that the Monarch would be quieter early in the day. The young lady behind the counter greeted us as soon as we walked in, making us feel comfortable in what was definitely a bar setting. She was very generous in suggesting that, even with our Indie Coffee Passports, we could order whatever we liked from their espresso menu. I'm a big fan of soy lattes but was gently steered toward the 'regular' milk version [I was offered 1% or 2% - a nice touch]. My latte was presented in a large cup, the foam poured to create a swirled heart. It proved to be smooth and mild, foamy and thick, easy to drink.  My Passport companion found a comfy looking upholstered sofa, perhaps a bit too comfy, almost touching the ground when sat upon; so we settled in at a table and pulled up a few chairs for our coats and such.  Since there was only one other patron at the time, we didn't think anyone would mind.The crystal chandeliers hanging over the counter were a nice counterpoint to the dark wood benches, tables and chairs, with a big screen centred at the back of the room and eclectic art on the walls. We stayed long enough for the lunch crowd to start filling up the space, groups of two and more at tables, a few people at the bar. Since we'd spent an hour and a half sipping our lattes and basically having the place to ourselves, we bundled up our gear and headed out.  All in all it was an unexpectedly mellow experience and I enjoyed it. 3 4
The food was pretty tasty but what makes this a five star for me is that the staff were also very personalable. The stuffed pepper was oh so good. We got our food to go and had a picnic at the beach (forgot utensils but had napkins) and it was simply a really good experience. 5 3
starts and ends with terribly bad service; food is mediocre at best and not served hot; food tastes terrible and certainly not Indian in taste; would never visit again. 2 1
The GVR has clean rooms but can use some dusting as with many other parts of the hotel and casino. Definitely need to change their pool hours! Its summer and pools should at least be open till 10:30pm for god sakes it is hot out! Had dinner at the grand cafe.......its basically a Denny's potato was not cook and steak was over done beef jerky. Lucky they did have a fat burger in there that was awesome. The employees canuse a good six months of intense customer service. The casino I would not waste a dime here payouts are scarce. 2 3
We Used a coupon deal they had. They only gave us one garlic breadstick,which was just half of a hoagie bun and no marinate with it. The garlic white sauce was nonexistent on the pizza. The picture showed lots of tomatoes and broccoli on the pizza but each slice had one sliver of tomato and only broccoli stems. Won't eat here again 1 2
Disclaimer: a vegan's viewI often don't bother reviewing restaurants with poor vegan choices, but feel compelled to here because this one couldn't even get me a salad that was sufficient.I thought I'd get pizza with no cheese. Their pizza dough has egg in it.Ok, salad. ALL of their dressings except for one also has egg whites in them. That's odd, but whatever. So I get the chopped vegetable salad with the one dressing they can offer. The salad was mediocre and meager in portion size. So after lunch here I had to go find something to eat. 1 2
Pretty brutal place. Not sure where the positive reviews are coming from. My beef shawarma sandwich was awful. I saw someone mention how cold their sandwich was which was the same case for me. The meat was very gross did not taste good at all. It was cheap I will give it that but I would def not recommend. I guess my search for great shawarma in the annex continues... 2 1
There were so many people and the line was long so we decided to do take out. The food was good and very filling. The only downside is that it only accepts cash and if you don't have Canadian dollar and want to pay with US dollar, they do almost 1:1. The food was $28 Canadian dollar and the lady at the cashier asked me to pay $26 US dollar.(which is $32 Canadian dollar) 4 2
I have been a member at LVAC for almost 5 years and have visited almost every location. But the North Decatur gym is by far the best. Friendly staff, state of the art equipment, and everything is always very clean. Unfortunately it is one of the higher volume locations, so parking is difficult at certain times. But all around, it is a spectacular gym! 4 5
Wicked spoon always has a great selection. Bone marrow with kimchi for dinner is a must. Also if you want a nice dessert bar this is the place to be for dinner. Get there early because there might be a long line. But it should not disappoint 5 4
So a good friend and myself decided to eat out today while on break from class. I remember her telling me once that she had never eaten at a Panda before so I recommended we eat at the one near campus. She agreed. I had anticipated that there would be 1 or 2 people in front of us ordering their food.Was I right?NoThis restaurant was dead. Absolutely dead, no one except those working there was there. I gave it a 4 because of that. Overall, as always I love the food. But being today was a religious holiday I couldn't eat certain foods. that was the only down side but nothing that would bring me down or stop me from eating panda. 4 3
The Nutella crepe with bananas and strawberries was great!  My husband got the bagel sandwich with egg and cheese.  I was a little disappointed in the lack of vegetarian options if you weren't in the mood for something sweet.  They had tons of combo options that looked delicious but not a single one was veggie - boo. We enjoyed our breakfast. 5 4
I was dragged here by my friend, considering the fact that I don't even eat meat, I almost dreaded going but she did say that they had the best shakes so I'm always down for that. So we get there, we have the nicest waiter, Sam, place us inside. The interior is neat. We order shakes and he tells us, there is no ice cream....um ok. So I order lemonade, then he tells us there is no lemonade. UMMM... Ya. I ended up getting a cream soda and a pretzel and the Belgian fries with Sriacha. Delicious!! I will probably come back because I am still curious about these shakes :) 3 4
I meant to leave a review the last time I ate here this place is truly AWESOME!!! I had a great experience and the food I ate was tasty and there was a great variety. Best Buffett I have eaten at in a long time. Highly recommend!!! 4 5
I was expecting more from the Sharp Edge. I wasn't pleased with the pomme frites at all because they were just regular french fries and weren't good ones at that. The Margherita pizza was subpar. I did like my beer sampler and the salad was ok. The server couldn't remember our order and which beers were which in the sampler rack, so we had to guess, and she wasn't new. I wouldn't recommend coming here to eat. 2 3
The owner is v.friendly. Taste of food average. We took chicken shawrma platter. Portion of chicken was too small in it & owner forgot to add pita. So the point is check your order if you want to take away. 3 2
Writing this review as I'm eating this for lunch and well, I'm highly disappointed. This was my first time trying dirt belly and it looked quite appealing to me as I walked by it so I decided to give it a shot. I ordered two salads, chicken, and one of those 'energy balls'. The salads are mediocre (I feel like Sunterra's are better) and the chicken is just disgusting! I don't really know how its cooked but it has absolutely no flavour and an odd texture. Would not go here again, not to mention that my total was $16! 2 1
This place is too good.there was lots of buffet and different type of food .food is soo tasty.prepration is soo good specially chicken tikka ,saag and dal makhni was too good .if anyone try to eat indian food I suggested this place .service was good it's very good Resturant 5 4
I've been to Meatheads twice since they opened. The first time I had their basic 1/3 lb cheeseburger with all the trimmings ("grilled" onion, lettuce, tomato, mayo, ketchup, and pickles). I also shared a mocha shake. The food arrived fast and the burger was great, except I was certain they made a mistake since the onion on my burger was raw (still crunchy and spicy). Still a good, but greasy burger. The shake was the real star; it tasted like it was made with fresh coffee.My second visit I got the same with the addition of fries. The total was about $12, so it's not the cheapest burger joint in town. Biting into my burger I got the same raw onion taste. So, it seems to me they heat the onions on the grill, but don't actually grill them; it was still white. The second go at the mocha shake was just as good as the first with an intense coffee flavor. The small order of fries was huge, and probably more than I should have eaten.As others have said, parking is a mess. The restaurant probably has twice as many tables as parking spaces. 4 3
Ok so I'd like to start out saying I've been to Top Golf a few times and have always had a good time hitting balls and hanging out with friends. The food is pretty good and I've always had good experiences with the host staff.....that was until my friend's 40th bday party on Dec 4th. There was a large group of us (4 bays worth plus some that did not hit any balls). My friend paid a pretty penny for this party with food and drinks included for everyone. The party was booked for 2 hours. 40 minutes before our time was up the staff started clearing away everything, including the drink tokens (again...prepaid) and food. We asked for to go boxes for the left over food and were told no, they don't give to go boxes (hello...already paid for food AND they do have to go boxes because I've taken my leftovers home from there before) due to "health codes". When asked to let us use the drink tokens, we were told that they called "last call". Along comes the "manager" gal who listens to the complaints and then promptly begins arguing with my friend stating that "her staff is VERY well trained and asked everyone if they wanted to use the tokens (last call)" This was a complete lie...not one person in our large party was told it was last call (again, 40 minutes before our time was up). I've never heard anyone argue with a customer the way she did. My friend was being very calm and asked her why they didn't come directly to her and inform her that there were tokens left so she could tell everyone. The manager just kept insisting that her staff asked everyone. Never offered a solution. So then along comes another manager, I believe his name was Shane, but I can't recall. Anyway, he was better at solving some of the problems and after learning we had planned to go to the bar there afterward (and spend more money I might add) he did offer to use the remaining tokens (I believe there were 9 in all...do the math on mixed drinks at say a minimum of $7) and did bring 2 buckets of beer to use at the bar. I can understand the "party rules", but I've never been to a place that starts cleaning up before the booked time is up and usually they ask the host if they would like the left over food wrapped up, after all it is paid for.Would I go back...sure because it is a fun place, however I will NEVER book a party there and would not recommend it to anyone else. (I'd be surprised if anyone who attended this party would book one here). The main reason...the complete lack of customer service by the 1st "manager", she was horrible and was borderline belligerent. Might want to send her back to training, just saying. 2 1
We went here for lunch and I ordered the veal parm . I sent it back cause it was a veal pattie that had been deep fried . No bueno . So instead I had a corned beef sandwich which wasn't bad , a little dry but better then the veal . The fries were good and so was the gravy I poured over them . 2 3
Don't reserve a U-Box at this location. They only have room for six boxes, so it is likely that the reservation will be moved to a different location.  And you won't find out about it until the night before you plan to load. 2 1
Small but good facility.Wewent pretty late on a Saturday , but they still entertained us and kept the facilities open for as long as we needed. 4 3
El buffet  no posee mucha variedad de  platos el buffet del aria tiene mas , los postres son muy pocos y poca variedad, la calidad es muy buena de la comida igualmente 2 5
If you can handle a 1-2hr wait for a 'bay', then it's all worth it as long as you know what to expect.  We ended up waiting about 90 minutes on a Friday afternoon in the middle of spring training - had plenty of drinks and food at the bar.Basically Top Golf is golf's version of bowling.  You get a couch, a waitress and a TV.  Then you can play a variety of games with your friends ... there are computer chips in each ball so the system knows where your shot goes.  You can make it as serious or non-serious as you'd like.  The scoring itself is a bit gimmicky - if you make one shot, the next is worth double etc.  Sometimes the chips in the balls don't register your score even though the shots go in a net (happened at least 6 times in 2 hours for us)  - We had a bay on the 3rd floor, and from that high up, even if you shank a shot, it usually manages to roll in to some kind of net for points.  So, if you're a terrible golfer, go higher up!All in all, we had a good time.  If you are in a casual group and have inexperienced golfers, then this place is great.  If you are a hard-core golfer, then it's probably better to just go out an play one of the dozens of courses in the area. 4 3
The room feels slightly empty, but it's still a decent place to go for dinner. Not really a "date night" feel. The food is 3.5 star. Most of their dishes come with home made pasta. Their meats and cheeses are said to be aged and cured in house- which were delicious. Their desserts need some work. We ordered the tiramisu, which lacked the rum, so it was dry, a banana split that was made with gelato and the canolis. The cream in the canolis had too much citrus, it was overwhelming. The bar has several different types of wine, but they don't know how to make an old fashion. When I described it, they literally threw an orange slice and a cherry into a big glass of bourbon. The reason for the 4 star was because of Pasquale.  He makes this restaurant. His service is so personalized and so genuine. Although it wasn't busy, he made us feel like the only table in the restaurant. We will come back because of him. 4 3
Great spot, with a limited but good menu.  Very hidden, but somehow I have found this place 2 times by accident...so maybe the placement is genius...  Anyhow good beer selection, and great staff. 5 4
Excellent experience.  Stayed here for four nights.  Rooms are very clean with everything you need.  The staff here is above average, friendly and helpful.  Front desk staff are great - you definitely get service with a smile here.  Pool is great,  relaxing and comfy lounge chairs.  If you want a more lively scene just hop over to the Mandalay Bay pool.  This is a great option for anyone who wants to balance the  typical Vegas experience with some R&R.  The spa was also excellent.  Had a massage   with Katrina who is top notch. 4 5
I wouldn't come back here. I've visited JM's before, and had a great experience a few years back. However, visiting here for a friend's birthday, we got the privilege of having Jen as our waitress. Not only did we wait over an hour for our food, we had parties around us sit, order bad get our food before us. I ordered a burrito, which used to make Chipotle feel like a poor man's burrito. No, my burrito was a sorry excuse for a Taco Bell soft taco. And it was $11. Jen swapped it out for a Quesadilla, which was much better. However, Jen wanted to charge me an extra $1.50 for rice. At that point in time, there was no excuse to try to charge me another buck for rice. Just make me happy. The quesadilla did come with rice, and it was very good, however the waitress left me with a very bad taste in my mouth about Johnny Mango's. I had very good experiences here in the past, but as long as JM hires and employees people like Jen, I won't be coming back to this place, ever. I'm much better off going to the local liquor store, getting a quart of Jose, and grabbing a few chalupa's say TB. This place is a sorry excuse of Ameri-Mex, especially if you want to drop a couple hundo and have a good night out with some Margaritas. I did not have a good experience, and I only blame Jen half-heartedly. There was no manager asking about our experience, and there was one trying to make our experience better. Heading home, disappointed. 1 2
Avoid this place if you can. Although you can find a pretty good gelati the rest of the fair is pretty crap. The coffee is terrible and the service is complete crap. I tried it a few times and it stayed crap. 2 1
It was ok. The items were well organized. Thought it was expensive in relation to what they were offering.  Purchased 4 items for $67.Not sure how close the clothes are looked over before BUFFALO purchases them. While trying on clothes, I discovered set-in stains on two pieces of clothes & one  item had an unrepairable rip. Use caution before purchasing. 3 2
I'm going to go with the 3.5 stars as well.We walked in without a reservation and got a great window seat right away.  I really did like the room, it worked and was warm.  I had the asparagus soup which tasted well nothing like asparagus but it was a winner because the scallop in it was fabulous.  There was also a potato puree involved.  For my entree I had the salmon with crab, bearnaise  sauce, fingerling potatoes and asparagus.  Now my fault for ordering the asparagus soup with potato puree and then having repeat ingredients on my entree.  It kind of peeves me when restaurants have repeat ingredients.  It's a personal thing.  I kind of instantly found the bearnaise sauce a little cold but moved on.  The food was good, old school good.  Like it reminded me of something I'd have years ago at dinner.  Classic French, but I did like it!I found the service a little stuck between two different places. They tried to give good, fine dining service but I found these little upsells that I wasn't really buying into.  Like coming over and trying to sell us a Cognac flight after we both said we didn't drink Cognac.  Weird.  Also giving us INSANE pours of our wine.  Who does that?  We won't drink me just because it is in our glass.  Lastly, the cheese plate seriously needs to be worked on.  Great concept but really generic cheeses.  There were about 7 different types that were the size of practically my fingernail.  They were things like "gouda" and "white cheddar" - I have no idea what they were doing on there.  There was also this one cheese that they made look like a flower.  It was HORRIBLE and quite possibly the worst cheese I have ever tried.  Overall I did like it for a Vegas restaurant.  I could just really do without the little upsells they sneak in or maybe not be so obvious about it. 4 2
This is a family owned business. They are nice people except for the mother who kicked us out badly once because we brought our small Yorkie inside. She was not even polite about it. But we never see her too much anymore. Prices are definitely cheaper But a lot of vitamins are on sale once they are very close to expiry or expired already! I don't like that. Another thing is that the food in the bins - nuts, granola etc are never fresh. Evergreen natural foods on roncesvalles is more expensive but definitely more fresh. But the naturopathic doctor here is helpful. But I wish she would ask if I had pre-existing conditions before recommending anything. Because I did buy something that I later found out is not good for people with autoimmune conditions. 2 3
I was here the other day for lunch and, as expected, there was a bit of a line.  That's usually a good sign, and in this case it's definitely true. But waiting for a table isn't all bad; there's lots to see in this place: kitchy cute decor and lots of memoribilia that reminded me of my childhood. When I was there, the place was cramped and full of hungry people, but everyone was in good spirits. When I look at the menu, i always find it difficult to make a choice. They've got a big, diverse menu with both savory and sweet items. All of it looks delicious.  First off, I'm a vegetarian, but, like to get the breakfast pocket, sans pemeal bacon of course.  It's chock full of fluffy eggs, caramelized onions, mayo and cheddar cheese on a warm and soft onion bun. Aunties and Uncles encourages you to choose between a few sides, but I've never chose anything but the potato salad. Seriously, this stuff is good. A great combo of chunky red potatoes, dill, Dijon and spices, it's savoury and creamy. Admittedly, my food did and usually does take a bit of time to arrive, so if you go, don't go when you're in a hurry.Fruit juices and iced teas are good choices, but I wouldn't finish off with an espresso as they may suggest. Their espresso is nothing special and just plain weak, and it certainly doesn't stand up to Manic coffee located just a few doors down. If you're craving an after-meal-caffiene-fix, I'd suggest you head over to Manic.Aunties and Uncles loses points in service. The service staff seem a bit cold, sorta aloof, and alot grouchy, but despite if you're willing to overlook that, then this is worth a visit if you're in the College & Bathurst area. 3 4
It's a great concept, and a cute restaurant, but the food is really fast-food at sit-down prices.  I had a burger, and it was incredibly dry (and I never even tasted the cheese).  The fries, onion rings, and shakes were great, but given the cost, they better have been!We tried to sit outside, and the instant we brought our food out, we were absolutely swarmed by flies - so we gave up, and went inside. 3 2
Maha's mind blowing chicken sandwich is the signature. 2 hours wait is their signature too. If you have lots of free time it's worth trying the food but if your time is valuable 2 hours is gonna cost you at least 100 bucks interms of time. Need to upgrade the place to a bigger one. I won't go since I don't like the waiting time. 4 3
Great cheap sushi.Love the bloor street roll and the wakame salad.Edit: The Bloor Street Roll is sushi with very little rice. A big slab of salmon wraps around the outside with basil and salmon roe in the middle. Really wet. Really fishy. Such a good roll. 5 4
I was staying in town for a week. I wanted to try new places while i was here. I read reviews for Jet. Couldn't wait to bite into it. When i did i was very bummed out. Nothing like the reviews at all. Altho delivery was fast and food was hot. 2 3
Was torn between 2 and 3.  Caught the last of the breakfast buffet which was ok (nothing special, pretty limited variety) and the start of lunch - which was awful.  Not going again and I love me a breakfast buffet. 3 2
Had dinner here and nothing really special compared to Louisiana buffets.  King crab and snow crab are on the menu but they are served cold and almost frozen.  Louisiana casino buffets actually steam their crabs which I believe taste better.  Everything else on the buffet was just nasty or below standards in taste.  If it wasn't for the crabs, I'd give this place a 1 star.Seems like all Vegas buffets suffer from the same disease, they are large in square footage but small in selections and high in price.  They are built for flash. 2 1
I won a free trip to Vegas and this is the place that was chosen for my hotel. The hotel itself is decent but outside of that you are in a great part of the strip, you dont have to walk far at all to go to the more popular casinos. There is also fun outside club right outside of the hotel that specializes in mixology, so it is fun watching them make drink. 3 4
This place is average at best. Came here since I work in the area kinda and read good things here on Yelp. I have to say it's just not that amazing. It was decent, I have nothing to complain about specifically but it certainly didn't impress me or blow my mind in any sort of way. I ordered the shrimp po boy sandwich and again, it was just very plain. Not much flavour and the breading was not tastey as well as the shrimp did not taste very fresh. 2 3
I went to here the other day. It had a lot of places to sit (most of which were occupied), free wifi, but no power outlets that I could find.The latte I had was beautiful, but not super exciting flavourwise. I've been spoiled entirely by the Sam James Espresso Bar. The one from here, was probably the second best one I've had in the city so far though.It seems like the perfect place for both hanging out (there are cozy spaces behind the coffee bar) and group work (they have giant tables by the windows) and it's a great location (close to Kensiginton Market.) They do charge extra for soy milk, and it was the second most expensive latte I've had, but I loved the space and would definitely go there again. Of the food items they had available, I saw a couple vegan cookies from Sweets From the Earth which was nice. 4 3
I had gotten a gel manicure after months of not having anything on my nails.  I saw them on FB and wanted to go there because of all of the sparkle and glitter.  I got pink gel with added glitter and rhinestones, this was on a Friday.  By Saturday, my rhinestones on my right hand came off completely by the afternoon.  On Sunday, my left hand rhinestones were completely gone followed by 2 chipped nails.  Really? I've had gel manicures before and never had this happen before, I wasn't doing anything out the my normal routine.  I emailed them explaining my disappointment, however, not a word was returned.  So with that being said, I will no longer return... 2 1
Being a girl who loves red meat the Keg is my go to for quality and consistency. We went to have a nice celebratory dinner and all I can say is I'm very disappointed. I always get the same dish at the Keg the prime rib. I mean my grandma makes a crazy good prime rib but for eating out the keg never disappoints me with their prime rib. However this time I was not a fan of the meal at all. The prime rib I ordered was supposed to be a Medium it was far from that mostly over cooked. Lacked any sort of flavour and the size I asked for seemed much smaller than what I'm used to. I also ordered a skewer of jumbo prawns. I always eat my prawns first because they are my favourite and although they were cooked properly they were cold for something that was "hot" off the grill. I like my food hot simple as that.The layout of the dining room is really bizarre. You are seated next to people who are practically eating their dinner with you. Not the greatest setting to have a nice meal out and conversation. I would have rather we ate our meal in the lounge which had better seating and it was actually more intimate for a conversation and meal. (Had I known this at the time of course)The wine list is great however over priced for sure. I could bring my own bottle if I really wanted to fork out so much money for a basic generic wine. The service was really good though I always find the staff at any Keg really friendly and helpful. I'm over the Keg for the time being though. I will have to journey to new prime rib horizons. 2 3
The ramen was not too bad and gyoza was pretty goodThe rest was a disappointmentWe ordered the Brussels sprout tempura and it smelled funkyCould be the oil or the batterThe jinya bun tasted ok, bun was not fluffy enough and saggy, and the braised pork didn't have enough fat in it would have been betterNobody came to ask how the meal was so I didn't provide any feedback right there and thenBut here it isMaybe they had just opened up only one week, possibly needs some time to iron out the kinks 3 2
I've been coming here for over 10 years. I have introduced friends from all backgrounds to Baras doubles and have seen girls knees buckle when they took the first bite of doubles. It may not be the swankiest ambiance but their food will not disappoint. 5 2
It's good pizza. Happy hour from 3-6 has good prices on both food and drinks. However I have to take a star away for the regular menu prices. We both felt our sicilian pizza was good but certainly not worth $32. We will probably return for strictly happy hour food and drinks but I doubt we'd go back at night. 4 3
Love it just moved to the area and I'm so happy i found this place! Thai is my go to guy for my pedi n gel manicures! But everyone here does a great job! 4 5
this place has legit mexican fare, the burritos were great and tostadas were excellent too, I highly recommened this place over say a chain place like chipotle or taco del mar 4 5
We went for lunch and got there about 11:30.  No one was there except the owner Dan. Since we were early he was able to tell us about his business and his passion for making great pizza and other pasta dishes. He kept us mesmerized with his story of starting his pizza shop and his passion of making award winning food. Great food and an enjoyable owner. I live in West Newton so it takes awhile to get to Castle Shannon.  I will be back this time on Sunday when his mom makes her  gnocchi. Dan said to me when we're out we're out. So get there early. To bad he is not in Westmoreland county. Love Franco's. 4 5
I got bumped from my flight and the airline company sent me to a hotel with vouchers for the cab.  My ride to the hotel was fine, great even.  My return to the airport was not a pleasant experience.  The cab driver I got kept looking at the voucher like he'd never seen it before.  He then complained that it didn't include any tip or gratuity.  Um, I got stranded in Las Vegas with no cash and you want a tip?  So before he could pull out of the hotel parking lot, I left and took my voucher to use with a different driver.  The guy was a jerk.  The hotel got me a second Desert Cab, and this new driver was cool.  He understood my predicament, and when he dropped me off the only tip I could give him was a coupon book full of casino freebies and discounts, which he appreciated.  So bottom line is that you never know what kind of driver you will get.  If you don't like the driver you end up with, get the taxi ID #, driver name and anything else that you want and complain.  And if you get a good driver, let them know.  The driver I got that treated me right was Marvin.  That other guy?  Forget it, his name isn't worth the space. 3 2
this place is sooO lovely! stumbled across it a few months ago. such a cute little date spot and the pastries are morsels of heaven. although it is a bit pricey it's totally worth it and I never mind supporting a quality local business. Treat yo self to Coquette for sure! 5 4
I had been looking forward to eating here for a while so the first chance I got while visiting up in Vegas I took it.  Overall I felt this place was okay. I would have rated it a 3.5 star but that is not an option. Its a very nice restaurant and my waiter was pretty good. I had the chicken wings which were nothing special in the end but you can only do so much with a chicken wing. For my entree I had the fish n chips. This comes with two pieces of well battered Cod and steak cut fries. The fish was very good and met my expectations. The fries overall were just fries. They did have a unique horse radish ketchup which was pretty good. I would return for the fish but not much else. I felt there was something missing but overall it is a little pricey but worth a go. 4 3
If you're a fan of poutine then I would recommend coming here. This is the only place I've been to in Toronto thus far that puts a decent amount of cheese on poutine. And I am a fan of cheese. If you agree that there's never enough cheese on your poutine without you having to pay extra- and even then it's still not enough cheese- then this might be your place. I've also tried their fish and chips and they weren't bad. I wasn't particularly fond of the wings I tried but my friends liked it so it's a matter of preference and flavour.My 4 Factors:Food: 35/50Service: 15/20Timeliness: 15/20Good Vibes: 10/10Total: 75/100- BTips:If you'd like to eat in then go to the one on St. Clair, the Kensington location doesn't have much seating and a lot of it is outside.Favourite Dish: PoutineRating System:A- Excellent (80+)B- Good (70-79)C- Tolerable (60-69)D- Something but not good (50-59)F- Not even if I was starving (49-)4 Factors:Food (50%)- How does it taste?Service (20%)- How was I treated?Timeliness (20%)- Did my food get there before I expired?Good Vibes (10%)- Could I relax and eat my food/atmosphere/space? 4 2
The water for the shower was not hot enough. The rooms are pretty old and our refrigerator was faulty. Not the best place to stay. 1 2
Frozen hot chocolate! Amazing. Service? Sucked. 3 5
I've been searching for an alterations place with hours that work with my busy schedule and was thrilled to find Linh's Fashion Alterations was no only just a mile or so away from me, but open until 7pm!  After reading mostly glowing reviews, I headed over with a dress that I needed to be taken in.  I must have drove past it twice, as It's a little tucked away in a small plaza, but once I  went inside, was immediately greeted by Linh, and had my fitting , I was already looking forward to seeing the finished product.  Both Linh and the lady who pinned my dress during the fitting knew exactly what I wanted even when I was unsure how it would be done given the dress has ruching along the sides.  I arrived back a week later and was encouraged to try the dress on to see the results.  It was perfect!  All the same ruching now in a  nice, form fitting silhouette.  I will absolutely be back! 4 5
Adobado Tacos are THE BEST tacos they have here!!!  i'll go through 6 of them easy... the area here late at night is kinda sketchy... while lining up for tacos, the drunk people behind me got into a heated argument and nearly started a slug fest... too bad it didn't get ugly or else I would have lost my spot in line... 5 2
Pretty patio - if you're a smoker.  I felt like I was in the Horseshoe back in the go-go 80s.  Blech.  Food - the salads are always overdressed.  They are soaked and wet with uninspired dressings. The steak was average.  The bright spot was the salmon on the salad - well seared and juicy.  Too bad it was "Atlantic," which invariably means "Farmed."Last word: COCKROACH.  After we'd moved inside because the smokers were literally lighting one cigarette off another like a leg kick sequence in a  Busby Berkeley chorus line, the COCKROACH ambled right up to my friend's elbow, perambulated along the bar, and then went in search of beer.UGH.  Also, COCKROACH. 1 2
If I could give it a half star more I would. The food was great! Just took a long time to come out. As we first walked in there was a pungent odor of either sulfur or sewage? Maybe they forgot to empty the grease trap I don't know. After a while it went away. We started with the artichoke, awesome! My wife had scallops which she said were very respectable. I had the Alfredo with shrimp, very tasty. This place isn't a two dollar sign place. Out bill was over 100 for two people. A lot of people might be enjoying the happy hour and lunch which are reasonable. Going to dinner here ordering entrees will bring your bill high but if you stick to cheese plates and bruschetta you will probably be happy 3 4
$1.50 TACOS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Yum!This place was recommended to us by a local. We asked where to get a good cheap taco and this place hit the nail on the head. Two hippies are on the right track with this place. It's a bit small and it took about 20 min to get my food (they were really busy) but it was worth it. If I lived in Phoenix I would come here daily. A word about the fish tacos...they are good but seem as though they might use canned fish instead of fresh grilled chunks like most places. Considering the price this is acceptable!The drinks and baked goods looked great though I haven't yet tried any. I'll save those for next time I'm in town. 4 3
When I came here back in July for my birthday it's was fairly late maybe 8:30 at the latest we were sat n it literally took us 30 minutes before our waiter came to take our orders! We later found out that he was the bartender and the waiter.  Which is ridiculous the bar had about 5 people sitting there he had to serve n one lady was talking his ears off which took us forever to get our food. That wasn't his fault, it's red lobsters for being cheap and understaffed. That's the reason I took a star off other then that it was an okay visit the waiter was pleasant it just took forever. I also went here last night for the endless shrimp we got there at 9pm. We had an amazing waitress her name was Fabiola. She never let our glasses get empty , she was very nice, and she kept our shrimp coming at a steady pace. Even after 10 when the restaurant was closed she still let us order another dish. When I come back to red lobster I'm defiantly going to ask for her to be my waitress. 4 2
All I would like to say is the staff is great and helpful. I love the floor plans, and the location they definitely use the space the best way possible. Having to use a fob to get inside the building is so very annoying especially since you have to use it to get in the gate as well. But that really is their only way of security. But, the most irritating thing I've come across is that there is no parking. You are told that you can buy a covered space for $15 a month or even get a garage with an extra space for $150 a month. Humm I would totally pay the $15 a month so I know when I come home after 6 pm I can park inside the complex. Yeah, only if there was one available. There just isn't enough spaces covered or not to accommodate the residents and definitely not guests. I am a single female that works long hours and I have to park outside of the gate to the complex most nights. I have been lucky that I find the one open space there, shoot if that just didn't happen to be open then I'm not sure where I would park.. the mall or the hotel next door and have to walk over to the apartment complex. Honestly, I don't know what they can do about this problem because there just isn't anymore room to add parking. If I can not purchase a covered space before my lease is up I will definitely move. 3 2
Chuck was great for my husband and I. Allowed us to lay on many mattresses even though we walked in at closing. (We didn't realize it until I started to Yelp) Chuck even left us alone to talk and go back and fourth from mattress to mattress. The experience was so enjoyable without any pressure. 4 5
Mallards games are pretty incredible for as small as they are. There are a lot of handouts as they try to advertise and there are plenty of food options. The between innings and seating sections are also pretty cool. This is a pretty good place to bring a date to if she is into baseball also. 3 4
OK, what is everyone else seeing here that I didn't?  Yeah, I went for a weekday lunch instead of for Sunday brunch but shouldn't it still be at least a good experience?On the plus side, the physical space is special - lots of exposed brick, high ceilings, worn wood floors, lots of windows for natural light.  The restaurant was only about 1/3 full at 12:30 pm on a Wednesday.  It is definitely NOT handicapped accessible.  The only access to the space is a very long, very steep flight of stairs.  (Even the server told us that cases of food, wine and beer kegs have to be lugged up those stairs, there isn't even a freight elevator in the building.)I ordered the potato bisque (a menu staple) and the chef salad special.  Our server forgot my soup and brought it out after she'd served my entree salad.  The meats in the salad seemed like cold cuts - in fact, rather than being served julienned or chopped in the salad, they were simply layered on - rounds pieces of cold cuts in the salad!  The ranch dressing was likely homemade but was runny in texture and bland in flavor.  My chocolate cake dessert was okay - but not $7 worth of okay.My companion enjoyed the crab cake on top of an otherwise ordinary looking salad and she raved about the tiramisu.Our server does get points for assisting my companion with a wine selection.  She brought out two bottles, let my aunt try both and make a selection.  She even let the unchosed sample stay on the table instead of quickly whisking it back to the bar.Parking is a private lot off of South Blvd - but it's very easy to miss the entrance to the parking lot - and once you miss it, you can't access it from any of the neighboring parking lots either!Maybe I'll try again with a Sunday brunch - but the experience will have to be world class amazing to erase my memory of this lunch. 2 3
They did a good job...I tend to judge it not just by the result but by how much attention the guy is giving your car.  He worked hard, and the interior looked great.  Would definitely return 4 5
Sports book customer service is inconsistent and arrogant. Decent food joints but nothin to write home about. 1 2
Love this place!! The food reminds me of Thanksgiving back home. So one thing that really stood out to me..I called to see if they had banana pudding. The lady answered and told me yeah. Cool..we head to the restaurant. About two minutes later I receive a call back and it's the lady from NaNas and she says, "I'm so sorry to be calling..just wanted to let you know that I went to double check and were actually out of banana pudding right now. I didn't want you to drive all this way just to find out we didn't have it". So this may seem pretty simple, but it was a big deal to me. She didn't have to call back - she was so nice and personable. We still ate there of course lol. I was too stuffed for desert anyway. But really friendly people, gave food suggestions and samples. Would recommend. 5 4
In the process of relocating to Madison from Indiana, my wife & I stopped in for lunch after a soul-draining day of house-hunting.  The brews on tap were perfect to take the edge off, and then I ate something I never expected to love so thoroughly -- a fried egg sandwich.This was the best fried-egg sandwich in the world.  And I've eaten and made quite a few.  The secret has got to be that chipotle mayo.  It's the new ketchup -- it just rocks everything it touches.And of course, the Weary Traveler is adorable with its beautiful dark woods, the mirrors up in the crown molding, and the delectable selection of local beers.  Saving the weary, one pint at a time... 4 5
Just an OK chain restaurant. I don't see the value for the cost. I've been to this location twice and both times items on the market buffet line were not well stocked and staff appears to do very little  maintenance on the area to keep it clean, wipe up the spills, etc. that are typical of self-service. There were at least 3 sauces that had run out and we had to ask someone to refill. They should have someone monitoring. We had a big appetizer platter on the previous visit that everyone really liked for the variety. Still, I think there are better local options in the area when it comes to value for the money. Even some chains like PF Chang's nearby I've had more enjoyable experiences. 2 3
In the words of the philosopher M.Jagger: you can't always get what you want. but if you try sometimes .. you get what you need. (after wasting a few hours)For new years 2012/13 we enjoyed our stay in a HRH Tower King Suite with the lovely "Tea for Two" Tub. Since our plans for this trip included Journey at the Hard Rock and Ka at MGM Grand we went back to the HRH Tower King Suite. I'm 6'8" so a big tub is a big plus in my book, in fact, it's exactly why we got this room again. Imagine my surprise when we checked in to the room and found a lousy 'standard' tub. Odd, since their web site explicitly states: Each 701 square foot king room includes .. with cast iron "Tea for Two" tub' .. nope. After spending far too long on hold we were promised the *right* room for our 2nd night. It was busy, I get it, you take what you can get. We followed up in person with the HRH Tower guest services people that we're not looking for an upgrade, just the 'tea for two' tub that was advertised. The next day we picked up the keys for our new room in the Casino Tower. A lovely room, although a bit loud since it's 'pool view' .. with a *terrible* 'shower / bathtub combo' deal.  Seriously ? Did you not *just* promise us the room we booked with the bath tub we *explicitly* asked for ?After more time on hold and dealing with a front desk manager who didn't know the difference between a standard King Suite and an ADA Accessible King Suite we finally got the keys to another room in the HRH Tower, with the advertised 'Tea for Two' tub. We probably wasted over an hour in the process but that's how you want to spend your precious weekend off, right ? Pro-Tip and Pet Peeve: you have *two* nice 40" Sony Bravia LCD TVs. Why can't you correctly set brightness/contrast and get HD content on them ?  Their 'commitment to excellence' was lacking in other areas as well I'm afraid. Exposed electronics in the mini-bar, poor service in the taxi line (there are two taxis waiting around the corner, could you maybe call them over?) and generally unacceptable wait times for simple room service orders. Coffee and some eggs shouldn't take over an hour. Rather than risk going through the same ordeal once more I think we'll just go with the MGM Grand Spa suite next time. 2 1
Good food...but won't return because they sell shark fin items. And I don't believe in finning a shark and because I don't know how it was harvested (properly or not) I won't be returning to eat there. 2 3
Those yuca fries ... absolutely delicious with the dip.Actual chicken is also very good, especially when combined with their sauces. They have daily deals as well which I suggest trying. 4 5
Food was okay. I had the virgin pasta and it was good. My friend's Pasta What was a bit too salty. Atmosphere was cozy. Service was quick. Good spot for a late night meal. 4 3
This is the 2nd wknd I come to this McDonald's and they still don't have the breakfast burritos, they claimed that they ran out of tortillas. I only come here on the wknds bcuz it's close to home. This place needs better management. 1 2
I joined this gym after leaving Fitness 1. This gym isn't perfect but is as close to perfect as I could ask for. I like the long hours the gym provides for daycare. And daycare will change dirty diapers!!! And for the most part I really do like the gym daycare employees (except I had an experience where the daycare manager was extremely rude, but I forgave that one instance because I figured she was having a bad day).I also enjoy the towel service. & The equipment is great. The classes seem great though I have yet to attend a class. But I wish the gym would add free wifi for members to use while working out (so that I can watch netflix while working out), add some more channels to the equipment's tvs (I wish they would add e, bravo, mtv) and add a laundry shoot for towels inside the locker rooms. I even put in a request for the laundry shoot but Mountainside obviously just ignored my request. I also wish this location & all other locations would have a water service that they provide in their Scottsdale location. It seems like the west valley is constantly getting the short end of the stick and this is another example of that isn't it? & might be wrong but I think the Scottsdale location also has better tv channels than the Surprise gym does.But despite those gripes I'm still a fan. This is the best gym in Surprise. 4 2
Our first visit was so great that we brought friends and family for our 2nd visit. Unfortunately, the 2nd time around was not as pleasant. The owner was not friendly at all, he was very condescending and he wasn't happy to talk about his beers. In my opinion, he did not do a good job of selling his product or showing customer appreciation.I would give some of his beers 3.5 stars and some of them 4 stars. He makes good beer but who want's to buy and support people like him. My advise would be to let your wife work the taps (since she made our first visit great) and you should stay in the back and brew.I was embarrassed that I talked it up so much and it turned out to be such an unpleasant experience for my friends and family. There are plenty of other local brewing around to support, so none of us will be coming back here again. 2 3
my first time in value v. i like to help a cause so i don't mind shopping but what to buy??? i was shocked by their clothing prices, all smelly, dirty my fingers got sticky from dirt, 35 bucks for a non-brand torn garment??? yucki bought vases for my plants nothing else was in a buy-able condition, i would never dress my kid from here, holes and stains in the clothes, if target and walmart so cheap then why not buy new, the toys were extremely dirty or broken, they sold kids chairs for the same price you buy new and they were black from years of filth!!! i also saw they were selling a 15 yr old OLD and USED ELECTRIC SHAVER omg, full of germs, would you use it on your skin and risk infection??? 2 1
Hot stone massages are great. Definitely warranted after dealing with such helpful (read: incompetent) front desk staff!Also...it's really not hard to spell my name. Paul. PAUL. Not, Pall. Seriously. 3 2
I have mixed feelings about this dental office. I am a full-time traveler and was in need of a basic cleaning and check-up while staying in Mesa.  Based on the reviews here, I made an appointment and was pleased to hear that they have a new patient special for $69. I thought that would be perfect.  They took extensive x-rays and pictures of my teeth and checked the pocket depth of my gums. The hygienist  seemed very competent.  Based on my gum health, she recommended a serious "deep cleaning" that would cost about $400.  Then she fell back to saying a full mouth debridement should be enough, so I went with that.  What I got was pretty much a standard plaque removal and cleaning using an ultrasound tool, no different in time and effort than previous standard cleanings I've had.  So I feel that I was somewhat "bait-and-switched" into paying more for a standard cleaning and exam (about $200) than was presented. I don't doubt that they do good work in this office but I don't feel that their new patient special is totally aboveboard.  Oh, and I left the appointment with a $3,000 treatment plan to replace three crowns that do appear to be starting to have issues, but I made it clear to the office from the beginning that I did not live in the area and would not be able to come back for any work. They are a bit aggressive in generating business, so go in with your eyes open. 3 5
I've been eating here now for over 4 years from highschool until now my sophomore year in college, and I have to say they are on their way out because at one point their food was to be reckoned with and now it's just bleh. Last time I was there I was really disappointed by the service. One lady working and I seemed to bother her to give her business. 3 2
After living in Germany for three years sometimes I'm in the mood for a beer garden. This place is pretty close. Good biergarten food and great beer! Check hours before you go because they're not open every day! 5 4
For many years, all Wanda's pies were heaven, our favorites were the pecan, the apple, the banana cream and coconut cream. We used to but them from a small shop on Yorkville, near Yonge.Somewhere along the line, since moving to Kensington Market, I have found a slow and stead decline in the quality, and most important freshness of her pies. I don't know if upscaling for greater distribution or loss of hands on quality control is the reason, but her pies are certainly not near what they used to be. I have had stale blueberry pies, as well as others, that seemed past their due date, I can't even eat her banana or coconut cream pies anymore, I am not a baker, but it's like the have made some substitutions for the fresh cream they used to use in the cream pies (coconut as well). I guess as they they say, things change, but for a time I considered her pies not only the best in the city, but the best I ever ate, alas, no longer. 2 3
The food was good but I think they are a little short staffed. Our order, food, and bill took longer than I would've liked. I don't blame our waitress though as she was slammed. I had the yogurt parfait and it was delicious. The Greek yogurt was very smooth and creamy. 4 3
Bad time today. Dirty windows, table sticky, handy payment/menu gadget yucky. Used my fork to enter info.Food was burned and dry.Only dark chocolate desserts.Adios. 2 1
We went into this cupcake shop as recommended by a friend. We are very impressed with the cupcake and cake decoration this place does. We decided to try triple chocolate cupcake and red velvet cupcake as recommended by a friendly staff. My husband decided to try on cronut. He did love the cronut (we've never had the original one so we cannot compare on that). He loved the cronut especially the cream filled in the middle. My cupcakes were ok in texture. However, I love the frosting. It is the first cupcake store that I've ever been to and offered a "not overly sweet" frosting. I'd say I'd go back just to try other flavors. They have friendly staff and made our experience pleasurable. 3 4
Hotpot is the perfect food to for this season. This is our regular hotpot spot my boyfriend and I usually go to because they offer wide range of sauces and food selection also their soup broths taste very homemade. For 15.99 (roughly)  AYCE after 10pm special during the weekdays  Kim Tao is def a must try. 3 4
I like this place. Prior to my East Coast Foodies event there, I had never been to Pita Jungle. Everyone has said how amazing they are. So, when I found out that they have happy hour, I set up an event and off us foodies went.My fellow foodies enjoyed $2.00 beers, and $4.00 glasses of wine ( I believe) and the happy hour food menu was great! I really enjoyed my falafel, side of lentils/brown rice, and carmelized cauliflower! What a filling and healthy meal.I will go back very soon for happy hour.Love,The East Coast Foodie 3 5
I really don't understand all the bad reviews- if you don't want to wait in line or have to say no to a sales pitch take a taxi. I rented a car from here last week for my vacation. We were helped by a woman who I believe was named Murna. She was very helpful and we even chatted about all the bad reviews on here. You get what you pay for- this place has the cheapest cars so expect to wait in line. There was no high pressure sales pitch- they outlined the offers and I responded with a firm no and that was that. 5 4
The food and craft cocktails are worth a visit.  However, I don't recommend this place for parties or if you have a large group of people.  We tried to hold a birthday party at H & R last night and were told beforehand by the owner that it would be no problem.  Unfortunately there were plenty of problems including really bad service and the staff not being alerted that we were coming.  Our waitress seemed far more interested in hiding in the back than taking our drink orders.  Everyone left hungry, thirsty and frustrated.  I will go back but never to do anything but sit at the bar with no more than one or two other people. 2 1
I have been using their services for over 7 years. Changed owners a few years ago but the new staff and owner (Helen) is much nicer. It's clean, friendly, good service. However I have a problem with their opening, If you book an appt for opening time let's say 10am for a saturday make sure you have time to wait because no one will be there until 10-15min later. as well I wish they would have more, better collections of nail polish. 4 3
This is not a Lebanon's restaurant the food is ok but for the price NOT that's good at all the portion is very small for the price I will not be going there again 2 3
I eat here many times. I am that single guy people look at and feel sorry for cause I am reading something and ignoring them, unless she is hot ;)You cannot go wrong with any of the food here. Really.Now that its winter, its PHO and more PHO.As custom men will serve you and the women will take your money, haha.Check it out. 5 1
Had a difficult experience. The rooms were far from the lobby. Th design was shaped like a maze which required a map just to get to the lobby. It rained and there were one inch puddles in the walkway outside my door.  The staff was pleasant and tried to serve but often promised service that was not timely or never happened. Shuttles promised for transportation were often very late or full.  The bar offered food that was tasty. Two of the bellmen were excellent and sheltered us from the rain with umbrellas and a golf cart. Others tried but were exceedingly busy to offer promo service. Overall it was an effort just to survive this experience. Had I known I would have rented a car just to get to the lobby and to get to nearby areas without waiting. 1 3
Very delicious food. The atmosphere was cozy. And service was very quick. This was my first time trying Ethiopian food and I have to say it won't be my last. 5 4
Tried it after reading all the raving reviews. There's no doubt, it's the cheapest Chinese I've come across in the East Valley. As far as flavor, far from the best. 2 5
This past week was only my third time playing in a tournament, so I have few points of reference (only the MGM if you must know). Right now the price is $125 for $8,000 in chips. As I said in my quick tip: comfy chairs. They also lean back quiet a ways too, that caught me by surprise.All of dealers were nice. All of them! They were professional and made small talk sometimes and happily greeted the regulars. I thought it was a good poker crowd. It seemed like everyone was there to enjoy themselves.My only con was I was at table 7, which was in the corner and we were constantly neglected by the cocktail waitress. I only wanted a water every now and then, but some people at our table were getting really irritated by the fact that she wouldn't come by. Our dealer had to yell at her at one point. Four hours later and with 18 out of 80 players left, another player and I went all in...I lost on the river, teehee. Good times though.Also, some well known players were there. That guy won 1.6 million last week? The big guy with the beard. He was one of them. IDK who he is, but a lot of the people at my table were excited to see him. That's all. 4 3
Pizza was okay,  I've had it cooked there, and I've taken it home to cook myself, I do appreciate the high quality ingredients.  However, the service is very slow, and the people who I've encountered working there are very young and unprofessional.  It's the little things like having very personal conversations within earshot of the customers, and wearing shorts so short you can see their bottoms hanging out, hair is not tied back, long fake nails...  Not really the people who I want to prepare my food.  I won't personally go back again, but I wouldn't stop a friend from trying it. 3 2
Warm atmosphere, smiling faces and cold beer!  Oh and a great menu with excellent food. Try the meatballs and the mignulata. Very delicious. Pizza choices include tasty standards like sausage (from local favorite DeFalco's) and more trendy tastes like fig and goat cheese. I wish it was closer to home. We would have our own permanent table! 5 4
Went there for lunch and had all you can eat soup and salad.  My salads were not very tasteful and the soup was okay.  My friend ordered a pizza and that too was just okay.  The place is absolutely quaint and cozy but I like tasteful quality meals for a good value no matter how cute the place is.  They have wine and beer tastings that might be worth trying. 2 3
1. Pad thai- Not ketchup-based or too sweet. Mine was salty but it would've been good if it was less salty. Not spicy. Comes with shrimp and chicken. 2. Vermicelli with spring roll, shrimp on sugar cane- Spring rolls were small and over-fried. Shrimp on sugar cane was bigger than other places. 3 2
Very cool place..and concept.  I loved that I could play digital Connect Four at the bar while eating and drinking!It's not cheap by any means, but considering how big the rolls and sashimi is..it's well worth it.  What we ate there would have cost $200 in NYC so I considerate it a deal.Downside:  very packed and some of the staff were snobby.Upside:  The food outweighed the snobby staff..haha 4 3
I went to Bingo Monday's and had a great time with friends. The lamb sliders are AMAZING! Love the outdoor seating. I would definitely recommend this place if you need something fun to do on a Monday night. 4 5
Had dinner here during.my stay. The waiters and waitstaff were a little everywhere. But the seafood platter was amazing. So delicious and good.selection. I also had the curry cauliflower soup and it was so flavorful. The shitios peppers were also delicious. I was disappointed with the beef wellington, for something they are.known for it lacked.flavor and was just ok. During my stay I also are at Craft Steak and it was so much better than Gordon's. 3 4
We had the Chicken Bacon Avocado wrap that was stuffed full of chunks of chicken, crunchy bacon bits, some avocado and lots of lettuce and skin-on cucumbers chunks.  Next time I'll tell them to leave those off.  Kind of dry so needed more mayo that they supplied in packets.  The pesto chicken Cavatappi was delicious but small portion.  It  should include a side or at least a piece of bread. 4 3
The service was good, but we ordered strawberry margaritas and they didn't taste like they had any alcohol in them. 1 3
Despite the fact this place is a 5 minute walk from our home I've probably only been inside once or twice.  It just never looked very clean to me.  Recently, my partner and I went for brunch on a Sunday.  I will admit the pancakes are delicious and that's exactly what I ordered.  Unfortunately, the young man who brought our plates to the table carried a plate of eggs on top of my blueberry pancakes - YUCK.  When I asked him to please take back my pancakes and explained why he assured me the bottom of plate had not touched my food, however, he was unable to explain how blueberry sauce managed to get all over the bottom of the plate of eggs.  He took the dish back to the kitchen and I watched as he told the "cook" what happened.  The cook appeared to laugh and share the story with several others behind the counter (apparently oblivious to the fact that the "kitchen" is open and in plain view of the diners.)  The cook then put a glove on and used his hand to scrape off the blueberries and put new new blueberries on the same pancakes.  The server brought my "new" pancakes back and I promptly sent them back.  In all fairness, our original server did not know anything about this and she apologized and offered to bring me another meal.  Needless to say, we both had lost our appetites. I knew there was a reason I didn't eat here... 2 1
Came here with a Groupon and I dunno if the food quality is different.  Was given a special menu to pose from 8 different teas.  The teas were good.  But was never offered additional water to top up my teapot. Food was substandard even with Groupon price.  I found the food to be creative  the taste and quality is seriously lacking.  2 star for food 1 star for the service. 3 2
I really liked this hooters. i am visiting, and the hooters from my town isn't that great. Hot girls and decent priced beer. I plan to go back before I leave. 5 4
Meh. I've never met a stone crab I didn't like...until tonight everything on the menu tasted half-frozen even though we are in stone crab season. Best dish of the night was the crispy brussel sprouts. Now when you're at Joe's this should be considered a problem. Staff was nice enough but i came here to get my seasonal stone crab on, not to discuss why Vegas doesn't sell powerball tickets. Anyhow. I've finally solved the mystery. The reason why this is not up to par with Joe's is this is NOT Joe's. They license the name and use the same vendors. Think Donald Trump and how his name was licensed up the yazoo a decade ago...when he was bankrupt. Not during the current Presidential campaign. Yup. 3 stars is generous for this evening's meal. 3 2
Nice office, a good place if you're looking for fast food style service. It's fast and efficient, except for when you have a problem with billing.  I am still waiting for them to fix an issue from six months ago with billing codes so I don't have to pay $300 for preventative services covered by my insurance. Now I have to submit a claim with my insurance which is going to take even more of my time and energy. I feel like a number going in and out of this place. Women's issues are sensitive and should be handled as such but apparently they're more concerned with the business aspect. An example, I just had a visit where they basically gave me information I could have learned from a website or over the phone. They just wanted to get me in office so they could bill for a simple 5 minute consultation. They costed me about $60 in hours missed at work plus my $20 copay and the cost of insurance. I'm quitting this place. 1 2
The only reason I rated this place one star at all because the waitress was so sweet. She was very nice. But the food... was greasy and gross. I am very dissatisified. I have the grilled cheese which appears to have been made with wonderbread and kraft chese, with grease coated fries. Everything is fried and hard to swallow. No sodas (which did not bother me because I do not like soda, but it is unusual) , and no milk/lemonade, and you are served in plastic cups... I come for good food and a nice resturaunt experience. Only plus is the waitresses are darlings... Do. Not. Eat. Here. If. You. Love. Your. Body. 1 2
Nearly everything about this place is perfect - I love the high quality of the produce, the uniqueness of their health & beauty area, THE BULK BINS, the constant introduction of new items and willingness to order former ones... I could go on all day. They are out of my budget for full grocery shopping, but a fun regular stop for special treats and items I can't buy (vegan choc chip cookies) or won't buy (cilantro, green onions) at Woodmans (srsly woodman's cilantro is practically composted, gross). However, and what I'm docking a star for, is the inconsistent level of service from the staff. Some people are terrific and so willing to stop and see if you need help, or are just generally pleasant - especially the folks working the front desk, bulk, deli/juice bar areas. Others - almost always cashiers - seem so bothered to be there! Sorry I'm buying stuff, sorry I said Hi and asked how your day was going, sorry I said sure I'll CHIP and yes I'd like a receipt, sorry I forgot and left the unused fork and napkin on top of my box of hot food when I put it on the belt and you had to ask me to remove it. SORRY, ok??? Stop glaring at me, stop wrinkling your nose at what I'm buying, stop rolling your eyes when everything doesn't fit into my cloth bag and I have to ask for a paper one. I still love the stores, I will continue to shop there forever, but I do hope that they'll either hire friendlier cashiers or add in some self-check lanes. 4 2
So, my husband and I earned a free meal at this restaurant after playing the slot machine and decided to try it out. Initally when we first entered the place, there was no hostess and no one acknowledged that we were there, we waited about 5 minutes. Once we were seated, it took the waiter about 10 minutes to come to our table. We ordered an appetizer and our food at the same time, it took about 20 minutes for the appetizer to come out and our food took an additional 20 minutes to come out. When we first arrived it was close to 3pm and it was not busy. The waiter never refilled our drinks or checked if we needed anything. After asking for the dessert menu, it took 10 minutes for us to receive that and once we asked for the bill, it took an additional 10-15 minutes. People that came in after us received their food and service faster than we did. This may have to do with us having a free meal or some other reason. The food we actually did enjoy but don't think we will be returning to this restaurant. 3 1
I asked to get the sleeves of my nice wool coat taken out.  I paid $30, which is not that cheap for this kind of work. The work was so sloppy that the hemming started falling apart as soon as I got home and I also noticed a hole in the pocket that wasn't there when I had dropped my coat off. Honestly, the work was a hack-job. If you have any really nice/expensive items of clothing, do NOT take it here or you risk having to get the work re-done elsewhere. Really disappointed with the services after having read such positive reviews. 1 2
It's not real hawaii poke. Totally different! It's just salad like Hawaii poke stlyle. Just Good salad. 3 4
Bad cheessteak. Dry bread. The meat looked funny and dry too. Tasted below average. Won't be rushing back anytime soon. 2 1
It's definitely a small little hidden spot in Mississauga to take pictures and explore. I find that it needs a little more maintenance as the upkeep has been lacking over the years. If you're in the area then sure, but I would make more of an effort to go to lakeshore area or high park.Hope this helps!-jT 2 4
I've been here on several occasions. The food is always so yummy. I like to get The Over Easy. So flavorful. The french toast is amazing (both versions), and to top it all off, they have FRESH SQUEEZED OJ!! Omg. I love fresh juice (This also makes for excellent mimosas). The ambiance is nice and casual. They play great music and if you can avoid their busy hour, the wait is never long. I've felt unsure about the service in the past, but had a great experience the last time. Wish I could remember the servers name, but he was very attentive. Overall, definitely recommend for breakfast/brunch 4 5
The setup looks good but the food was okayish , actually a little over priced. 2 3
Favourite place!!! no bullshit, all the cakes and sandwiches are amazing, and their whole whey bread is the best i ever had, now have to eat them every single morning.The girls work in day shit are kinds of bitch... love the ppl who works in the night, always give me half price off if I go there before they close. 4 5
Their nachos are my favourite and possibly one of the best in town! I've even requested BBQ sauce in the side as an extra dip. The price for the huge plate is a great value :):) But this is probably the only thing I like there, with an iceberg beer.The poutines were awful (I had it a year ago and never ordered it again) Hope this helps!-jT 2 3
The waffle was thick but not crispy - I wish I asked him to leave it on there for another minute. There are other flavours (cinnamon, maple, strawberry) but I don't see myself returning anytime soon...especially since Marbleslab's dark chocolate ice cream is just across the street. 1 2
I wish I could write a 5 star review as I see the potential in Christa's business. I came across her through facebook where she was running a special on eyelash extensions. I texted her and she booked me an appointment within 24 hours. Now most people can certainly appreciate a next day appointment, however you may become less excited if you are seen almost 45 minutes after your set time. I would not have minded being scheduled for another day as long as I would be seen at the time I was given. I was not offered an apology or anything of the like. I'm not big on first impressions but I do expect a certain level of professionalism or at least common courtesy as a new client. I was not informed in any manner that she was running late and I had another appointment right after her. When I was taken into the room she took about 10 minutes to set up (not bad at all) but then the lack of professionalism again became an issue. She was having a full on conversation about her boyfriend with her co-worker. This while her co-worker was working on a client of her own as well. Now this is is a small area where you are seen. The size of the room is a bit smaller than a doctor's exam room. There are two massage tables in there and one is for clients getting their eyebrows done and the other is for Christa's eyelash clients. I did not experience any pain whatsoever, was very relieved at how swiftly she worked and was pleased with my results. I was just uncomfortable that she would refer about other clients in a tasteless manner. For example, telling her co-worker how she was "annoyed" and how "some clients don't get it" when asking for certain results. Then the comments made about how she needed to be satisfied sexually or she would not be wasting her time. So that went on for about 40 minutes or so. I paid $65 for the service and gave her a $12 tip. Needless to say I had to cancel my appointment after her on short notice. Even with that incident, I decided to schedule with her again to have my eyelashes filled. I was yet again given an appointment within 24 hours of contacting her. However. . . I show up and to my surprise was not seen on time yet AGAIN! I waited in the lobby for 45 minutes hoping that she may text me to let me know she was late, on her way or still working on a client. Anything! I mean any reason at all, I would not have minded waiting the full hour if I was guaranteed to be seen. I texted her that I had left right outside of the parking lot hoping she may offer another time to return to make up the wait. Nope, not at all. I found her work ethic to be dubious. She is good at what she does, but needs to work on her customer service skills. Just awful! If she thinks she's to good to respond or contact her clients for resolution on such matters imagine if her business were to grow to an actual salon. Whew!! I mean don't double book if you can't keep up, maintain your private conversations for your lunch break and sweet baby jeebus keep your clients informed of any changes that will directly affect them. Our time is just as valuable too you know, thanks! 3 stars overall, 0 for customer service. 3 2
Good concept, way over priced for a very limited small menu. I was hoping we'd find a new it place to go but this place is just mehhhhh. We'd still drive all way to Easy Life or Sp Mtn. 2 3
I  like this store, I am not much of a thrift store person but I like the vintage stuff in this store, some stuff is overpriced, some is under.. but I like it. 4 3
Excellent food, with so-so service. I've been here several times and have never been disappointed in my food. The food is excellent and the portions are always very generous. My two favorites have been the lasagna and the chicken parmigiana. My husband and I always order a side salad and split it because they're so huge!The bar leaves a lot to be desired. I have not been too impressed with the bartenders-- always lacking in personality as well as craftsmanship.Waitstaff are much like the bartenders... Just so-so. Seem to lack any real personality. 3 4
We have been going here since we moved to Gilbert in 2004 and while they aren't as good as they were then, and they have lots more competition than they used to, Teaks still does pretty darn good.  We have even used them for catering a couple times and it was awesome!They have some interesting items like the Alamo Chipotle Burger, Open the Hatch and Candlestick Carver as well as great wings and new food specials daily.  Prices are similar to all the others but more original food than the chains.Don't forget the free peanuts whose shells are simply dumped on the floor.Did I mention GREAT service and a lot of choices for your favorite beverage. Ans lots of TVs for your sports viewing pleasure.  You get a big mix in the crowd from old time Gilbert cowboys, families, couples and sports teams. 3 4
Came here specifically so the bf can eat the dry aged NY sirloin. We first heard about dry aged beef on food network, and were intrigued by the aging process. Last summer, while strolling by NY NY on the last day of our vegas trip, we walked by Gallagher's. Unfortunately at that time, we didn't have time to try their steak and the bf left vegas disappointed. For the holidays, we trekked back to vegas...and a part of me thinks we went back to vegas to satisfy my bf's intrigue of the dry aged NY sirloin. So to appease the bf, we went here. He of course had the NY sirloin, and I had the filet mignon.  And to give Gallagher's credit...the NY sirloin was yummy, but it didn't taste that much different than a wet aged piece-o-meat. The filet was small but cooked to perfection. Overall, very enjoyable. However 4 3
I was a walk in for an eyebrow waxing.  Place was clean.  I didn't have to wait, but the lady who did the waxing stopped in the middle of doing a manicure? with another lady.  I think this made her do a rush job.  If not, then she is just not very good at eyebrow waxing.  When I got home, I still had wax on me.  My right eyebrow is thinner with a high arch.  My left is thicker with no arch.   I have never had an uneven job like this before.  Had to fix it myself.  I am not a happy camper right now.  Ugh. 2 1
I went 2 weeks ago on a Saturday; I've been to Sushi 168 'pre' and 'post' renovation, and over time the quality has substantially diminished. They've become busier, and as a result, they've stopped making (or giving off the appearance that their food is made) to order. I believe that's the biggest mistake a restaurant can make - feed more customers at the expense of quality and freshness.The food came out quickly...a little too quickly, suggesting that the restaurant simply wants to turn tables as quickly as possible. The hot foods came out cold, and did not look or taste fresh. They should hire more sushi chefs to do things right, and make food to order, rather than churn out a lot of rolls at once, that are left sitting there until they're ordered. It's backwards management and a symptom of greed in my opinion.You can find better elsewhere, unfortunately Mississauga doesn't have much, so this restaurant has succeeded in attracting customers for the time being. Go elsewhere...the service and quality will be a lot better. It's worth the drive to Toronto or further east for better quality AYCE. 2 1
This review isn't about the food, which is mostly excellent based on the two times that I've been previously. I tried to go tonight for takeout and was told that I would have to wait in the long line for people actually sitting at the restaurant to order my food because I hadn't called ahead. It's beyond preposterous to make people wait all that time simply to order takeout. I've never heard of this happening at other restaurants. On top of that the employee was brusque and even a little bit rude. I understand that places like this restaurant are really popular and as a result the staff often get overworked, but this policy doesn't make any sense. If you're going to prevent walk up customers from ordering takeout at the restaurant itself in a timely manner, then you shouldn't offer takeout any longer. And if your staff are overworked and having to stay late every night (as other posters have mentioned), maybe you should adjust the closing time accordingly. 1 2
Staff was nice, it was packed, and there was good music, but our actual hookah was supposed to be margarita flavored, and it came with no taste, I was with two friends, so we ordered three hoses, mine didn't work, so I asked a staff member to fix it, and they tried but it still continued to not work. Finally right before we left, the people who were cramped up next to us fixed my hose, and I still had to pay full price, which was kind of expensive. This place isn't too bad, it has potential, I'll be back. 3 2
Normal diner setting.  Prepare for a long wait if you come around normal busy hours.  Long island iced tea was great!  Nice cheap meal compared to everything else you'll find in Mandalay Bay. 4 3
First of all great guys. Nathan always does a great job and is very personable and friendly. I'm a little disappointed this go around with my RV sealing. Quality is great but somehow the pricing went up from $15 to $20 per foot. This is the third time I've used them and they do nice work. Taking my price from $450 to $600 however may cause me to shop around next time. 3 4
Was craving Molcajete and decided to try this place. It was alright I guess. The beef was overcooked and tough. The salsa it was in was mediocre. Service was less than satisfactory also. 3 2
Taste is alright, coming from LA this spot is def not on par with what we got out there. First thing that I thought was how come the fishes aren't put into a separate bowl and mixed with the sauces and certain toppings. Instead it was just thrown on top of the rice along with everything else. Overall is just okay moving great would not come again. On top of that is $11 I think is def overpriced for two scoops of protein. The fish is def not fresh Does not have a good vibe, no music, and needs friendlier customer service....the guy seemed like he hated his life. 2 3
Let me first say that my last review happened about a year ago and I wrote a review but accidentally never posted it. As soon as I realized this I posted. Dave Gordon called me and emailed within the next few days to apologize about my experience.  I had explained to him about the post and that this actually occurred almost a year ago. He said regardless it was still an experience I had and he wanted to make it right and he did! I really appreciate that. I really respect a manager who truly cares about his customers. I would definitely return do to the fact that they care about their customer satisfaction. He asked me to give him a call the next time I go back so he can make sure our next experience is an amazing one. I will definitely take him up on that! 4 5
I got the lunchtime soup/salad combo. It was pretty good, especially the soup, and there was lots of filling stuff in there, but it wasn't quite enough food for me. If I go back I'll get something a bit bigger. 4 3
Not a fan.  I am a huge breakfast fan and the food here is so so, at best.   Don't waste your money. 2 1
Pros: Buger, side of fries, take out staff, free wi-fiCons: None this timeIs it a good restaurant for kids? YesIs the parking lot enough to accommodate the customers? MaybeOn Wednesday around 7:30pm, I went to the restaurant to get my food to go and have my dinner on another place. The cashier was very quick and nice to take my order and at this time there were no line to place my order there.After paid, there is a place that you can sit to wait for your food to be ready. I waited more or less 15/20 minutes for everything to be done. While I was waiting, I was using the free Wi-Fi to check my e-mails and read the news.Overall, the fries were dry but tasteful. They were not greased or unseasoned and the burger at a first sight seemed dry what is a bad sign most of the times. But I was wrong, even not juicy inside the burger was delicious. They found the right balance between juicy and dry. I liked this restaurant a lot and I'm looking forward to go back there again. 4 3
So we decided to try this place out since we had a friend visiting from out of town who was already around Kensington.   The service wasn't too bad, but the food took over an hour to come out to us since the place was heaving.  Pretty understandable given the size of the kitchen. I had the El Especial and the scrambled eggs were quite nice, cheesy and creamy like described.   The salsa and sausages were a little bland, but wasn't too bad.   The wife and our friend both had the fish fry and were kinda left asking where the rest of the fish was, but what do you expect for the price?  All in the all, not great.. but not too bad.  Ended up picking up pork rolls from chinatown because wife and friend weren't entirely satisfied. 3 2
Brandon is one cool cat, and will take the time to learn about what you intend to play and then assist you in finding the right axe for your style. On request, he'll even put down some solos to your chord progressions to hear the groove of two pieces at once. Great guy, working hard at a real good guitar shop. They're much more about moving big gear versus little gear but that's no big whoop to me; the six-string and bass selection is not to be outdone by any shop in town. If you want a big name gitbox: Do some light research online, check each one of them out by noodling at Guitar Center, and then take some cash and go get a sweet deal on that same instrument from Brandon at Bizarre. 4 5
Decided to try after many friends recommended. Portabello fries amazing! And unfortunately that's was the best part of the meal. Very disappointed with the rest. Porterhouse steak was ordered medium, came out almost well done & over salted. No one checked on how our steak was prepared. Brussels sprouts were very bitter and not properly prepared. Didn't even want to chance desert. 3 2
Headed here after a night at the movies after spotting it on the drive by.The prices are pretty standard for an asian dessert place, so when the total came to more than $30 it wasn't much of a surprise.Ordered the Matcha Sago with Red Bean and Mochi (~$6.45), Black Glutinous Rice with Mochi, Mango, and Coconut Milk (~$6.45), Mango Sago with Coconut Jelly and Mango (~$5.45), Mango Slush (~$5), Curry Fish/Beef Balls- 6 pcs (~$5), and Glutinous Rice Balls with Peanut and Syrup- 5 or 6 pcs (~$3.45).The taste overall for each of these items wasn't bad; was pretty good and not too the sweet. The matcha sago was a little bland, but oh well just won't order it next time. The mochi could have been a little better, because with these desserts I was expecting the boiled kind of mochi but they use the mochi you find at the toppings bar at frozen yogurt self-serve places. A little disappointed about that, but will also know to not order stuff with mochi in it next time.But the problem with each of them (minus the fish balls and the rice balls with peanut of course) was that they WEREN'T COLD ENOUGH. They were honestly only a little under room temperature, and that made them a lot less enjoyable than they could have been.But other than that, not bad at all! They don't seat many people but I go a seat right away on a weeknight. May come back again. 3 2
I've been going to Presto for about two months now. The guys do a great job with gel nails. Great pedicures! 4 5
Ordered a large sausage pepperoni for pick up, ready in 25, pretty good, nothing to write to grandma about, but no complaints. 5/5 will be back 4 3
This is our second visit to Mexico Lindo. We came when it first opened years back.We ordered the calamari, but they don't have it today? So we are going with the shrimp at the suggestion of our server. The shrimp is our appetizer, I am having Chimichanga and hubby having the tacos for our main course.The shrimps are delicious! They come with bread that is basically garlic bread, I think plain bread would be better. Big jumbo shrimps in a little bit spicy sauce, very good!Our main courses were good also. 3 4
Great food at reasonable prices, good service and great classy atmosphere. Simply delicious choices with special seasonal options. There soup was delicious and the flat bread was great. There scallops were cooked perfect  and risotto was cooked perfect. Will look forward to next visit. Every thing I have tasted at this restaurant was absolutely phenomenal. 4 5
I am giving Vine two stars because the atmosphere was great and the food, once we received it was good. We had a reservation for Mother's Day so we expected it to be busy and a little slower. What we experienced was terrible service and a restaurant that was completely unprepared. We started out good and ordered drinks and an appetizer for the table. Some drinks arrived but we were told they were out of the appetizer. We then ordered our food and noticed my parents never received their water. We asked for their water and then after a reasonable amount a time a server came out and put a plate in front of my mother. It was what she ordered. Another server then came a took it away giving it to the table next to us because that is where it was supposed to go. 30 minutes after we ordered our food had not yet arrived. The manager came over and apologized and suggested we order some desserts on the house. The server and manager must not have communicated well because he then came and told us lunch was on them. He was wrong. Our food finally arrived and it was good. We had to ask for several missing items that were never brought out. My husbands water glass was never refilled so he started drinking mine. We waited a long time for them to finally bring us dessert menus. We ordered three desserts for our group of 7 and asked for the check since we were tired of waiting. The server finally noticed my husband needed water and said he would bring it. He never did. Twenty minutes later our server reappeared to tell us they were out of one of the desserts. We said we didn't need any dessert and just wanted the check. It arrived with desserts on the bill as well as three extra beverages that we did not order. The check was finally fixed and we were given two desserts to go for our trouble. I hardly think it was compensation. Lunch took us over two hours. Management should have been more proactive and apologetic. 2 1
Went back 2nd time very good again my date had the Salmon I had a meatball  Calzone great sauce  will be back 5 4
Justine has an amazing eye and is a very talented photographer...I will admit that! Unfortunately, I think my experience with her may not be the norm for all of her clients but I was very disappointed with the lack of service through the ordering process. I received my proofs, placed my order and made payment within 24 hours....very excited to receive my photos and then came the wait....longer than expected, received no responses to my emails and I finally had to place a hold on my payment to get her attention.Not what I call a good experience and unfortunately won't use her again because of it. However, the photos she did take that I did end up eventually getting are beautiful. I think she had bit off more than she could chew with the Groupon deal she participated in.It's too bad...I was really looking for a new photographer! 3 2
Great food and very attentive service.  The mushroom ravioli was to die for and the Talapia was very tasty.  Highly recommend this restaurant. 4 5
I don't understand why this restaurant has such bad reviews. I live next door so I pick up food fairly often. Everything I've tried has been really tasty. (General Tao, shrimp in lobster sauce, noodles, sushi...) 4 3
The vibe in this place is unwelcoming. The service was bad because most of the workers acted like they didn't want to be there. They don't portion it right and they give you attitude when you ask for anything different. The food was alright. 3 2
They do an excellent job here and I was very satisfied with the end result of my nails. However, they definitely find every way to make an extra buck. Which is okay, as long as they let the customer know. I came in asking for all matte black nails and one silver nail. I knew the matte would cost a few extra bucks but I didn't care. But what I didn't know is that she was going to use a gel polish for my silver nail without asking me first, when I know they have regular polish in silver, therefore charging me an extra $25 or so for one nail per hand. 3 2
Went here after playing golf with some friends.  A friend used to go there with his dad.  I was pleasantly surprised and will be back again.   The beer mugs were super ice cold!!!   I would describe it as a traditional Mariscos place that I would frequent on special occasions growing up in Mexico.   By no means is it fancy but it is clean and service is good.   I had the ceviche and mixed tostadas were very good!  With an ice cold beer... does not get any better.   Will be the new place after golf. 4 3
While in the end we did not purchase an Audi, we had a great experience at this dealership. Our sales associate Ben was knowledgeable, friendly, and enthusiastic about the product. I didn't feel pressured during the process and he was more than willing to answer any and all questions/concerns via email and phone. If you're in the market for an Audi definitely check out Audi of Mississauga. 4 5
I have always found this store clean,friendly and well stocked. The only complainet I have is they are understaffed but thats trure of most places however the folks where are there go out of their way to help.I have been shopping this store since it opened and they are GREAT. 5 4
We were really disappointed here.  It took 70 minutes from checking in to getting our entree - 10 minutes of that was waiting in the bar.  The salad (organic greens) took forever to be served.  My husband's filet was tasteless - we've had better from Costco.  My scallops were very good, but were served cold.  When we left, no one said thank you or goodbye  Save your $$ and go elsewhere. 2 1
Fun for kids to see the ducks, turtles and fish but this place is a trainwreck. Had fond memories, but the last time I was there was 16 years ago. I remember it being yummy and a fun place to go. Unfortunately, it is now old and dirty, very dirty. They should close for a few weeks just to clean and maybe paint.  Had the fish taco special, was supposed to be mahi, it was a formed fish stick with fillers. Really bad. Tomatillo salsa had no tomatillo flavor. Actually nothing had much flavor. Two stars only because the pond makes it interesting, though it was gross and green. 2 3
Didn't love my pedi. The massage was nice on the legs but my polish was rushed and I had to go home and clean up the edges with polish remover. I won't likely go back. 2 3
Been here twice, and I must say, the service has improved. Food is good. Had pizza, wings and cheese sticks. The manager came up to me and asked for suggestions on how to make my experience better. I let him know my suggestions and he took them into consideration. Will return soon. 3 4
My husband & I were in Vegas last week (9/8-9/11) and we had dinner at this restaurant Friday night. This is one of the restaurants inside Wynnhttp://www.wynnlasvegas.com/#dining/bartolotta/The staff was really nice and we were seated right away even though we did not have a reservation. Their specialty is seafood - most of which flown in daily, majority from Italy and the mediterranean.  They show you the fish cart (fresh of course on ice)-explain where it came from, how they cook it, etc. They also have very good bread - 5 kinds that they serve you prior to your meal order.  If you want a sommelier to help you select your wine, he's there also.  We ordered a pretty good size fish (from Italy) white meat, tender and when it arrived, served table-side:  removed the bones and served it with the richest and smoothest mashed potatoes and fresh, sauteed vegetables.  We had appetizers also prior our meal and both fantastic. The dessert was equally wonderful! I should have taken photos with my iphone so you can see how beautiful they present their food.This is definitely a place we will go back to when in Vegas - the prices are reasonable.Great food and great service - that's a winner in my book! 4 5
My friend was getting married in Las Vegas over the Memorial Day holiday and instead of having everyone spend a fortune at the fancy strip hotels, she picked the Tuscany, so everyone was able to get a good rate.I was traveling with another one of my friend's and her husband and we got to the hotel around 2 p.m.  We waited in line to check in and asked if we could check in early.  We were told that the room that they held for us were given to people that stayed longer and that our rooms were not guaranteed, even though we booked them about a year in advance.  That makes no sense whatsoever.  We told her we were part of a wedding party that had blocked a bunch of rooms, but they still didn't care.  When they said they had 2 rooms available, the rooms were in 2 separate buildings away from where the bride had wanted us to stay.  We told the lady where we wanted to stay and she said come back in a hour and they should be ready.We came back exactly an hour later, only to be told they weren't ready yet.  The lady had us sit and wait 20 more minutes while she waited on a call back to make sure the rooms were clean.  They also had one room with a King bed and one room with 2 doubles, even though my friend and I had both booked rooms with King beds.  I let her have the King room, but once again, what's the point of reserving a room, if you aren't going to get what you asked for.My room was okay.  I didn't have problems like my friend had with the sink and safe.  I did not like that you could hear people above you walking or running.  That was really loud.  Also, even though there are shades to keep the light out, it was still bright once the sun started to rise and that made me wake up way earlier than I wanted to.After the first day, my room was not cleaned by 3:00 p.m.  When I was getting ready to meet my friends, the cleaning lady came back around 3:30 p.m. and I told her I will be leaving soon and to come back.  On the day I was leaving, she knocked on my door at 9:00 a.m. to see when she could clean my room and I told her I was leaving today.  Shouldn't she know that?The food at the Mexican restaurant and Marilyn's Cafe was just so-so.  We only ate there b/c there was noting else, but it wasn't that great.  I would have gone somewhere else, if there was something else close by.The bar in the lobby would have been okay if it wasn't for the jazz music.  I'm not a fan of jazz and did not want to hear it.  Also, the prices for drinks in that bar are ridiculous!!!  My friend and I ordered Shirley Temple's, which consist of Sprite and cherry flavor and they cost $4 each!!!!!!!!  What the heck!?  Also, a small bottle of water, about half the size of a regular bottle, was $4!!!  That is so ridiculous!The pool was probably the only thing that wasn't that bad.  We were able to get lounge chairs both times we went to the pool.  I know people I was with were annoyed with the one waitress that was going around getting drink and food orders.  She was taking forever on some things and even gave food to the wrong people.  On my last day, I had checked out and wanted to spend a few hours at the pool.  I went into the bathroom to change and I came out and put my stuff on the counter.  The cleaning lady was in there staring at me with an annoyed look, so I asked her if I was in her way.  She rudely said yes and I asked her if I should move to one side or something and she huffed out saying, something about coming back.  So uncalled for!!When it was time to leave, we asked the bellman to get us a cab and he waited about 10-15 mins until he called for one, which of course made us late to get to the airport.I definitely won't be staying at this hotel again.  I appreciate that my friend picked a  place to help all the wedding guests save money, but it was an awful experience. 2 1
Love this place! Sometimes it is so hard to find a fun, comfortable, friendly and clean restaurant that can accommodate my kids (who eat meat) and my husband and I (who are vegan). This place is perfection! And since we are skipping the meat the husband and I we can get a roll for $3.95? Get the heck out of here!  Edamame and a cucumber salad for less then $2 each. We went wild on rolls and sides and still spent way less then we would have at someplace less healthy or interesting. If you are shy of ordering then check out the menu online and walk in with it written down what you wants.. also the website has a great feature that allows you to build your roll and check the nutritional value of it. I can't even tell you how much I appreciate that! The people were friendly, helpful and nice. The place was spotless. I think we are going to make it Sushi Sunday and go every week. Can't wait now for the weekend. 4 5
I have been going to this place for years since high school and always go to Stanley. I've had a bunch of different hair cuts through the years from short bob to straight perm to mid length to dyed caramel... I've always trusted Stanley to do a good job and if I go home and don't love the cut, I can always come in the next day for him to fix it free of charge. They have a great selection of recent Japanese magazines to flip through to get inspired as well! 4 5
After my bad review, I got a personal email from the owner acknowledging my comments and sincerely apologizing.  Wow, that was the first time this has happened to me.  I didn't respond, but instead just made my way back in, anonymously.  So, I still love the crab cakes and Mary and Nikki are even better than before and this time the whole place seemed to have a better vibe.  Was it my review?  NO!!! LOL.  Maybe I just spoke too soon on a new place in town.Being an older crowd in Fountain Hills (I am 15 years younger than almost all of my neighbors) it is an odd thing to have a DJ spinning on a weekend - but as fuddy duddy as I am for my age, doesn't mean it isn't just what the doctor ordered for some.John - thanks for reaching out to me.  I wish you the best with Fountini's and just know that you haven't lost my business. 4 5
One of the best Taco Bells I've been to. I came in around 1230 on a weekday, and it wasn't busy at all. I placed my order and went to wash my hands..by the time I came my food was ready. So you know how you'll take a bite of your food and the contents fall out of the opposite end? Well that's what happened with my beef chalupa (that's a good thing). The food was fresh and they weren't skimpy with the meat or anything lol. Customer service was good as well. No complaints! 5 4
This is the place for breakfast and brunch slash comfort food. Every week they have a unique flavor of potted bread which is offered as a side to most entrees.  I like the omelette selection.  The wait staff is attentive and very nice. At peak hours there's usually a short 15-30min wait for a table. I like to burn time at Dead Poets Used Bookstore also located in the same strip mall. 5 4
I F*CKING LOVE BJ'S!  No pun intended. The restaurant is great too. The service is fantastic, but then again, who can say no to BJ's? The food is pretty damn good and the beer selection is awesome. Really though, I always feel treated right, the staff is awesome. The bar tenders are actually pretty cool and personable even when they're busy. Anyone who's read my reviews knows by now, that if it's a good review it's gonna be short and sweet, but my bad reviews are gonna be LONG and very descriptive. This place got the formula right. Great food, great atmosphere, great people, great beer, great desserts, terrible parking lot. The best places always have the worst parking lots. 5 4
Forget Dunkin' Donuts, where the donuts are the only thing not worth eating, this is the real deal.  A neighborhood donut shop, for reals.  Do the time warp.  Seriously, do it!  Because this place will take you back in time to when donuts were made by...people!First, peruse the nicely varied selection of donuts and other pastries. Then, sidle up to the counter and give your order to the somewhat surly, but efficient server.  Finally, your heaping box of doughy goodness home or take a seat amongst the chatting oldsters.  If you're prone to Homer Simpson style drooling, check yourself.  What are you waiting for?  Get yourself a donut, or three. 5 3
I like this fry's but hate the starbucks in this store. normally do not write reviews but I am surprised by how HORRIBLE the customer service is here. I used to work at starbucks and know a thing or two about the drinks but am not too picky since everything is fairly good. I have ordered at this location probably 4 times since it is convenient in the frys I shop at. I've received a couple wrong drinks but I've never said anything because it was small things like passion tea instead of passion tea lemonade and I like almost all starbucks drinks so nothing to make a fuss about. They are pretty slow but again, not worth the confrontation. But today, the service was appauling. My husband and I wanted some breakfast to hold us over while grocery shopping. I ordered a pepperoni and tomato foldover. After waiting I received a breakfast sandwich. I politely asked if I could get the foldover instead. Being pregnant now, my cravings and food aversions are pretty specific so while I would normally just take the hit and eat what I got, I wanted what I ordered today. The girl took my sandwich back and said she would give me the foldover.  I started shopping and left my husband to grab it for me. I waited a little bit to open my bag as I was busy shopping and also know the pastries can be super hot out of the starbucks oven. When I did get to my bag, I realized they had now given me a spinach foldover. Being almost done with my shopping at this point, I went to just get my money back. The gentleman that I spoke to asked the previous girl about how I had been given the wrong thing, to which she responded that they just don't have the pepperoni and tomato foldover. The man responded by saying what I thought was common sense..THAT IF YOU DONT HAVE THE THING I ORDERED, TO ASK IF I WANT SOMETHING ELSE INSTEAD OF JUST GIVING ME SOME RANDOM THING. The gentleman then said that they have a chorizo sandwich. I explained that I wanted the pepperoni foldover before, not a chorizo sandwich. he responded by saying, well we've never had that...like I should've known this somehow. I explained I was just ordering off the sign in the display case! He then reluctantly gave me cash back. Never NEVER again. After working in many customer service jobs including starbucks,  I have to say this is one of the worst experiences I have had. 3 1
Brio is always a happy dining experience.  For this specific location, I've only been for happy hour, but I don't see how their regular menu would differ from their location at Town Square.  Their happy hour must be one of the best!  They have a list of items for $2.95.  Don't let the price fool you though.  Their portions are decent sized.  We always order one of everything, and maybe even two of some other things.  (Don't judge us!!)  How could you not though?  Cheap, good food is so hard to pass up!Their service is always amazing.  They check several times to make sure everything is okay and refill drinks before it is necessary. 5 3
The food is okay, though pricey. They know they are one of few choices for a resort, and the service reflects it. They wait staff could really care less. 2 3
I have been coming here for the past four years or so, and it has been hit-or-miss most of the time.As far as nail techs, Dani is the best, hands-down. She's booked up pretty often, but well worth it. She has the most amazing attention to detail and can do a French manicure by hand like no one else! I just love her manicures/pedicures and her friendly personality. However, I have also gone to another tech a few times for pedicures and manicures, and won't be able to recommend her. She has left my polish streaky and the sides of my nails bare on more than one occasion. Her specialty might be acrylics and gels, but that doesn't excuse the fact that she can't give a decent mani/pedi. Not worth the price if it ain't done right.I have visited one of the estheticians there quite a few times, and she can also be iffy. When I go in for a brow wax, she doesn't always ask me what I want - just goes right to it, and sometimes goes way too thin. I had to learn to speak up about what I wanted. Don't get me wrong, she's incredibly sweet and mostly professional, but some aspects of her work don't sit well with me.Another esthetician I had a year or two ago gave me a terrible facial - the worst ever. She was careless and the facial was bland and basic. And, get this - she was TEXTING!! While I was in the room, trying to relax during my facial! Thank goodness she is no longer at the spa... I wonder why.Overall, the staff is friendly and much less snobby than most spas, but the quality of the treatments is not on par with the price. The facility is cute and recently expanded, but the rooms are still a little small. I've watched with disappointment as their prices have risen over the years, and it's caused me to seek out other places, despite the fact that I live down the street a short distance.To summarize - go see Dani for your nails, and you won't regret it. I'd comment on their hair department, but every stylist I've seen is no longer with the salon. Hmm. The esthetics department is decent, but I won't go out of my way to get services there. I have yet to try any medspa or laser services, but I'm considering checking out their laser technician in the future. If Total Bliss would make some improvements to the quality of their technicians and services, I would probably change my mind about them. 3 2
The Oyster Po Boy is the Bomb!! My husband and I were down in NC and had lunch here. The restaurant lives up to its great reputation. 4 5
This restaurant is way, way, way too casual and  unprofessional. I ordered a several items which were fine but then sushi roll, and a bug literally walked casually off my plate onto my napkin. I showed it to the bartender and the bartender said  "that is just a fruit fly. It goes after sweet food". Really?!   This time I got a whole new order sushi, and I took it to go. She said she was gonna tell a manager And the bartender said to me we went ahead and took it off of your bill As if they were doing me a favor. Never apologized. Then waited over 20 minutes for my replacement. Too long. I have visited over a dozen P F Chang's  around the country. This one is too reliant on traffic and people could literally fall from the casino into the restaurant. So I don't think they care about service or professionalism given they have so much easy traffic. May need to retrain some staff. 2 1
I'm in Pittsburgh at least twice a month and The Proper is my go-to place.  The pizza is very, very good and the bacon candy should be illegal  (in a good way).  The really large draft beer selection is worth the trip by itself. 5 4
I have to say, despite all the glowing reviews I found this place to be totally mediocre. I love love love Thai food, so I was very excited to give it a shot. I had a fish Tom Yum Kha soup to start ($4.95), which was tiny and not very flavourful, except for being too sweet. For me the whole point of ordering that soup is the rich coconutty base, but alas, I couldn't taste the coconut at all.Next up was vegetable Pad Prik Khing ($12.95) which is is a kind of spicy (not really) thin red curry sauce. It was ok, but nothing special. The vegetables (only broccoli and cauliflower... really?) were a bit over cooked as well. The sticky rice was sticky rice, what can I say?That said, I'm hoping I just tried the wrong dishes this time and will try it again. The floor seating area looked too cozy to not check out another time! 3 2
Pros: Cost, breakfast, front desk staff, internet, dog friendly, fast internetCons: Housekeep, garage passage to the hotel, not so many good options to eat near aroundIs the private parking lot enough to accommodate all the guests? NoOn April 2012, I reserved a room for 2 nights because I had some appointments to attend on Toronto. The room that I got was small but not bad. Even not having some good options to eat near around, the localization of it stills good. Because I the only time that I needed to use my car again, was only to leave the hotel. It was very accessible to get the public transportation from there to anywhere that I wanted to go.The front desk service was friendly and nice and the breakfast offered much more options to eat that I am used to have from other hotels that I stayed on Toronto. Unfortunately, when we said to the housekeeper that we don't want our room cleaned she started to question us when we were planning to leave and that we need to notify the front desk for that. (Note: we were on the middle of our 2 nights stay) This point upset me a little.Overall, with the exclusion of the housekeeper moment, I liked so much the hotel and I am planning to stay there again next time I visit Toronto. And if you are planning to go there too, my recommendation to you is: leave all the luggage on the hotel lobby. Because if you try to use the corridor that connects the garage to the hotel it is not an easy thing to do because the doors are heavy and maybe you need to go back to the garage sometimes to get everything. 4 3
This place really grossed me out. I had ordered a fresh coconut drink but never even took a sip when it came after seeing the waitress grab the ice cubes with her bare hands and tossing them into my drink. A waitress who handles money, cleans tables and takes away dirty dishes should NOT directly touch your food and drinks with her bare hands. This is how disease spreads.I was a good sport and decided not to complain because I'm not one to complain before my food arrives, if you know what I mean. A minute into my bun cuon, I pulled out a thick black hair. The food was mediocre. The place was comfortable because the air conditioner gave the place a nice breeze. The staff were generally pretty nice, despite the nasty surprises, which is why I'm not giving them a 1 star. But they really need to be more hygienic. 2 1
Love this place! It's just so good and fresh. Not too salty or heavy on the sauces. Have gotten take out each time, never have eaten in there. But, the bartender is awesome. My faves are the Butternut Squash Ravioli and the Spinach and Ricotta Cheese Ravioli. My bestie loves their linguini and clams. They load those clams on there! 4 5
Delicious! Seriously never had a better breakfast. The only reason it isn't 5 stars is because the female server was rude and abrupt. I noticed the other staff members were extremely friendly, but she was not. 4 3
Had a great waitress and is not to blame for a poorly run restaurant.  We've been here before and love the food. Food still good when you finally get it. When we entered restaurant we were told there would be a 15 minute wait. There were empty tables but they didn't have wait staff to service them. Our service was very slow and we got our entree before the salad. Granted there could be problems but why put it on the wait staff to explain everything.  Where's the manager? Will not return. Lots of other options in Surprise now for Italian. 2 1
I've been going here for years simply because of Heidi, she is amazing and super friendly. The reason I'm taking away two stars is because of how rude the front desk staff is. I've considered leaving just so I don't have to deal with their attitudes. The only reason I'm staying is due to the knowledge and care of Heidi. She goes above and beyond and I highly recommend her... if you can manage to look past how you are treated by the other employees. 3 2
I love getting the bean and cheese burrito. Honestly that's all I get from here. The two times I've been to this location however, it's taken over 15 min to gets through the drive thru. Don't go through unless you have extra time. 2 3
I was introduced to Sunrise Coffee by a friend of mine. We'll just call him Shmorey Smurratt.  The most hipstering, skinny jean wearin, never heard of his music havin, indie book readin, fingerless glove using, riding a bike to school, taking close up pictures in weird angles, film school student being, messy hair and beard having, thrift store shoppin and super elitist i know.Well, he told me this place was good. I tried it. He was right. 5 2
Sorry folks      they officially closed their door the weekwnd.    So you have to go to the Danforth for Thier amazing  gyros.   Most of the friendly staff  will also move there 3 5
Family owned.  Inexpensive. I call my order in and its ready in ten minutes.      Internet jukebox..  nice employees.   Ten times better than competition 5 4
Imagine those hardware stores you see on tv / movies where the you can go and know that you will get reliable help, well Rolliers is that place. The concept of customer service and expertise is not something of a past era. I have been here more than a dozen times for reasons and I have never left disappointed. I walked in with door knob pieces for a 100 year old door - not only did they know exactly what I was looking for, they had dozens to choose from to make sure that I had the exact ones I needed. I could only imagine the look of bewilderment that I would get if I walked into that big orange or blue "home centers" with the same questions. I have gone back since and will continue to go back over and over again because I trust what I am told when I ask questions - something that is hard to find these days. Yeah, some of the items might be a little more costly (not much from my experience) but that extra pays for customer service that you don't get from someplace that is concerned with shareholder profits. I would rather pay a little more and know that I am getting what I need for the job the first time rather than wasting my time over and over again. 5 1
I have to respectfully disagree with the first reviewer.  I had dinner at Asian Monsoon tonight and the food was really not good at all.I was with my daughter so I wanted something not spicy to share with her. It was clear in my questioning of the server that their sauces come in cans/bottles/vats because there was no chance of adjusting spiciness.  Her advice was to stick to something with no "chili pepper" symbol next to it.  Fair enough.  So I ordered ginger chicken.  The saving grace was that the chicken appeared to be white meat and the veggies were fresh, but it was exceptionally bland.  No hint of ginger, not even any salt.  Just a corn-starch thickened sauce (sauce being a generous word for the gelatanous film covering my food).One of my fellow diners has a bad reaction to MSG, and without recapping the whole conversation it was clear there could be no guarantees about the omission of MSG from any meal.  No report back from my companion on her post-meal MSG status, but she commented that her dish was quite dry and bland.  That explains all the dipping in soy sauce.Thai cooking is known for its balance of flavors--a mix of savory, sweet, sour, salty.  The mango salad, which is typically sweet and sour with some vinegar, was pretty much just sweet.  It wasn't awful, just not good.The service was good and accommodating.  My toddler made the usual mess, and I did the usual hands-and-knees routine to make sure toddlers remain welcome in restaurants, and the server was super nice in insisting she would take care of it.  It's definitely the kind of place that has a cook, not a chef, in the kitchen.  If you're really, really hungry and it's the only place open you may find something passable.  One of my other companions was happy with his meal, though I can't recall what he ordered. 1 2
Came here for brunch. I thought it was super overpriced at $35. Good selection, but the food was pretty average overall. 2 3
Amber the bartender is awesome. Very nice and happy!  Plus the wings were super HOT unlike the other native I go to. I'll be back! 5 4
Okay, for starters I myself am Mexican and I cannot stress this enough. This is NOT Mexican food. It was so bad. The food was overpriced, everything was bombarded with onions and bell peppers. The service was super bad, took my mom 15 minutes to get a margarita and that was because she called a waitress and asked about it. There were about 4 other parties there, so I do not know what could take so long. The band that played tonight was BAD. I'm all for giving local bands a chance but this band just seemed like a bunch of 30 year old hipsters that needed to prove they could still be in a band. I don't like trashing places but this place was just not a good experience. their water was probably the best thing there. oh, and parking is expensive too, so good luck if you decide to come here. 1 2
I've been going to James for years and he does a really good haircut for a really good price. He delivers the sometimes odd descriptions of the type of haircuts I ask for - and I've worn it at all lengths and styles. I am a men's image consultant and I have sent my clients to James with good conscience, knowing that they'll get a great haircut for a great price.James rocks! 4 5
I hope management reads this... and our rating of the service is NOT about our waitress, Ms C - she was AWESOME!!! our complaint and it just set the tone - a bad vibe for sure was arriving 7:20 for 7:30 reservations... Very very long line at front check in, but hey it was a Saturday night... we get to the hostess stand and are told that they do not have a reservation for us and that it will be an hour wait... I told "Biotch #1" that I had a confirmation and she said that there was no reservation... then she said oh, our reservation is for 9:30 and that it would be an hour... I showed her the confirmation on my iphone... no matter, what was in the computer was what it was... I was furious!"Biotch #2" before she became a biotch 2 tells  biotch #1 to just change the reservation in the computer... wow problem solved yes - uh er no... in the meantime we see and hear other guests coming in with 7:45 reservations who get seated before us... WTF... really? I'm going postal now... Biotch #2 (who is now truly a biotch) says, they had earlier resi's than us... uh uh... I was standing right next to them and heard them check in... I would like to speak with the manager who I plead my case to, only to hear biotch #2 tell him that they have been trying to seat us and calling us but we didn't answer... FML really??? UGH set the night off to crappollazville...We get seated next and go to the back of the restaurant only to see 3 empty tables for two... that 2 of the 3 sat empty the rest of the night... OMG hello Management are you there??? What was the issue people?Ok, enough with the ranting... our server, Ms C was awesome... smart, funny, whitty... Food was perfect! We finally settled in and put the horrendous hostess f;up behind us and enjoyed a great meal... Notice we're not spending a lot of time talking about the food... Why, cuz it was Lawry's perfect! Somebody should have seen me eating off the bone, cuz it was not very gentlemanly... it was carnivorous.. Very reasonable prices when as it is off strip... Reasonable compared to hotel prices btw...Note to Management... training 101... "Oh, we're terribly sorry for the simple mistake Mr. F... here, we will have a table in just a few moments... thank you so much for your patience... "Note to Upper Management... fire lower management and the hostesses... 1 2
Decent prices for street food. The seating area is somewhat limited during peak dining times. It really irks me when groups of people come in and snag a table before ordering despite the long line. The seating issue would probably be better if they had a rule to order before sitting. Pork bowl was really good. Coffin toast is cute, but I was expecting a more robust flavor. Squid balls are a nice side. 4 3
Yummmmmy, a little pricy folks but the toppings on the burger, the bun, those fry things, etc all very very good. Still mayhem with the new store in town but wow yum!!! I tried Carl's in Idaho a  few years ago & Penticton a couple years ago and very good burgers. You order your burger exactly how you like it including toppings and then find a place to sit if you can and they bring it out to you - it's as fresh as fresh can get, no sitting under a heat lamp here! Yummy :) 5 4
Food was Great. I order Lamb CousCous and my friend ordered Duck. It was rally good. Well cooked and delicious. The waiter was awesome. so friendly and kind 5 4
I parked somewhere I shouldn't have parked, and got towed. Ugh, my bad. But the experience actually was way better than I expected. Howard and his apprentice offered to pick me up and take me to their shop, since they were in the neighborhood, which saved me quite a hassle. He was professional and friendly (we had some time to kill as we went thru rush hour traffic) and I couldn't ask for anything more. 4 5
Fabulous!!  Expensive, yes, but sooo worth it!  My friends and I make sure to schedule at least half a day here whenever we go to Vegas.  The Swedish massage is just heavenly.  I love the personal attention we receive when we go.  They have roman baths, hot, warm and cold ones.  There is also a huge hot tub, a sauna, steamroom, and my favorite - the arctic room.  i call it the snow globe room because its shaped like an igloo and has moisturizer bubbles "snowing" from the ceiling. 4 5
I've been coming here for a long time as it's the closest one. I must say that it's dirty and gross. The pool always something if it's a bandaid or just a fluff of dirt, it's always gross. There is nothing interesting in the pool. Very boring. Though it's a good time if you have good peopleThey do have a gym and workout room. It's always crowded in the workout room and you can never find a treadmill. The gym is full ALSO but there are some pretty chill people there. They added a piano upstairs which is nice. And I adore the jugo juice too. Though the library has outdated book but still good reads. Overall it's not the best place as it's also pretty expensive and boring but if you are looking for a place to just chill, Vivo is your place 2 3
I can honestly say Yay! I'm a fan.  The food is various and tasty.  The portions are correct, and priced accordingly.  I do find the 59 Cents for the soup mix-ins is a little pricy, but the soup doesn't need anything.  I think I may be cheating on my husband with the Thai Lobster Curry soup.If I could change anything, it would be for the staff to just chill out.  When I go, I have someone open the door for me, ask me if I need a menu, then the salad person is all chipper, etc.  Really.  Please chill.  You're freaking me out, man. 4 3
ProsPrompt and friendly staff.Great Menu SelectionColeslaw is goodConsI had the special (2pc Halibut). It was terrible. Dry and Rubbery.Far too overpriced for the quality of food ($20)Sides were unimpressive. 1 2
Only been here once, but the food was excellent. I tried their pizza and salad, and my taste buds were on fire! Original taste, fresh and homemade Italian food. The staff were awesome too. Love the quaint location and atmosphere. Definitely coming back again! 4 5
Had the Hoover Dam tour.  The tour of inside the facility were done by the local guides who are not affiliated with Pink Jeep.  We basically got dropped off with the new guides, picked up when we were done, and walked around on the outside of the Dam.Pros: Friendly tour guide - accommodating, eager to answer questionsCons: Uncomfortable suspension on the car; at $86 per person, it lacked some value, especially since most of the tour was done by the local guides ($30 per person and $7 parking if you go there yourself), got separated from the group because the guide wasn't part of the inside tour to help keep everyone together. 3 4
Over all I like it, but its not going to be my main grocery run. I like having all the organic options, especially for the produce, beans and grains. I hate the parking situation, and their prices are significantly higher than I expect, even for organic. 3 2
(I was a tourist to Vegas and came with about 10 guys) Don't expect to get served if you come in at 4am.  We left because they didn't want to serve us.  Didn't take any order for drinks or food.  Didn't even bother to properly seat us.  Just grabbed the menus and placed it on the table without telling us to follow.  When we asked if we were suppose to be seated, he gave a light nod so it was hard to tell what he wanted us to do.  His communication skills was lacking as if he didn't want us there.   After 15 minutes of being ignored, we left.  I don't know what their problem was but if you're going to open a restaurant until 5:30 am in the morning, you should treat all guest like they are wanted there.  Don't be surprised if any of the other 10 guys from my group rates your restaurant with a 1 star. 1 2
On time and reasonable service fees.  Seems to listen to what customer wants and knows what he's doing.  Quite friendly but professional.  Also seems thorough but takes his time; for the work he did for me, could've taken about 20 minutes at the most, since he basically fixed the drip by exchanging parts in the faucet but ended up spending an hour.  Just a note; he charges a separate visit fee in addition to his hourly rate. I didn't complain since when I called him I thought it was for a bigger problem and turned out it was nothing.  Overall, it wasn't a bad experience. 3 2
Review for Large Groups (15-20)If you make a reservation for a large group here, be prepared to wait a very long time in order for them to put tables together. Also be prepared to be very hungry since they will take their time to prepare all the steaks and serve them together.Food: The steak was fine. After waiting so long though, I could have probably eaten shoe leather dipped in au jus and would have been happy. For the price I paid, I wish I could tell you that it was the best steak I ever had, but it wasn't. Service: Man, these guys are great, except when they have to serve a large group. There will be miscommunications that will lead to overcharges. Should you be so brave as to go in a large group, I recommend placing one person in charge of communicating with one waiter, after everybody orders initially. Ambiance & Decor: It was dark and I was way too hungry to take note of it and to care.Summary:Food: Steak. Service: Get it together, people. Ambiance & Decor: Hungry people don't care. I would not recommend the experience of eating here in a large group, but if you do, please make sure you have effective communication with the wait staff. 3 2
This place doesn't seem to know what it is and has taken on too many things, all of which are done poorly. The food is bland and tasteless and overpriced. $6 for a mediocre latte? The market carries a random assortment of useless iyems. Avoid. I hope it closes and a better restaurant takes the good location. 1 2
Excellent food and very nice extended menu for veggies. I tried majority of pasties here and liked lot of them. Chicken tikka pasty is my favorite. Pesto and rosemary chickens are also my favorite. Cream of Tomato with croutons is by far one of the best soup I had. Chocolate Bread and Butter Pudding formerly known as Temple pudding  is heavenly and must  try. 4 5
Let me start by saying I love the food here! However, I came at 2:30 in the afternoon, the restaurant was practically empty, yet it took over 10 minutes to order and pay for my food. I go to find a table and literally, every table needed to be cleaned! I get my drink and utensils, and there are no forks stocked. Then after I was done with my meal, the garbage cans were overflowing and I couldn't throw my trash away! The cleanliness and customer service and terrible. 3 1
Had the curry bowl today with saag paneer and beef madras, plus naan. The whole wheat naan was not bad for whole wheat and was lightly toasted to warm up. Saag paneer was delicious, but wish there was more cheese pieces in there. beef was tender with nice spice. 3 4
I'm from Cincinnati but working in Cleveland and was searching for a "sushi" buffet.  Regrettably this was the 5th entry and shame on me for not looking closely enough at the description.  Needless to say, upon arriving I was terribly disappointed to find no sushi.  Just an average chinese buffet.  The hot and sour soup was good.  The eggrolls, not so much.  The selection of entrees was good and everything was reasonably well presented but nothing really stirred my imagination.  So, I had stir fry prepared on the mongolian grille, which - despite having only 5 sauces and a very limited selection of veggies - wasn't too bad.  All-in-all, if chinese is how your pleasure tends, then you probably won't be disappointed.  However, if it's sushi you seek: look elsewhere. 2 3
Very small family run restaurant... with not much uniqueness of dishes. Ordered many "different" foods just to find out that they were all the same as in they used the same sauce in every dish and stir fried everything. The only significant difference i could see was they they used different vegetables... other than that... they all tasted the same. A LOT of MSG was also used in their foods which made my mother sick. I will definetly not be going back. Worst Vegetarian Experience. 2 1
I used to love Magpie but the last two times I've been there it just hasn't been the same. The pizza is way too salty. Most of my party agreed but that wasn't the worst of it. The service was so bad, it really put a damper on the evening. Our waitress brought us our food and then we never saw her again. She never once came by to check on us. It took way too much time and effort to wave her over so we could order some dessert. Once again she brought the dessert and left us never to return. We finally had it, put on our coats and went to the cash to pay. This has happened to us twice now. Don't think I'll be going back. 2 1
Good kulcha...chat is good but not as good as the regular thali dishes. Friendly staff. 4 3
Must echo Brian O. about the lack of circulation in the booth area. Not good when the temp is 113 degrees, no matter how many times the server refills your water. By the way, our service was good and efficient, and we liked the guacamole prepared tableside. Also, we liked the many vegetarian options and the way the shrimp tacos were prepared. I hardly ever venture out to Glendale, but at least now I know of a decent Mexican restaurant there. 3 4
I've had a plain pizza and a lamb gyro, both good. As they market the coffee too, I thought I'd stop in for a cup. I ordered a small iced coffee and waited for over 10 minutes for it. Not sure how it would have gone had I ordered a more complicated espresso drink. Stick to ordering food here. 3 2
Their turkey club croissant is amazing. Such a good lunch stop! 4 5
Thumbs Up is a good place to enjoy some Korean cuisine if you're not looking for fancy surroundings. It's sparse where the kitchen takes about  1/4 of the restaurant, so overall the place can hold about 20 people.I ordered the Pork Bone from here and found it to be okay but definitely not the best as people have stated before me (beef was tender but I thought the broth could have been more flavoured). I assume what's good about this place that keeps people coming back for more are the huge portions, low prices and super friendly staff. Dishes are about $5 - $7 each and a side of kimchi and pickled daikons are always refillable.Yup, A great place for a cheap fixed meal. 3 4
Very cool place, they've decorated well. It's the type of ambiance you'd expect from a plateau restaurant. Good diversity of foods and cocktails, service has always been good for me (been there 4 times). Great for brunch ! 3 4
The other location has seemed to close, (noticed while walking to pizza place next door) saw that coming! Don't waste your time over paying for this food. Not very good customer service either! 1 2
What does an IB do when are owed more on a partial casino/hotel than they can sell it for.... they run it themselves. Good luck DB AG! 4 2
777 is all you need to know when visiting Mr. Lucky's.I had heard from a friend about this off the menu deal that gave me a steak, 3 shrimp skewers, and some mashed potatoes, BOMB.com for the $7.77 price tag.  AND there's nothing a little A1 and ketchup couldn't fix. For what it is, I can't complain.  You get a whole lotta bang for not a lotta bucks.   I say you pocket the savings and go help support the local dance bars, win win for all. 4 1
We enjoyed our Red Rock Canyon tour with Casino Travel & Tours.  Our tour guide was Jerry- he made sure we were all comfortable, and he told us lots of fun facts during the six-hour tour.  I personally think that going on a guided tour was better than renting a car and driving out.  Since it was our first time in Vegas, our guide also gave us a lot of good advice about how to get around in Vegas and some good spots to check out.  I would recommend this company! 4 5
This is review #1 in my Summer of 2011 Search for the Best Burger. It's Saturday and at 12:01 PM, we are already lined up at the Priest. It's cozy, nuff said. The smell is great, just enough to start the salivation process. The fresh meat is nicely formed into balls up, as each serving awaits it's transformation. I chat with some other patrons, it must be my good looks, because others are asking me what this is and what that is. I reply quickly, I am a Burger Priest virgin. I order a double-double for my significant other and 'The Priest" for myself. Somehow this seems wrong, given my strict catholic upbringing and years as an alter boy. Then my world is shattered. The mushroom fryer is broken. OH THE HUMANITY. So I opt for the double-double and an order of fries. I go for tomatoe, onion and mayo. Let the burger sing it's own song people. It's juicy, the meat flavour is there. Nice crisp on the patty and a minimal bun. It's good, but where are the angels, the path to the white light? Still waiting. Could you and I make these burgers at home? Of course. Is this the holy trinity of meat, bun and add ons, as others have stated? Not in my opnion, or at least not yet. Are they good, absolutely. Eating out is not just about convenience, we are after all, social creatures. It's partially the experience and the thought that an individual at the stove will take our taste buds and our spirit to another level. I will be back at "The Priest" someday and am looking forward to giving them 5 stars. God willing. Namaste. 3 5
Go here now.Sit at the bar.Don't look at the menu.Order the fish tacos.Enough said, great quality, reasonable price, for an airport, one of the best I've had anywhere in NA. 4 5
Busy place, but they took me rather quickly and the lady did a great job on my pedicure 4 5
I had family over and my husband suggested Seafood City. To my surprise, there was now a food court area. The BBQ pork and chicken was absolutely delicious. I would recommend to try this. It reminded me when I was back home on Guam. That is how good it was. I also tried  a side dish with coconut milk and bamboo shoots.(I honestly forgot the name) but it was a dish that I haven't had in years. That was delicious too. 4 5
Food was great and beer selection was alright. Great place to watch the Panthers game. 4 3
I had been here before it's an ok buffet for dinner in Vegas. It's a good place for when you just get off the plane and are ready to eat.  Atmosphere is not really a good thing for Vegas was hoping for  a little more atmosphere for the price. 2 3
This place is an absolute gem of the bar scene in toronto. Incredibly hip and minimalist, with an almost claustrophobic atmosphere when full. That tight feeling however makes it feel warm and cozy, and with the dim lighting and walls adorned with signs and knick knacks this places charm has fully won me over. It takes some time to get your pint refilled, but the wait is worth it, with a sincerely eclectic lineup of both microbrews and classics. Hit up the atm, squeeze through the crowd, and sip down some tasty suds....this place cannot be missed 4 5
This was the first shop I decided to try wedding dresses at I had no idea what I wanted and i guess that if your a bride who doesn't know what you want or what your looking for this is not the best place to start the ladies were really helpful but having to pull dresses on your own is so overwhelming there we're so many dresses and they all looked the same I tried on about 5 dresses and sometimes found myself needing help to either put them on or take them off so that's another thing if you are going don't go alone and go with someone your comfortable with that can help you get in and out of the dresses overall I left there feeling overwhelmed and with the thought that I was not going to ever find a dress because I hated how I looked in each one of the ones I tried on I would say go here after you have gone to other places to look and know exactly what your looking for 3 2
Buy a mop, hire a janitor, please do something.  I love the food, drinks, location and vibe but I'm giving up after being a regular customer for 3 months!  It's gross.  Tables are sticky, railings and fixtures are covered in a thick layer of dust, the floors and stairs look like they have never been swept much less mopped.  Swarms of fruit flies around the dish return and trash cans.  Today the flies drove me to the competition and I won't be back. 1 2
I've been here dozens of times over the past few years. This place is good, but it has a few annoying qualities.Pros:The food is delicious. The prices are reasonable. The staff is friendly and efficient.  Also, the free peanuts are a plus.Cons:The buns at this location taste weird. I've eaten at other Five Guys locations and the buns at this one just plain taste weird. I don't know why.The tables are dirty. I don't like sitting down to a table smeared with someone else's cheeseburger-grease. This, plus the loud crappy music being blasted, means I'm not taking anyone here for a date, or on any kind of business lunch.It's dumb that they serve all hamburgers in a brown paper bag. I know it's probably part of some silly tradition, but the bag means that the tables get messy because you have to rip open the bag and grease goes everywhere. Also, the fries and bun get soggy inside the bag.  Note: this does not happen on a McDonald's tray.If the restaurant would change its dumb, backwards policy of serving all food in ghetto paper bags and the workers would wipe down the tables more than once a year, this place would be a five-star restaurant, easy. 3 2
Eating in. Bring a parka. No seriously. This place is freezing. The food mediocre. The service, not so good. Coffee was not even made when we arrived at 6:15 PM. Salt, pepper, sauce.....etc are available at the courtesy area. Are you kidding me. It should be on the tables. They apologized for the service, because it 'got kind of busy'. What!!! Welcome to the restaurant business, you WANT to be busy. Two couples left while we were waiting and they were ordering take out. If there is a way to order ahead of time and pick it up, do that. I sincerely hope the other locations are managed better. My last time visiting this location. 2 1
Yume is Japanese themed, with a nice selection of sushi rolls and bento boxed lunches, but the best food on the menu is Korean.  The restaurant is small, with a friendly and efficient staff.  Food is served promptly.  Quality control is excellent.    But I know what you're saying, so what?  What's so special about that?  Scottsdale has plenty of good Japanese and/or Korean restaurants, right?I've got three words for you:Bi bim bap.  This dish ranks #30 on the list of the world's most delicious foods and you've probably never heard of it.  You'll probably giggle when you say the name, but for heaven's sake, no matter how fun it is to say bi bim bap over and over, don't do it.  Sure, it's not often you get food with a name that's alliterated, but sadly, most people don't see the beauty in this.  Trust me, I know. What, you ask, is bi bim bap?  In Korean, it means 'mixed rice', but to you and me?  The most excellent beef/rice/veg dish you will ever have.  Seriously.  On the bottom is some nicely seasoned ground beef.  Atop that, steamed white rice.  Then, a rainbow selection of vegetables, some raw, some pickled, some cooked.  Then, the crowning glory, a fried egg - sunny side up, and a garnish of roasted seaweed strips. How to eat it, you ask?  First, there's a red bottle on the table, snag it.  I know what you're thinking, anything could be in that bottle!  Easy tiger, It's chili sauce. Now spiral a bit of sauce over the top of the egg and veg.  Note at this point, that there's a spoon in your bowl, a tablespoon.  You can use in conjunction with your chopsticks or on its own.  Take that handy spoon and break up the egg, letting the yoke flow.  Now mix it!  All of it. Tuck in, mate. You can now die happy. In my opinion, the menu would be complete with just the one item, but the seafood pancake (dinner menu) is also delicious.  It's huge, and as the name implies, filled with seafood.  What seals the deal though, is the sauce.  A thick brown sesame seed, soy, sugar, green onion concoction (ancient Korean secret recipe, no doubt) which probably has enough salt in it to raise your blood pressure.   Just go for it. No worries, life's too short anyway! 5 4
Very long wait to be given prescriptions for back pain. Over a two hour wait with no one in the waiting room. Once the Dr. Came in had to wait again for the actual prescription. There should be more Drs on staff and the wait should be told up front to give pet owners options to go elsewhere. 2 1
We normally enjoy the food at the Cottrelle location but this location just opened so we thought we'd try this one as it was closer to us. We placed an order for pick up. We ordered the pakoras, veg chow mein and veg lo mein (they gave us non veg lo mein instead), chilli chicken, kung pao chicken, garlic paneer, deep fried tofu and veg fried rice. If you like your food bland then this is definitely the place for you. We have had Hakka food many times and enjoy flavourful and spicy dishes and none of these dishes delivered. Very disappointed. 1 3
I lost my corned beef and pastrami virginity at Corky & Lenny's, and can't believe I waited so long!  Had been going here off and on for a few years when visiting family, but only had breakfast or the non-deli items.  If I had simply stuck to these sorts of things, I'd probably be giving a two star rating, but oh, the cured meats!  Corky & Lenny's easily rival legendary delis like Zingerman's in Ann Arbor, but costs you less and give you just as gigantic a pile between two slices as the others.  Not sure what other reviewers are saying about cranky/unpleasant service, because I've had nothing but attentive and pleasant experiences here.  The only crank I've run into is the older lady in the Harry Caray glasses that's always working the register, but c'mon, that's part of the charm! 4 2
Well I never Lived Here. But I got a really nice look at the place when I tracked my stolen iPhone To an apartment there.  You have to love the find my iPhone app! You could see it was in one specific section of the apartments... The police was nice enough to come out and knock on the doors, However most of the people who live there simply turn off the lights and didn't answer the door.  It's that kind of friendly place. So here's what you do if you want to live with people who will steal somebody's iPhone from a clothing store Changing room, Definitely move there. 1 4
I love eating here. Make sure you make reservations, because it can be really busy. But be aware that you often have to wait for long periods of time even if you do have reservations on a busy night. The food is worth the wait though! Great staff. 3 4
The food is not good. Enchilada sauce taste very bland and strange. Kids meal are bad and it's all over priced. It's an open kitchen too. I don't see how they pass health inspections . Won't go back. 1 2
I'm great that you had such a great experience with the staff. Maybe I should call you to come and talk to the staff for giving me the return on the skids. I am a landscaper that does many backyards. I don't do one backyard I do over 10 in the season minimal.  They need to refund me for the returned skids. I am sure that you don't have much with this company will you just a plain friend. People should know the honest truth before they go spending their large amount of money and time. As I said I am a landscaper that does many backyards. If I kept on using this business my business would be just simply closed.  People should know the truth before they get hurt.  If companies don't like that then I suggest that they train their customer service department. Set up good customer service and I would definitely go there but for now they don't have it. 1 2
Great food but the lady at the cashier is the worse. She must be the owner. Not even a smile. I hate order to go and have to pay with her. The worse, absolutely worse. 1 2
The Lizard's management appears consistently to value the benefits is keeping their draft beer lines pristinely clean - that and their attitude towards reasonably priced draft beer specials will keep any aficionado supremely happy. If you're a beer fan in general the more than 100 bottle list will keep you fluid. Food wise, the burgers are the best around at the price; wings are NOT up to Anchor Bar in Buffalo standard by any imaginative stretch, but locally, again, are hard to beat. As a plus, the service staff is the most professional in this class of restaurant you're likely to find anywhere and aside from the to be expected occasional malcontents a great group of actual professionals. Enjoy!By the way, the current manager, Kevin, obviously beloved by his staff, is either moving on to better and better venues or the top management of the L understands his professionalism and is clearly promoting him!!! 4 5
If I were writing this review on food alone, I'd give the place like 4 stars. They have really good food. They have this awesome pork belly biscuit app that is yummy. Good grilled cheese sandwich with some bacon and arugula that makes it a bit different from the usual. They have a good sangria that's like juice. I was looking forward to trying out different stuff when I went again, but I ran into the same problem, but magnified that I ran into last time I went, and that was poor service. I and a group of my friends went back, wanting them to experience the food as well. And we went on a Friday night around 9:30 and, as expected, it was busy. Now, the last time I went, it was another Friday night around 8 and their place was slow, like the only tables in were ours, a table of 6 on a high top, and a few other patrons at the bar. Service was slow then too. I chalked it up to the fact that our server was pulling double duty and playing bartender. But tonight was different. It was busy. It was like 15-20 minutes before happy hour, the band was going and the place was packed, like the usual restaurants in the area on a Friday night. And tonight, we were seated fairly quickly. Well, more like we were escorted to our table and then stood around, waiting for it to be bussed, but we were fine with that. We were able to sit down and peruse the menu. We were trying to make up our mind, when the person we thought was the server came over. It turned out that the guy wasn't our server, just a guy dropping off the silverware and plates. He apologized and corrected us in our error and assured us that our server would come by shortly. Well that didn't happen. People came by, and they kept on going by. At one time, one my friends attempted to call the restaurant in order to get someone to get to the table, but no one answered. Maybe the band was too loud or maybe they just don't answer their phones. It was then, that was had a glimmer of hope - a server heading in our direction. And what did this server do? Keep on passing us by. Well, needless to say, that was the end of that visit. We had had enough. We don't think we're gonna be back, at least not for a long while. 1 2
I used to have my gel/shellac manicures done here and Sophia was amazing!!! The nails lasted at least two weeks with no chipping (and I'm hard on my nails). They had comfy chairs and large manicure stations with the UV lights built in. I have been in twice since the new owners came in and I am done. First Sophia is gone, along with all the other recognized nail techs...that should tell you something. The place was empty and looked terrible. The nail stations are old and small. The UV lights are old and dirty. One of the girls even had bedazzled UV light covers!!! I'm sorry, but I think it looks trashy. The chairs are uncomfortable and I had cramps in my arms from the way they had to rest over the lights due to the small area of the station. Plus, the owner is extremely rude. I didn't know they had changed owners and under old ownership, you could put your tip on your card. I didn't have cash and the new owner scolded me saying "Next time, you bring cash." No buddy, there won't be a next time. 1 2
This place should have a lot more reviews - but I'm glad it doesn't, they don't need to get any busier.Its been there ages, and looks it. If you're all about ambiance, don't bother. If you pretend you're in a movie set in Pittsburgh 30 years ago it works pretty well. The service is sometimes hit or miss. Most of girls are good, one is very slow, one is amazing. They are all friendly and usually a few different people will check in to make sure that you're happy. Everything is made fresh so be prepared that nothing comes flying out of that kitchen - busy times it can take a good while to get food. The food is AWESOME! Worth any little complaints I might think up before it gets there. Once its on the table, I forget them all.-Fish Sandwiich-Salmon (huge and delicious)-Flounder-Shrimp a few ways ("Norfolk" style is oily for my taste, and I never had it growing up in Norfolk.)-Hawkins St Special-Prime Rib (sized for two, watch it)The prices are low, the portions are large, and just about everything on the menu  is delicious. I'm not one to pick a place because they give you a lot of food, but if you like a good value and don't want to compromise on taste, this place is a gem. 5 4
I shop here regularly and can't believe the variety of what's available, the organization, cleanliness and of course prices. They're always bringing in new items. Sometimes this store gets awfully lined up. This is the cheapest place in town to stock up on plastic left over and lunch containers, stationery, gadgets and candy - if you compare your prices like I do to identical products at the grocery store, mall, etc... 5 3
The pho here is so good.  I wonder how I've never came across this place.  The pho broth here is on point.  Not to heavily salty and just the perfect amount of sweetness.  Service isn't the greatest but it's not terrible. 4 3
Not to say that the receptionist was unfriendly or anything, she just never picks up the phone apparently! For 2 days of continuous calling I couldn't get anybody to answer the phone but kept hearing the message that for booking appointment I need to call back. I ended having to take time off from work just to come in to book an appointment with my family Dr.  Then I was told to call back to book my second follow up, now I tried calling 5 times in a day already and still no one picks up the call. I probably should find another clinic instead of wasting my time making all the calls.Update: Today is Wednesday, by the 8th call that I'm making at 3:45 PM, the voice message has already been changed to "Today is Thursday ..." and the message that I left earlier has not been returned. 3 1
We chose this hotel because of the recommendations we read on-line.  The hotel is certainly very unique.  We were in Pittsburgh to see a Pirates game.  Our original plans were to walk to the game but we did not feel safe enough in that neighborhood to walk.The room we stayed in was small but comfortable.  The bathroom was nice sized but the shower stall is much too small.  The toilet seat was very loose, so, I had to tighten it.  Also, the in room coffee service was not good.The shuttle driver was terrific and very accommodating.The continental breakfast buffet was terrific and nicely displayed.I thought the TV was too small but the picture was good.  Had we planned on staying there for more than one night, I would have asked to change rooms.Having said all this we would stay here again.  The hotel staff was very nice and we loved the atmosphere of the hotel. 3 4
This place is roomy. Membership required.  Pool and dart boards with pleanty of room.  TVs are abuntant.  Overall good enviroment. 3 4
My boyfriend and I stopped in here for dinner. First we went to the bar directly off of the casino, where we waited about 5 minutes and were not acknowledged once. We figured maybe we would have better luck getting a table. We stood in line at the hostess center, where there was one party of about 6 ahead of us. I'm not sure what was going on, there was a lot of back and forth between the party(who I don't think spoke great English) and the hostess, but we waited our turn for 5 minutes or so, while doing so the line behind us grew even longer of people waiting. At no point did the hostess even look up at any of use, and since the party of 6 was still in front of us, we waited. From the other door a couple walked up around the waiting party, and asked the hostess about seating, and she put them down!!! UMMM Excuse me??? You have a line of people waiting honey, why don't you try looking up! Needless to say we left, plenty of other choices in Vegas, although I think it's important to point out, we looked in the windows after leaving, and there were plenty of open tables. REALLY? 1 2
4 stars for the family meal, if you get it on a good night (3 large entree, 1 lrg fried rice, 1 lrg white rice, 4 egg roll, 4 crab puff $24.00) .We've eaten here maybe 10 times, the last visit was last month. That order was the best one yet, I actually think I got the owner's order or CE saw their Yelp reviews and fixed the problems.Anyway... I think I got the owner's order because the broccoli beef was mostly beef and only 3 broccoli, usually it's the other way around. I'm a huge broccoli fan so I never complained, but was in total shock when I opened the paper box.The fried rice had egg in it..... what???? I've been here how many times and this is the first time egg ever slipped into the fried rice haha. Lastly, they are coupon nazi's, they don't care if you are GOD himself, if you don't have the coupon you ain't getting the deal. 4 3
Far too pricey for a mediocre massage. I told the therapist several times I didn't want a relaxing massage - I wanted deep tissue- he didn't listen. The flute music is terrible, room was way too hot. The therapist had pointy sharp fingers- a manicure was in order and a better technique - I requested a man with man hands. I tried to give feedback upon leaving and the girl taking your money is there for just that- she couldn't have cared less about the experience. There are too many better places to go for the prices they charge. 1 2
had dinner there - ordered the international sampler and thought it was good but i wish i just ordered one thing. i didn't love the hummus so much, but the italian (lasagna?) was quite delicious! i noticed on the smoothie/juice menu that you can add honey or bee pollen, which isn't vegan. ok ok, i'm not vegan either, but i used to be and the mixed messages bother me! :) that said, it was good and probably the healthiest option in this crazy town of all you can eat fattening buffets. 4 3
Great food and fun vibe. But the service wasn't the best. The waitress could have been a little more attentive... I would have understand had she had a ton of tables but she had one other and much of the time she was sitting in a booth doing nothing. 4 3
I visit the Fitchburg location at least once a week and the staff is great.  Where else can you find such a great selection of wines for under $10?  The staff has always gone above and beyond for me - whether it be putting together a wine basket, expediting my order because I'm in a hurry or making great wine recommendations. 5 4
Me and my  husband  seeing  Dr Nguyen  over  15 years. The best  dentist & staff . Specially  my husband  is like  a baby  when it comes  to dentist. 4 5
My friend and I just had a lovely lunch in the courtyard. The tuna nicoise salad was very good- nicely presented, fresh veggies, perfectly cooked tuna. Joe, the affable, warm and friendly young waiter was very accommodating when I asked to have one of the grilled chicken sandwiches served on a bed of salad instead of focaccia. While I would have liked more seasoning, that's just a personal preference. And the freshly brewed ice tea is very refreshing and tasty. Kathy, the owner, was very welcoming and told us all about her story, and her daughter Emily. We will definitely be coming back and bringing our husbands. A must try for a casual breakfast or lunch if you live in north Scottsdale and wondering where to go. We wish Kathy all the best in her new endeavor. 4 5
I usually go to my usual wax girl Alyssa (who is AMAZING) I love her. She knows exactly what I want without even me telling her and she always checks with me towards the end to see if Im happy with the results. However, because of certain events coming up, I had no choice but to go with someone else because Alyssa wasn't working that day so I went in with a girl named Bri. I have to say that this was the worst waxing appointment ever. I have natural thick eyebrows and this girl waxed off so much of my eyebrow that it didn't even look like the other one. She completely ruined my perfect brows that Alyssa had already created. Not only that, I also asked her to wax off the baby hairs that I have on my forehead and she WAXED MY HAIRLINE OFF to the point that I looked like Lebron James. Now I have these little hairs that stick in the middle of my forehead and are taking months to grow back. I would NOT recommend going to Bri. She does not know what she's doing at all. 1 2
If you are paying 7.50 for .3 liters of beer, at least the glass shouldn't have 1 1/2 inches of foam on top. 2 1
Omg! I love this place, amazing food, service, and friendly staff. My boyfriend and I come here quite a bit you have to get the avocado egg rolls they are the bomb ! Served with chili line sauce and chicken pot stickers but I would ask for the sauce on the side.for some reason the potstickers are swimming in the sauce  if ordered in original form.  If you decided to get a strawberry lemonade make sure to ask for water because it's overly  sweet. Entrees I got the luau salad it's amazing very healthy and he got the teriyaki chicken so good comes with your choice of brow., Or white rice . Lastly our server was very nice and attentive but seemed to be overwhelmed so we felt bad asking for anything. 4 5
My husband and I were catching a show at the V Theater and decided to visit this eatery. I'd say it's higher end fast food -- you order at the counter and the food is delivered to your table. It's more expensive then your usual fast food but is much cheaper than a sit down restaurant on the Strip. I had a lobster roll for about $13 and a Lobster Mary for $14. We shared a lobster bisque for $9. The lobster roll was so so, the bread seemed like a folded piece of Texas toast rather than an actual roll. The lobster meat also didn't have a lot of flavor. The Lobster Mary was fun because it's served with a piece of claw meat as garnish. The lobster bisque was blah. It was too salty and oily for my taste. If you don't want to spend $50 per person on your meal in Vegas, this is an okay place but just know the food quality is not that great. 3 2
Scared to post a review because people might find it and crowds will come lol.Pros: stadium seating, comfortable, large chairs, super ample leg room, clean theater. Manager is nice, he works concessions. Super decent pricing.Cons: 3x since it opened, we've visited and either there was no picture or audio was messed up. They fixed it within 10 mins but we've not experienced that anywhere else but in a foreign country. Bathroom needs updating: tiles are looking pretty worn. 4 3
I've been here a few times. The good:- Very strong drinks. Almost, if there is such a thing, too strong.- Our first order of cheese curds. Hot, gooey, greasy.- Cheese soup + chunky tomato soup = delicious bowl of soup.The bad: - Slooow service.- Our second order of cheese curds. They were made with a different kind of cheese than the first (?) and were rather cold.I wonder what will change now that they're under new management. 2 3
Ditto everything Sam G. said about the food, and want to add that my in-laws constantly rave about the veal sandwich.  Also want to mention the coffee is really wonderful.  Best latte in Queen West (and goodness knows there's a lot of competition).  It's a great neighborhood spot, with lots of cab drivers, families with kids, older Portuguese gentlemen watching football.  It's family-run and the family and the whole staff are lovely.  They have a high chair and super clean bathrooms (though no changing table). 4 5
2 stars because the food (once it got there) was delicious.  Had the sliders and the beef cheek stew.  Sliders are served with a whipped aioli and were solid juicy slidersBeef cheek stew has a decadent jus and the meat was tender as a butcher's heart.  HOWEVER!  Service was absolutely atrocious!  Our server was aloof and did next to nothing.  Obviously the busser hadn't been trained either, because as my buddy is chewing a piece of his steak, the busser comes over and asks if he was all through, while there is still meat on his plate too boot.Nice beer list and yummy pretzel bread.  I would return and hope for a better service and make a final judgment after that. 2 3
So, I have had Mineo's 3 times. The first two times it was bleh, but I really enjoyed it last night.  My previous complaints were that it was greasy and salty, but the pizza I had last night was perfect.  I feel conflicted about this place.  I will try it one more time and update my review accordingly. 3 4
I've been here many times before and it really just depends on the night. Some nights service is fast and great others it takes forever. You better order everything you want from the beginning or else it'll take forever to get just one additional sauce. Today our server Kimberlee was great. 3 5
Not impressed. I have heard good things about this place, this is the only reason why I have tried it...3 times. This time is my last.  The first two times I went for brunch.  The last time was for the dinner service.  For dinner, my boyfriend and I ordered the Goat Cheese Deviled Eggs, the Pepper-Crusted Ahi Tuna, and the Mussels with a tomato fennel broth.  We kept the menu because we wanted to order an entree as well, but we hadn't decided yet. Our appetizers came out and after trying them, we were not excited or interested in ordering more.  The Deviled Eggs were fine, couldn't taste the goat cheese, but I could have made the same at home, and for $3 an egg, I should have.  The Mussels were absolutely terrible.  The tomato-fennel broth was bland and had a terrible, mushy texture.  Half the mussel shells were missing the mussels, and they were not fresh.Lastly, the Ahi Tuna. Noticeably frozen tuna. Bland. The pepper crust was so overwhelming and with a delicate fish like tuna, RAW tuna, it was just bad. The chef should know better.I read reviews about the awesome beer list here.... Any of the beers can be found cheaper elsewhere.Won't be back. Don't waste your money. 2 1
Took an hour and a half to get to my location even though it ran on the same main streets as them. Found a hair in my egg rolls, and did not receive the correct amount. Nor was there any napkins or forks, wtf! Never again. 2 1
i'm a complete curling novice, but i had a blast when i was here.you rent curling lanes by the hour, and equipment as well. you get a broom, and a smooth, custom made piece of plastic that attaches to the bottom of your shoe to slide across the ice. that's all there is to it! get out there and curl! it helps if you have a friend or two that knows what their doing, or at the very least look up the rules before you get there.this place is also within walking distance of downtown (just north, over the center street bridge) which makes it logistically practical.i'll also suggest you get one of the lanes on the sides.... for no reason other than it's easier access to the bar and to your drinks. drinks and glass bottles are for obvious reasons not allowed on the ice, and the side lanes are right next to the doors/ledges for your drinks. 4 3
Ventured into the Mental Health District eatery on a Thursday and took our spot at the bar as per usual. Love the new Spanish tapas food craze that's been inquisitioning its way through the Toronto food scene.After being mildly impressed at Bar Isabelle and offensively disappointed with Patria, we walked into Carmen with muted expectations.First we tried the Iberico Ham - tough - no marbling - texture of Asian style beef jerkey Second - Jicama with Avocado - texturally didn't work - felt of a glob of guac on a radish - maybe leaving the texture of the non-smashed avocado could work betterMain Course - Traditional Seafood PaellaHands down the best Paella we have had outside spain - served in its roasting dish with an abundance of fresh seafood - permeated with fresh peas and chorizo and Saffron and wait for it.... we have Socrato - the crunchy sweet caramelized peppers and onions-  take note all other Spanish Hautes .....ahem Patria.... - an amazing choice that fed 2 - 3 for $35Staff was friendly and attentive and fun - was recommended a well balanced Argentinian Malbec that paired perfectly with my Pae.Will go back for Paella alone 4 5
We went to Laziza after work for happy hour and it was disappointing, we ordered most of the appetizers, some drinks and a hookah. Of all the appetizers the hummus was the best but everything else was just bland. The service was ok when we actually saw our waiter. For a Hookah lounge I was expecting something a little more intimate and comfortable. I won't be going back to this place again. 2 3
Subway has bigger and better tasting sandwiches. For the price I expected something delicious, but it was pretty meh. 2 3
Had the best banana waffles there. Serving was huuuge, and coctails were tasty as well. 4 5
Had an outing with the girl's, and it was great first time here and I'll definitely be going back. Great food!!!! The Duce  itself is quite different,  but food. I recommend it 5 4
This place is slipping badly. I've been going for many years, and used to be a big fan. But recently they've been cutting quality, and today was the first time I've had a dish I would not order again, it was so poor. 2 1
Ok.  All you can't eat sushi. Well... It's as bad as you think it would be. The fish selection is limited, no yellowtail, no octopus. And when you do get a piece of fish it's sliced very thin. But my favorite part of the evening was when I asked if my hand roll could contain less rice than normal, I was told... "That's not how the machine makes it".  Somehow every bite I tried became the new worst thing I ever tasted.   The coconut shrimp just made me sad. I tried to find the shrimp. The octopus balls had 2 pieces of octopus that were the size of half a pea.  To end on a positive note - the sesame balls were good, and the tiramisu was akin to tiramisu, yet good. 1 2
Are you aware that there aren't enough words in the English language to describe how incredibly big, thick, juicy, and GOOD Fat Bastard Burritos are? They have some of the thickest, tightest, and most solid burritos I have ever seen. One bite us definitely worth rapturing a neck vein. 4 5
Way over priced. I got the VIP Pedicure, no different than the deluxe pedicure. At the mall they charge 35 and here it is 45. Hot stone massage was a joke, it was stone cold. When I asked the technician she said that's how it is supposed to be. Plus the nail color I picked , she said there is an extra 3 dollars for that, I ended picking up a different color. Never going back. 2 1
I wanted to grab a quick bite before flying back to LA.  Service here could hardly be described as quick here, nor could it be described as accurate.  I never did get my drink order that day; not even a glass of water. 2 1
Ordered burgers medium well! They came out pink and bloody ! Gross  ..The sever said yep, we're having a problem with the cook? Wtf ? If you know there's a problem how about fixing it once !? Mfers.. 2 1
Found this salon on Yelp and the reviews didn't disappoint! Got my manicure done by  Kevin and he did an awesome job. The polish came out flawless  and did a good job cutting the cuticles. Yuki did my pedicure and she was delicate and detailed oriented. Most places I've gone do not put special attention to callous removal but she definitely did her best. One of the things I liked the most was that they have a frequent user card, where on every 5 times you get 20% off. I haven't seen this at any other salon.Only reason I didn't give 5 stars was because they have few technicians and I can anticipate having to wait a little longer without an appointment and the color choices are not great (some of the polishes look old and unused).Will definitely go back! 4 5
1. Sat outside on patio metallic chairs and tables, when we made reservation expecting to sit in the restaurant, not outside! There was no information about this. If the restaurant inside seats g is full. Then they should mention to the customers making reservations that they will be sitting outside!!!2. Food is mediocre at best! They even screwed my order. Asked for risotto and got some pasta, not sure what.3. Asked for two cabs, someone at restaurant changed it to one big cab instead which could not hold all of us so we had to wait for another 25 mins for another one!! Would not recommend to anyone. Enough other good restaurants in Pittsburgh to go to. They have to have paid their way into magazines rating them highly! 2 1
Hmmmm...I started out reading other reviews of this place and I'm thinking that maybe a 2nd visit is in order.  Our experience was definitely not like others.We stopped by here for lunch.  $5 lunch special includes your entree, 2 scoops of rice, veggies and a small drink.  We both got the BBQ chicken ... the boneless chicken portion was small, the rice was good and  the veggies consisted of cabbage (and that's it!).We were greeted by a woman on the phone who hung up only long enough to take our order and then returned to the phone.  Since we were the only ones in the place (at 12pm!!), I wondered if her conversation was meant to be entertainment?Considering this place is next door to several other really good restaurants, I can't help but wonder why anyone would choose this particular establishment instead of one of the others?Ample free parking, cause it's a shopping center.  Would we return? I don't know.  Would I recommend?  I just don't know.If we decide to give this place a second chance, I'll update my review. 2 3
Come on- a 24 hour up-to-date gym that costs you 30$/month- it doesn't get much better or cheaper than that. I go in the mornings and/or evenings when gyms are usually at their fullest but I have never had to wait for a machine there, ever!... And they're open on holidays like Xmas an New Years!! They also have a very clean, modern and no pressure atmosphere- as a chick, it's soo not a slimy pick-up gym at all- you feel totally safe and un-cruised ++ it's a plus in my opinion! 4 5
Great Show.  My 7 year old also loved it and got most of the shows.  There are some adult innuendos that made it fun for the adults as well.The magic was old fashioned but still amazing.We got free tickets (with a purchase of a drink) after we went to the Grand Canyon through Viator. 4 5
I was looking forward to coming here for quite a while as I've heard really good things about the food here. I got 3 chillies for my food, but it was disappointing... There wasn't much flavour and it was really, really loud. Hard to hold a conversation here. 2 3
Have relied on AZ shuttle for years but now will try new shuttle service or drive.  Disappointed they have stopped providing water.  This is disgraceful and frankly stupid given the AZ heat.  What are they saving?  Five or Ten cents?  So bring your own water, oh and be prepared for stops at Denny's in Phoenix to delay your journey to and from PHX.  Fords they now use are noisier and less comfortable then Mercedes of the past.  Drivers remain courteous and competent. 2 1
Hands down, this is the best, most authentic sushi place in town. The sashimi is actually very fresh compared to other places I've been to downtown. The atmosphere is nice. It's lovely and quiet. It's one of those places you wouldn't really know of unless you just walk by it. We ordered a sashimi set and some tempura. Though the prices are on the slightly steeper side in comparison to other sushi place, the freshness is definitely worth it.Service was great. Did not have to wait too long for anything. It is definitely the kind of place you go to to enjoy and indulge on tasty food and not just to stuff your face with sushi 4 5
This place is no longer Pizzaiolo. Don't fooled, this place has seen a quick  decline in quality in recent months. Crust is hard and makes my jaw hurt (ouch). The sauce usually resembles watered-down catsup (yuck). That being said, I'd probably still smash an XL pepperoni if I had to...but like, reluctantly tho. 2 1
This is a mediocre car wash at best.  Yah they hand wash it but only wash about 70% of the car when it's wet, where it's supposed to be cleaned, then they clean the rest with spray bottles and towels when they're supposed to be drying it.  Especially when it comes to wheels.  When I asked the manager/service writer guy about it he said the owner wants as many cars through as possible, while he was agreeing with me, so they rush them through.  You have to walk the workers around and point out the mistakes and/ or missed parts that you payed for.  They now say there is an inspection person that checks quality but I've never seen a person checking cars ever.  The tire dressing they use and the way they apply it causes it to fling down the side of your vehicle, thus you have to ask them to apply it light, and / or wipe the tires down before you leave.  There are two workers I've noticed that actually work hard and clean your vehicle well.  The rest come and go with little to no training I'm sure.  They waste alot of water I noticed even though they are labeled as a water recycle wash, they even have a river through the dirt area downstream from the wash that has plants and weeds flourishing from the water that is wasted.   I've contacted the SNWA about it to no avail (sp).  The mats aren't actually cleaned also, they apply a chemical and agitate it with a brush... done, nothing removed.  Not the dirt and not the cleaner they applied.  It also takes over an hour for even just a basic wash.  Oh... and the person that sits in your car while it's going through the wash part will rifle through your compartments for whatever reason, steal your change at the least, and mess with your radio if not just to see how loud it will go.  Hope this helps anyone to know what they're getting into.  And check your vehicle before you leave. PS - Just watched them park my wet vehicle in the hot sun next to the two empty spots in the covered shaded area, nice.  Hope not to be back. 2 1
Just no. Line was long but had the longest wait when we got to the front. The host was also being very unprofessional. Yes, it was hot but fanning yourself when all you're doing is telling the waiters how many people are in a party ... They have a big selection of food but everything was eh. Seems like they add sooooooooooooo much salt into everything :/ also, their "gelato" do not taste like gelato. Not even froyo or ice cream. It tasted like cold melting milk ... Bleh , was very disappointed. 1 2
Just want to say that this place needs to be managed a little bit better!!! You can tell that the girls upfront have a lot of their plate and no help from the site manager. Stephanie and Miranda are both very polite. Also the techs Monica and Melissa made me feel very comfortable and they are very knowledgeable. 4 5
Cutsy stuff. I think the demographic for the stuff here would most likely be middle aged woman to elderly. Lots of knick knacks. I got this little coin purse which was a little pricey. Probably won't go back just because of my preferences. However this was a nice shop, just not my taste. 4 3
Probably the least expensive dining option at the Wynn. Best NY style pizza i have had outside of the real NY. And I'm a New Yorker.First time we went was our first night in Vegas. Trying to grab a quick bite after seeing a show. We ate outside on the patio and ate our slices next to the pretty waterfalls late at night. Very nice.Second time we came in for lunch with a larger group. Very busy, long line. They also have a vegan menu here (you have to ask for it, but every restaurant at the Wynn hotel has a vegan menu). My sister, the vegan, had a vegan sandwich (veggies on vegan bread) which she said was awesome.Here comes the bad news for vegans. This is a order-at-the-counter then go sit down and wait for your food to be brought to you place. The lady behind the counter who took our order was an english as a second language person. We told her repeatedly that my sister was vegan and everything she was ordering needed to be vegan. We pointed at the vegan menu several times. She still kept asking every time we ordered something, do you want that with cheese? Do you want the vegan one? YES, WE WANT THE VEGAN ONE we said, LOUDLY while pointing at the vegan menu. O.k., so at the end, we thought we had properly communicated that we needed all vegan food for my sister. On the vegan menu were vegan garlic fries, which we ordered. We made it CRYSTAL CLEAR we needed the VEGAN garlic fries, not the regular ones. Seriously, we said it SEVERAL times. Well, my sister gets her sandwich and fries and starts to eat. I say, what's that stuff on top of your fries? She said she thought it was big chunks of garlic. Then she takes a closer look and realizes it's cheese. We go to the counter and complain. The manager comes out. They replace the fries with vegan ones, but the manager seems to be blaming my sister for not ordering the right fries. Are you kidding me? We could not possibly have been any clearer. Seriously, this is a very big deal to vegans. No apology, no offer of compensation, nothing. Very disappointed in how that was handled.Here's some advice for Mr. Wynn. If you want vegans to eat at your restaurants, you need to ensure that the staff at all your restaurants understand the vegan issue, and that they speak english fluently. This was unacceptable. 4 1
Usually we are pleased with Bahama Breeze. ..However we made reservations a week and a half ahead of time for a going away party and when we show up  early for our time slot and are still standing waiting 40 minutes passed the time the only response we got from an employee when we asked what the hold up is was..."Obviously we get a lot of reservations here! " very disappointing! 1 2
So many people are posting reviews about the quality of service. I gave this rating a 2, because I recognize that Pikto is lacking in some areas, but their ability to reconcile issues is excellent.  I'm quite hard pressed to acknowledge that perhaps its your approach to the Pikto employees that made your experience a bad one.  If you are a jerk when you call and complain, they are less reluctant to help you.  I had problems uploading a layflat book to their new platform and I only had up until 10am the following day. Well, it ended up that it never uploaded and although I called in a panic, I didn't treat them like it was their fault personally.  They recognized the issue and were more than willing to help me.  I wasn't a jerk to them either. So, I ended up getting the service I deserved in light of the mishaps of their online uploading platform.  If you are nice enough, any one who is in the service/retail industry will be willing to resolve your issue. Thanks Pikto! I know some of your stuff isn't perfect, but your product is excellent and I will always come back! 2 5
Walked in 30 minutes before close.. All chairs stacked. Stood in line with everyone working just looking at us in line but no one taking orders. Everyone was too busy closing. Then when a lady came up to take our orders she was extremely rude.  Burrito was good but awful customer service. 2 1
I hate the fact that I have to give this place such a low rating. Many aspects of it kick ass. I came to Vegas 9/25/13  for my honeymoon and spent my last night at the D. At check in I specifically asked for a nice room and would pay more. What they gave me was a room that was standard and next to the stage outside that blared music until late into the night. After complaints, we were moved to a better room that was quieter. Needless to say, we love old Vegas  but will stay somewhere else next time 2 3
Booked through Priceline.  Disappointing since I was expecting a four star experience. 2 3
I visited on a Sunday afternoon and was excited just from their punny name alone. It was also a bao time (sorry not sorry) something came to replace use-to-be Go For Tea location. To start, it was very quiet with only another 4 guests sitting down. Maybe it was an odd time (3pm), or maybe most people ordered take out. The service was average, nothing spectacular. I ordered a Korean Beef Bulgogi steamed bao, as well as a Pork Belly steamed bao. Sadly I was disappointed with both of them - the Korean Beef Bulgogi had some flavours but lacked harmony. To be fair, it may just be a personal preference to keep kimchi (spicy sour) separate from bulgogi sauce (sweet). The Pork Belly lacked any sort of taste. Quite literally, it was made with a slice of pork belly and cold lettuce. While there was Hoisin mayo, I could barely taste anything. While I'm giving them two stars (one for idea and one for cleanliness), I don't think this was worth the price/effort. However, I do believe that the restaurant can easily improve their recipes by experimenting and perhaps reading the reviews they've been receiving thus far.I will consider coming back if they improve. 1 2
I love this store, Tom is really friendly and we love him! Many cute stuff and I recommend if you like stationary or finding some pretty gifts. The prices are quite fair. I've got a pencil bag and pretty mechanical pencil. :) 4 5
Doesn't everyone love yardhouse? Their happy hour is awesome.We gave them 4 stars, because overall they are wonderful. However, beware because they do have their bad nights. Tonight, we both ordered cups of clam chowder and one came out filled to the top and the other was way below the rim.Then our chicken sandwich came out uncooked!!! We sent it back and the manager was nice enough to come out and offer us more food & dessert on him.I have had the tomato bisque before and it was really good. Tonight, it wasn't good. I was very disappointed, because I LOVE tomato/tomato bisque soup.We definitely wanted to note that they have very good service. When you ask for a box, they do it for you instead of giving you a box to do it yourself. They even write the date and what food is inside of the box in the corner! Little things like that really do make a difference. 4 3
Go to Leah at this place. She is great, not a chatterbox and knows how to cut Asian hair which is hard to find in LV. Reasonable price and no pressure sales to buy products. They are close on Sundays so plan ahead. 4 5
The food was ok. But the service was disappointing, we came at 1pm on a Saturday, it wasn't too busy, 6 tables two servers.  The server didn't give us water until I asked for it. At the end, servers were talking in the front for a long time before she handed the check. 3 2
We went to Echo Sushi for the all-you-can-eat sushi (this place is always full every time I pass by). The sushi was very good, and very fresh. I love the variety of different rolls you get to choose from and that they have the option of brown rice too! They have gotten very creative with their rolls! The food was served very promptly after each order and the servers were very polite and friendly. Overall, tasty food with reasonable prices! 3 4
Third World country quality, Vegas prices. Avoid this place 1 5
That is not so bad as people complains. The air crew are nice and friendly. Please pre-arrange your check in and pay the luggage. Otherwise I didn't see any issues. Even it's very easy and efficient to get your checked luggage. The landing is better than the virgin airline. I didn't see this air company so "cheap" so described by those unhappy customers. I would recommend this airline company. 4 2
Great food and great atmosphere for a family.Very good value! 5 4
This is not my closest grocery store but it's my favorite to go to.  I like that they carry everything that I typically need, I find other locations don't carry everything and I have to go to other stores to finish my shopping.I do not like the new bakery though....this isn't totally bad since the baked good section no longer tempts me which is all in all better for my waistline:) 4 3
I question the sanitation of the utensils used..... I thought it was also rude that my appointment kept being interrupted because my stylists other appointments hair color was in the process of setting. Shouldn't double book like that. Just felt very impersonal and unimportant. This was my first time going to a hair salon in 6 years, so I was a little disappointed. My cut was very nice however for $50 I could get a basic wash and cut for a better quality experience down the road. 3 2
Cheap pbr and trading of recipes from prison. If you don't want to to go to a blue collar (or no collar) dive bar, don't go to a blue collar dive bar. Plenty of business in the front and party in the back; as well as misogynisticly-named sleeveless shirts.You can't handle the truth. 4 5
Great place for drinks and a view of the Bellagio fountains from behind. Had drinks there last Monday with a friend around 6pm. No cover, no crowds, and was able to get seating in the lounge area and later at the bar. 5 4
I had the cashew chicken. I could do better in my own kitchen and I am not a chef. The chicken tasted old   On the plus side the portions were large and reasonably priced but who wants a lot of old chicken? 2 3
We had the noodle soup and rice dish.  The food quality is just OK.  Another "run of the mill" Vietnamese noodle food.  Nothing special - just OK.  Not sure why others rate them high.It is on the expensive side for Vietnamese noodle soup.  The extra large bowl was $8.25 but the size is just a regular size bowl when compare with other restaurant.  A good thing - they do wash and clean their bean sprouts.  The rice and pork chop just come with 1 piece of very THIN AND DRIED CHOP with plenty of rice - again not much food for the amount that they charge for the dish.  NOT GOOD.I have to agree with a couple of other reivews.  NOT MUCH SERVICE.  They just drop the food.  NOT VERY HELPFUL asking about the menu.   COMMUNICATION IS LIMITED. WATCH OUT FOR THE MANDATORY 15% TIPs FOR PARTY OF 6 OR MORE -  EVEN THEY ARE NOT VERY HELPFUL WITH THE SERVICE.  IT IS BURIED IN THE BILL.  I ENDED UP PAYING THE TIPs TWICE FOR NO SERVICE.  WATCH OUT!The bill was a little over $100 for a party of 6.  I think there are better choices to go for the amount that we spent. 1 3
Barhop is an excellent west end option for those seeking great beer and food. The garlic doughnuts are heaven and Mussel Monday's an affordable, awesome treat! They bring in a lot of exclusive US craft beers and some great local ones as well. Be prepared for a long wait on a table if you are arriving anytime after 6PM until 10 or so. 3 5
So decided to make a trip to Jamie's restaurant for some good food and ambience. Eight weeks after opening, its now a first come first serve, no reservations.Waited 3 hours for a table of five. Does that make sense? Why? Noticed a party of 6 who waited less time and were seated ahead of us, hmm. Another table of 12 is seated ahead of us. Manager, told they don't seat a party of 5 in a table of 6. Why would they lose that one seat. Really? Translation/interpretation, if u don't like it u can leave. Not a good start, and the attitude from the Manager, was astonishing. Once I complained further, got a table of 4 in which they seated 5. So ambience was missing...and accommodation. The food, ordered the garlic bread and ravioli fritti's. Ravioli frittis were very good. Garlic bread was a Naan (homemade pizza dough) with garlic bread and rosemary, really? Main course, salmon and the 10oz ribeye, both were very good.  The ribeye was very thin for a steak, but was tasty. No time for dessert as we were very tired. The waiter was very accommodating and friendly, a positive.Overall, my experience at Jaime's: money over customer experience, food was nothing special or different then other similar type restaurants. Two words, very disappointed. 2 3
The ceasar is fantastic! Stick to the appies and dim sum. The mains are over priced. Pretty sure they cut the scallop up three times and charged $23 for it. Huge disappointment. 2 3
Bad bad bad services. I ordered 4 items, and they came on the table almost together. The table was too small, it could not to be placed all of the foods we ordered, and there was no more spaces of the table for the bowls, fork and spoon, but the waiter did not aware it, and we asked him to change other bigger table or add one more table beside us. He looks not willing to do so. He just put the dishes on the table, and then went away. At the last, the printed the wrong bills to us. BAD!!! 2 1
The old menu is gone. RIP, old menu.I can't seem to find a copy of the new menu online, but it's smaller and more generic than before. I ordered a kale salad with pulled pork - got a tiny, expensive salad topped with prepackaged-tasting pork strips.510 is still fine for a pint. 3 2
Waitress was adorable and service good, but Sunday brunch took an hour to be served!  Perhaps they were short-staffed in the kitchen, but you would at least expect a manager to be out to apologize.  Everyone in the place looked unhappy and....hungry.  When the food did arrive it was decent breakfast food, but after so long of a wait, I'm not sure it really mattered.  Perhaps it was an isolated incident, but the lack of any managerial contact suggests a lack of professional management, or maybe they were so short staffed that the manager was busy cooking! 1 2
Went for lunch with two friends and ordered the L&V burger ($10) medium with the tots.  Burger was very well done, tots (5) were greasy and unseasoned.  Beer selection of mostly local craft beers was better than average but over-priced (even for Hudson).  Gastropub?  The L&V has a long way to go: basically bar menu/food with over-priced drinks and very average service.  There are a few better places very near this location you may want to try first. 2 3
Always pretty good food! Great price. Awesome hot sauce. Love the traditional portuguese food! 4 5
I don't mean to single out this location its all of The Keg that has gone down hill.  My friend took me here recently service was ok food was not.  I had peppercorn NY the steak was ok the sauce sucked! How do you screw up peppercorn sauce?  Also prices are up seems like that company doesn't care about quality anymore.  The Keg of 10 years ago I miss you! 3 2
I give it 2 1/2 stars if I could figure out how to do 2 1/2. Fresh OJ wasn't very fresh. Fruit wasn't particularly great.   I got the Southwest burrito - it was OK, not the best chorizo I've had. Will not be going out of my way to return anytime soon....  May be a good choice if you're in a rush and don't care that much about really awesome food. 2 3
The menu is classic Chinese restaurant; the food on the menu is authentic; and the staff here knows it. The menu is packed with stuff that if your mom didn't make it, you probably have no idea what is actually coming with the [insert meat here.] This place is great for a group (the larger the better) and even better if you are with others who enjoy Chinese food (make some Chinese friends if possible!).If you are going to a Chinese restaurant for the first time and this is the one you have stumbled upon it may be a little difficult to appreciate a gem like Fugu. You are not really supposed to eat the food and think: "omg, this was like the totally best thing I have ever eaten." You are not supposed to order something that you like and you are not supposed to order something for yourself. You order things that your friends like and you order a lot (more than you could possibly imagine eating). You eat a little bit of everything (you share!). And you focus on spending the meal with your mates and not with the food (talk!). Make sure you eat like a pig though because it is good to be bold towards food. At the end you have a great dining experience and a memory you can share with good friends for a long time. 4 5
Not really a Chinese restaurant, but an Asian restaurant that serves selected Chinese, Thai and Sushi dishes.Late on a weekday afternoon I sampled from the dinner menu. I tried the hot and sour soup. Most of the hot seasoning was on one side of the bowl. I had to finish mixing it up.The pot stickers were not inspired either: tough and overdone.The atmosphere was comfortable: dark and good for conversation. The service was excellent.House of Hunan left me longing for the Chinese restaurants of Northern California. 2 3
I've been wanting to try this place since I saw it go in, so I went for happy hour with a friend. I got there quite early and sat at the bar; figured I would just have a drink until she got there. I ordered a lemon drop martini--a favorite drink, and something that most bars can handle. I have no idea what the bartender put in this. I think it was sour mix and a very small amount of vodka, based on how incredibly sweet it was. The bartender asked if it was ok; I said it tasted awfully sweet so he kindly offered to add more lemon juice. He added quite a bit more "juice" from a container behind the bar and the drink tasted exactly the same--which is why I think it was sour mix. Oh well, I thought, I can stand to drink this and I'll switch to wine afterwards. The bartender apologetically explained that he "is not a martini person" and left. Fine, I get that...but this isn't a complicated drink and *you are a bartender*. I finished that drink and waited about ten minutes for the bartender to notice (again, at about 5pm on a Tuesday, when the bar was perhaps 1/4 full). He finally came over. I ordered a glass of wine. My friend texted to say she was finally on her way. Five minutes later, still no glass of wine in sight. I told her it wasn't worth coming and we met at Casbah instead.I finally flagged down the bartender ten minutes after this. He seemed to have no recollection of my wine order so I paid and left. Definitely won't be back! The specials were...nothing special, and certainly didn't rival the many better happy hours in the Shadyside area. 1 2
Low prices, huuuuge portions, I would have loved this place in university. That being said, their rolls go heavy on the fillers like rice and fake crab (impossible to avoid in this place) and skimp on the nice sashimi meat. We ordered alcohol, apps, and the most expensive thing on the menu (large party tray) for just two of us, but they didn't bring one of those little freebie side salads, which I've sort of come to expect at little sushi places. Side note: we will definitely order their ramen again, as take-out, great broth. 3 4
Where to begin....so I was in the mood for a Lobster Roll. I am actually from New England so it's rather important that this meal not suck. Unfortunately, it sucked. I don't know what was more insulting; the hotdog bun or the $18 + I paid. How dare you serve it on a soggy hot dog bun. Rude. The lobster part...flavorless and disappointing. The fries, salt-less, not as disappointing, however I probably had like a total of 11 fries. COME ON! 11 freaking fries. The coleslaw was ok, it needed more or less of something but I can't quite put my finger on it. It was served with some bread and pesto(?) it was so warm and good.All in all the decor was beautiful but I didn't go there to eat fancy chairs and flat screen tv's....Service was good. 3 2
Lunch here is soo good!  Their house noodles are amazing. They are perfectly spiced and cooked everytime!  Comes with soup, an egg roll, and tea when you eat in.  All for 7.95. So worth it.  I dont even have to order anymore.  I go so often they dont even give me a menu!  One server is much better than the rest , but nothing beats these noodles for me!!!! 5 4
Unless you're trying to kill a $20 and an hour don't waste your time. It's got some cool fish and animals (jellyfish were cool) to see but compared to real aquariums like Shedd in Chicago it comes up so short. It feels more like a Vegas "check the box" than a true attempt at building a great attraction. 2 1
The called themselves "The healthiest frozen yogurt in America..." Can't confirm that, but it's very tasty and light. The Spicy Mango is wonderful. At first, I thought it was strange but it was yummy and tingly. Disneyland dole whip is also delish. 4 5
Overpriced, over rated. The burger wasn't good, the fries were limp.  I will never go back.  In-n-out for me... 1 2
We love coming here to pick up our corn tortillas and chips (for cooking at home) which are made fresh on site.  The chips even keep and taste great up to a few weeks later.  We haven't tried eating in/take-out from here, but based on the comments, I don't think we're missing much.  One of the hidden gems in Kensington. 4 5
Although this isn't my home parish this is one of the few parishes around the dioceses of Las Vegas that offers Spanish mass. It is a little bit of an older church but it, like all the other churches around, is very welcoming. I believe my favorite thing is when they do their taco nights. Those tacos are the BOMB DIGGITY!!! Not even taco bell compares to what they sell. The church has floor seating but there is also a second story that offers extra seating. 5 4
Atmosphere is cool.  Fish tacos are fresh but missing something in the taste.  Steak tacos were better.  Make reservations.  I would go back but not hurry back. 3 2
Dear Foodies,Normally when I write reviews they are about the alcohol and food that I enjoy at the establishment. However, this time around I only enjoyed the delectable cans of beer here at Short Leash because we ate elsewhere before stumbling over to this place during First Friday. I had the Coconut Porter in a can and it blew my hair back. I also tried a yummy Pilsner that they have in a can as well. Their beers on tap or not that adventurous or exciting to me so I opted for can and was very happy. I will return to eat the food there; it smelled and looked amazing as the servers walked the food to the tables behind me. 3 4
My wife went to get take out at this establishment tonight. We didn't order anything fancy or complicated to make. After waiting in the restaurant for more than 30 minutes for our food (2 falafels), we ate them immediately because we were so hungry. They were not even warm, they were cold. The lamb was so chewy it was nearly impossible to eat. Cold, chewy lamb is not what I had in mind. There are lots of great restaurants in the city now. If you can't nail down some Greek food standards, and serve food hot, people will choose to go somewhere else. I know I will. 2 1
I came to Ah So for a friend's birthday. The cooks were awesome and really put on a good show. The food was decent, but a bit over priced. However, the service and show made up for the higher cost. 4 3
Spiffy place, definitely a social setting. I enjoyed the concept of the bar not to mention the staff especially Taylar who was extremely helpful and informative. Taylar made the experience amazing keeping a smile on her face throughout the entire time. I do think the drinks could be a little stronger, I could barely taste the alcohol. Overall it was a cool experience. 3 4
We have booked 2 rooms for 2 nights for us and for our 2 teenager boys. The drama started when we checked in and there was no room available with separate beds for the boys. That got resolved when we agreed to pay extra (700$ for the 2 nights). We were told we cannot use the refrigiratore in the room because it is full of items for sale and a removal of an item will immediatly cause a charge to the room. Just to clarify its 106 in Vegas right now. When we came up to the rooms I was shocked to find out that in order to make my self coffee in the room in a disposable cup I have to pay 5$. The boys wanted to use the gym and were told it will cost additional 35$. Apperantly the is no limit to being greedy. Furthermore, an old sock was waiting for us by the dresser. And to top it all, an Ice Cube party is taking place right now and its 2:20 AM and we are all wide awake with no chance of being able to sleep. Guest services just told me it could continue until 4 AM. How are we supposed to be able to drive to LA in the morning. This is the worst ever.In all fairness I had to add to my review the fact that at checkout I told the manager about our experiance and we got compt for the last night. 2 1
Great food and juices.  Kale chips are awesome as well as their homemade "granola" which is addicting.  Freshly made vegan meals are very good and the juices I have tasted are all excellent. 4 5
Meh..... Service is good and our waitress was very nice. The food is mediocre and nothing special at all.  All of our meals and pizza we're cold and tasted like reheated  frozen food that was over priced. 1 2
Not the best place to sit in and eat as its very cramped. We had a group of 7 and we pretty much covered more than half the floor space. The nigiri/sashimi isn't anything special either but the rolls, my dear lord  the rolls are glorious. One supersized piece of sushi roll at Sushi Bong is probably equivalent to 3 pieces at your typical AYCE. We ordered the largest party tray and it had every single roll stuffed with cucumbers and avocados, on top of the sashimi and tempura of course. I was baffled when my friend who ordered often from here told me that the rolls used to be even bigger.  How is that even possible????If you are around the area and craving for some quick sushi, this is definitely a place to check out 4 2
So i just got married on 7-15-16 on the terrace gazebo. It was absolutely beautiful for a small intimate wedding. Staff was great, everyone was very helpful and seems genuinely happy for you. I booked a reservation for a ceremony over the phone and i was told on the spot what times were available that day. I took the 930pm which was perfect for us cuz it was not too hot outside. Now i live in LA and didnt come down till 4am the morning of the wedding. So naturally all my planning was via email and or phone calls. Everything still came out beautiful and exactly the way we planned it.I didnt wanna pay over $95 for just 4 pictures so i chose the normal $299 package with no added photos.Day of i was assigned my own photographer.Now my photographer Roger was great! He took great poses and was very sweet.  He even offered to take poses we personally wanted. He took over 170 pictures.The next day when i went to see my pictures i was thrilled!! It was so amazing i nearly cried. And nearly cried again once we saw how much the pictures are.  Now luckily my husband is the sweetest man in the world and payed over $ 700 so we can keep all our shots.So my suggestion is to all u lovely couples, when choosing ur packages do not worry about a package with pictures. DO NOT ADD a photo session because ur photographer will take pictures for u anyways and the packages u are offered once u see all your pictures will be completely different But i couldnt be happier. Truely it was amazing 4 5
This store has so many flip flops to choose from it was hard to pick out just one pair. I was a little upset with one of the workers in there trying to get me to buy the smaller size rather than the size that fit my foot. 4 3
This is a quaint, hole-in-the-wall, mom and pops type of place. It's usually not very busy, which baffles me cause they make the best damn baos & dumplings in the city. The owners are very personable and friendly, although there are a few communication problems if you don't speak mandarin. As someone who has had fresh off the steamer bao from vendors in China, I can vouch that this is probably going to be as good as it gets for authentic food in Toronto. I am pretty sure their the flour is home made, and bonus points for their Green Onion Pancakes that doesn't taste like someone dropped the salt while making it.Edit: Pro-tip : be patient or speak mandarin since there might be a language barrier when ordering online! 5 4
To preface this: I think smiling banana leaf has some of the best thai food in pittsburgh.Why did I give it 3 stars?  Their main waitress is absolutely awful. She is rude and ruins the experience nearly every time. I have friends that refuse to go to smiling banana leaf with me because of how rude the waitress is. 3 2
Everything is barely mediocre. It doesnt have anything special, the owner is incredibly rude/cheap, and everything is so unnecessarily expensive. You have to pay extra to get a few more pieces of lettuce, and food quality is sub par at best.For better kbbq, i recommend... well anywhere else! 1 2
Place is always packed for weekend dinners, harder to get in if there's more than a party for two.Giant portions, love that there's enough to share or to munch on the followinh day.  Cheese crisp and p'zookie are our motivation to come here, wish tables were not too close together, but I get it's part of their charm, plus that would mean less tables and then there  would be a longer wait ;) 3 4
I had my monthly service today with Sam S. He performed a quick professional job. 3 5
Lemme start of by saying the low rating is not because of the food quality or service. Both of those are average. But honestly, this place is thievery. Maybe people who like this place aren't middle eastern or haven't been to a restaurant that serves this type of food because at this place, they think it's fine to serve you HUMMUS for $16!!!!!!!!! We asked for some hot sauce, and they charged us for a tiny bit. When we asked why, they let us know it's made with 12 intricate ingredients. Come on man we weren't born in rural Canada, we know you don't charge for hot sauce. The icing on the cake is when you ask for more pita, and they bring you 4 tiny triangle pieces and then charge you. Kabob for $31? Dawg.... that should never exceed $20, idc what meat quality you're using. Lamb kofta is two smaller than usual kofta with beans. Yes because beans are very pricey and worth $25. To the manager, your food quality is fine. Just don't expect people from the region to buy into this prices. We know pita is worth 0.05 cents. I felt insulted lol. 2 1
First time there, was not too bad, service was ok.  Second time, food tasted like a frozen dinner, service is very poor.  Will not eat here again. 2 1
Pros:-I love the food-locationCons:-Could lay off the hipster attitude of the hostesses-decor is uncomfortable 4 3
excellent, authentic French bistro--decor is 70's basement meets bistro, but truly one of our neighbourhood favourites. Wonderful fish, affordable wine, creative desserts. We keep returning and have never had a bad meal in 7 years. 4 5
Can I say milkshakes to die for!!!  SOOO many choices and an awesome vibe!! We both were happy with our meals, offbeat takes on classic diner foods. 4 5
Usually order from this location. Always dependable product and good quality. Manager is personable and accommodating. This is one of our go to's. Thanks guys for being awesome! 4 5
your basic DQ the girls are young and don't want to be there! very short with you and not the most personable. 1 3
Fair prices. I did not feel like I needed to get several prices after talking to them. They were booked out till 3 days....a good sign they are in demand. He explained to me that the prior repair(only about 3 years ago) had given me cheap small springs. DO NOT GO WITH THE BIG NAME REPAIR COMPANIES) . I recommend these guys and will use them again. 5 1
We went to Harlem on July 6th for Summerlicious Lunch.   This place has character, its comfortable, with a very cozy feel.  Great atmosphere, Great food. The service was great. The server was very engaging and genuinely nice and attentive. We had the Catfish sandwich and the vegetarian curry with coconut rice and for desert the Plaintain in brown sugar caramel sauce. (very delectable a definite must have). I would recommend this venue. It is a delightful experience 4 5
My partner and I retired and bought a house in Las Vegas in April, 2010.  At that time we tried out yours and the Aliante Stations buffets and yours was, hands down, the best.  We visited the Cannery several times a month for dinner and a couple times for lunch.  We have always brought our out of town guests there for gaming and food.  The quality of your food has steadily declined since we started coming to what is now inedible.  The prime rib is now a low quality, tough,  underdone steamship round; the tempura shrimp is 'popcorn shrimp' , a dried out bland product that bears no resemblance whatsoever to the shellfish; the seafood fra diavolo is now skimpily scattered atop an overdone spaghetti and your caesar salad is overdressed and limp.  Without exception the other options available appeared to have been held on the steam table until past their prime.  In fairness, I didn't try the pizza.  I don't go to casino buffets for pizza.  Incredibly, while you've lowered quality you've discontinued the bounce-back BOGO that we've enjoyed since arriving here.  Regardless, the meal we had this evening, November 11 at 4:30pm was not worth half of what we paid.  Be assured that the next time we go out to a casino or entertain out  of town guests we will be giving the Aliante Station another try.  A pity, really. 1 2
I've now been to Quivey's Grove twice: both times I was completely underwhelmed by the food, although the service is friendly and fantastic. My first entree was the meatloaf. Full disclosure: I make AWESOME meatloaf, so I AM biased. QG's offering was not bad, just forgettable and in need of salt. On my second visit, I ordered the Black Angus Steer tenderloin medallions, which came with a Madeira mushroom cream sauce, sauteed vegetables, and parmesan potato. The first thing that struck me was that nothing on the plate went with anything else. The sauce on the medallions (which were tender and juicy) was excellent: I could imagine serving the entree over mashed potatoes or even polenta. Instead, it waged war on the parmesan potatoes: a nasty, clearly pre-cooked, cheesy potato casserole that more resembled something you might find at a potluck. The other filler, sauteed julienne peppers, also clashed with its plate-mates.  In a word: DISAPPOINTING. QG isn't an inexpensive place to eat, and I would expect quite a lot more from the food for the cost. 2 3
Sadly Bishoku has now been re-named "Chop Brasserie Asiatique" by their new owners.  No it's not an Asian brewery, so I have no idea why they chose this name, but in the end, since the change over, the quality has gone down hill.The last time we went, the waitress was very rude to us and food wasn't great.  The rolls are still fine, but the nigiri and sashimi was definitely not as good.  The sushi pizza is still good and unique, but I don't think I'll be going back.  RIP Bishoku! 3 2
Happened to walk past this place and thought we'd give it try after seeing the beautiful patio. My boyfriend and I each had a margarita and split queso. It took FOREVER for someone to take our drink order. Once our food and drinks arrived we didn't see our waiter again for another 45 minutes. When he dropped off our check it took nearly 20 minutes for him to pick it back up (we timed it). Our incredibly mediocre food cost over $40. I can't imagine the cost or time it would have taken if we ordered a full meal. An absolutely underwhelming experience. 2 1
Very good food and we had a great waiter as well. However, it is a little overpriced in my opinion. My husband and I went for lunch and our bill was $100. We got a burger, sandwich, a large beer and a mixed drink. 3 4
It's the shift-lead, Hannah? Do not blame the teenagers for a terrible shift leader. I guess that is why they don't call you a manager, because you don't manage anything. My smoothie just tasted like dirty ice today. My $8 smoothie because apparently you can only "add" items and not "substitute" them. Again, this is not the teenager's fault, the shift leader must be held accountable. 2 1
Had their standard gyro which was BIG, so much meat on there it could have easily been split into 2-3 individual gyros so they def do not skimp on portions & you get your money's worth. Tasted great, no complaints. 5 4
Food was decent, but the service was absolutely terrible. Both servers who served our table were so hostile that I pretty much lost my appetite - which sucks because it's all-you-can-eat here. Would not come back here again. 1 2
A nice cappucino with beautiful design. Breakfast food selection is limited with just croissants or strudel. Seating is limited with a few chairs and stools for the location. The chairs they do have are nice. Staff was very friendly. The aesthetic is rustic with distressed wood and ceramic tub to place used dishes in. A nice place to pop in for a few. 3 4
Although the food was good, we had an issue with the service.  When asked to accommodate a variation on a menu item the waitress was not willing to even try to the point of rudeness. Then between courses she placed our used silverware that were on our plates back onto the table. When we asked for clean silverware we were given an extremely snide remark by the waitress. Her rudeness ruined the ambiance of the beautiful patio dining. 2 3
A basic place but the food is good and service is also, limited wine and beer 4 3
Left the performance feeling misled.  This is NOT your typical Cirque du Soleil performance - it felt more like a musical.  As others touched on, this was more like a tribute.  What they should have done was name it Viva Elvis in large font, and in very small font, state "by Cirque du Soleil."  Yes, there were some acrobatic performances (trampoline was very cool) but if you go in thinking you will see a lot of amazing feats, be prepared to be disappointed.  What you will actually get are images of Elvis growing up, and many of his hit songs, some sung by him, some by the performers."O" is definitely my favorite.  KA was really good as well.On a positive note, there was some sort of promotion that we were not aware of, yet without us knowing or asking, we were given a 30% discount.  What a great surprise! 3 5
I'm giving it 3 stars because I only like 3 items here (not the other items on the menu), but these 3 items are actually really good and on its own deserve 4 stars.  I only like pho at 3 locations here in Vegas and this is one of them.  It's good and the place is cleaner than Pho So 1.  I also like their che ba mau because it comes with shaved ice, and they serve it in a plastic to go cup (in case I don't finish it).  Their spring rolls are pretty good too, but I can make those at home.Update:  I changed it to 4 stars because I've missed it so much while I was gone that I ate here twice a week while I was back home for break.  :oP 4 3
Food was good but pricey. Gave you large portions enough to share. Restroom was disgusting. 3 2
Fun but most games are 2.00 dollars to play and hard to win anything but penny toys with tickets. 2 3
We wanted to take my nephew to this restaurant so he could watch the planes. I checked the Yelp reviews before leaving so I really wasn't expecting too much out of this restaurant.I was appreciative because the hostess did help us find a table near the window so we could see the planes. But honestly, that was the only positive.Our food was just not good. My husband's plate had a giant hair (and it clearly wasn't his as he noticed it right after the waitress set it down and he has buzzed hair) in his potatoes. He asked for new potatoes but the waitress did have the mm make a whole new plate. My sister ordered a taco salad without meat and sure enough she had mostly meat in her salad. That was also remade. My nephew was only eating his fries, not his grilled cheese, and we kept encouraging him to eat the grilled cheese. I finally took a bite and spit it out. It tasted awful, almost as if the cheese was spoiled.I will most definitely not be returning. 2 1
This restaurant is hidden in the country side of Gastonia...who would've there would be a seafood restaurant in this part..but here it was. The menu had a great selection of seafood and for those who are not into seafood..there is an excellent selection of pasta and steaks all at a reasonable price. I had the crab cakes, which was delicious. I took away 1 star because service was not that great our waitress was not attentive to our table..and I took away another star because the salad bar looked a bit messy. Over all the food was good and the price was good. It was comfortable. I will definitely come back and give it a second try. 3 4
whenever I write a 'less than stellar' review, I always wait a few days. I just like to take all emotion out of the review. I have waited almost 2 weeks to write this - mainly because this Papa Murphy is less than a mile from my house and I always root for the local businesses in my neighborhood.Here goes:I have been to this location enough to fill up a punch card (12th visit gets you 50% off your next order)... So I thought - AWESOME! On Halloween, I don't want to cook and we are having people over before going downtown for the Las Vegas Parade. I bring a friend (who has never been to Papa Murphy's). I have talked up the place to her and convinced her that pizza would be better than Mediterranean food for the occasion. We walk in, there are 3 others in the shop, two are waiting for their pizzas and 1 is paying. We walk up to the registers, pick a couple of salads and grab a menu. We we not greeted, but, you know, people get busy - and we are gabbing away anyways. Well.... after standing next to the workers 'building' the pizzas and a few feet from the left register for 5 minutes - Another woman walks in to the shop. The manager or owner (I assume) who is building the pizza, asks another employee to help 'the guests.' The employee proceeds to greet the other woman and start taking her order. After a moment, the 'Manager' asks us if we've been helped. We let her know we hadn't. She proceeded to tell us because we weren't standing right at the register, thats why know one had helped us............ *REMINDER* : I've been here enough to earn the complimentary 50% discount. It's not my first rodeo at this place. AND we did go straight to the registers when we arrived. How would we have picked out the Greek Salads (which are in between the 2 registers).... Needless to say, a place that makes it the guests fault that they weren't helped is not a place that I need to spend money at.... It's really too bad! I have had no issues the other 11 times at this location - but those times I came in after 6pm (this visit was around 1:30pm). I have always been helped by the night male 'manager/owner' (assumption on title, but these are franchises that are proprietor owned)..........I will say, I've never seen it busy at this location, so maybe when they get more than 1 or 2 people in their store at once they get a little "overwhelmed....."But, I think it will be awhile before I return, and needless to say, my friend will never get to try Papa Murphy's because she doesn't like rude service- especially when it's at a pizza place that you have to take home and cook yourself. 2 1
Good times at Made in Mexico. The size of the portions is well worth the price, and the fresh margaritas are worth a try, very tasty. All in all this is worth a try if you are in the mood for Mexican 3 4
The place was clean and service was ok. Wanted the fish tacos but they pony had the shrimp do I decide on the al pastors.  Should have had the chicken or beef because the pork was very oily and more fat than I would expect from an upper end street taco place. 2 3
I just had my first cevapi meal here and cannot believe I have been missing this place!  I am always on the look out for these places with my Serb husband, so discovering RM was a treat. Cevapi are delicious, and so were the spreads (kajmak and urnebes). I don't think they are trying to compete with places like Southstreet or Hero as it is a Slavic restaurant, but that being said I will take a burger from Royal Meats any day.  It's authentic and tasty Serbian grill.As for the service, which people seem to complain about, it really is a cultural thing.  Eastern Euros just don't do the fake pleasantries many of us westerners are used to.  If super friendliness is what you're after with your burger, go to Southstreet and revel in having a smiling 19 year old slather guacamole on your whole wheat burger. 4 5
Meh. Came here 3 years ago and recently visited again. About $40 for brunch and an additional $10 for mimosas/bloody marys. Wait time prior to getting seated was about an hour. There's 1 line to pay and 1 line to get seated.Food was alright. Didn't have a particular favorite and wasn't wow-ed by anything. There is pork belly, kalbi ribs, prime rib, bone marrow, and the crabs rolled in at around 3p. I liked the kale salad and farro salad but I was here to get fat. Dessert, although presentation wise looked appealing, were not that great. I'd stick with the gelatos and chocolate covered strawberries. Our server was attentive but chefs didn't seem happy to be there.Honestly, it'll probably be another 3 years for me to visit again. Over-priced for what they have to offer. I'd wait longer and pay more for Bacchanal. 2 3
I've been to many KBBQ places. We LOVE getting the AYCE bargains, but this was just disappointing. For a city that is known for it's quality food at cheap prices, this just doesn't cut the mustard. The selection of meat wasn't impressive and the price for this selection was too much. You can get better options at most KBBQ places in and around L.A. for quite a lot cheaper. There were many sides which made it a bit better but it lacked an essential side dish. There was no steamed egg. Truth be told, I probably wont go here again. 2 3
Went in n a Valpak coupon. Had dinner there. It was super slow, but thought maybe because nothing else is open around them.The Super market was closed down. The service was friendly, that's a Pro. the Cons, where do I start. Food was hot on one side, colder on the other or in the core of the meat. Wierd.Food took a lil longer, but that was ok, if it was busy. It was a lil $$$ for the quality of the food. I will not leave Pei Wei again, I swear.My last thought, we should of ate next door at Los Fav taco shop. 2 3
The food - I ordered an omelette.  You can build your own and I went with sausage, swiss cheese, onion, mushrooms and bell peppers.  It was very good; as light and fluffy as it could be with all those ingredients.  The omelette came with either hash browns or fried potatoes and either biscuits/gravy or two pancakes.  It's a lot of food!  I couldn't finish and brought the biscuits/gravy home.  They have a number of breakfast options but I should point out that if you're on a diet you're not likely to find something light on the menu.The price - the omelette, hash browns and biscuits/gravy set me back less than $9!  That works out to 1/3 of a cent per calorie.The service - They were busy but the service was still very good. People were walking around with coffee and we were checked on often enough.  The inside - the restaurant has a diner sort of feel.  It's clean, nicely laid out with a lot of booths and tables.  Things are getting a big old inside but this isn't a fancy-schmancy place so it's fine.Not on my side of town and my waistline couldn't handle coming here often but if I'm in the neighborhood I'd stop in again. 3 4
I went here on a Friday night. I had always passed it and wanted to stop by, so I did with three friends. I wish I hadn't.The decor was nice, and we were seated right away. We decided to order the Spring Roll Platter ($10) that was supposed to have four different types of spring rolls on it. When it arrived, we thought they got our order wrong. It was a big pile of mango salad, with about 4 spring rolls cut in half. Not only were there only two kinda (chicken and shrimp curry?) but it was less spring roll platter and more mango salad with a side of spring rolls. We were really disappointed. When the meals came, it was worse. I ordered a peanut pad thai, and it looked like something someone threw up. It was really gloppy and....gross. I ended up not finishing it. My friends were less than plussed with their food, although the stif fried rice seemed to be the best thing on the table.The price and service was ok, but the food is terrible. That was the first and last time I would ever eat there again. 1 2
went here yesterday....being from Chicago, I had to check it out.  Fries were terrible, greasy and limp.  Hot Dog was ok, but the bun was hard on the ends.  Prices are pretty good.  The woman that took our order was really nice.  The actual owner was behind the counter flippin burgers and he did not say "hi" or even smile at the customers.   Maybe he was having a bad day.  Overall, I prefer Joey's a lot better, which is also closer to home for me in Glendale.  I just happened to be in Surprise for an appointment, and I saw there sign on the road.  Anything with Chicago in the name, and I will stop!  lol 2 3
After multiple times asking for a medium rare steak it came back well done . A lot of money for a over cooked steak 2 3
I had dinner here a couple of times and I would have to say that I've yet to be overly impressed with the food. Everything has been sorta "meh."  The service is absolutely great, and the wine list is also very good but dinner has felt very anticlimactic. In addition, is it just me or does the decor in the restaurant  cross the border from classy into cheesy? I mean, I realize what they are trying to do but the painted brick/landscape....really? Feels a bit Olive Garden-y to me. I may be up for trying it one more time, but honestly, with so many better options in Tremont the odds aren't looking so good... 2 3
So this was a converted property...less than a year old since Marriott's purchase.  Great service, particularly in the new concierge lounge (open since Dec. 2012).  Renovations look well done, but be prepared for small rooms and worn carpeting.  Overall, I'd stay here again primarily because of the service (and lower price vs. the airport Marriott).  Clean, comfortable, etc...your average Marriott trying to be European, but the folks there really do try hard and want you to come back.  Why stay there....because it's downtown, service is fantastic and price.  Why stay somewhere else...because you want to be outside downtown or you're your a Starwood Platinum. 3 4
Leaps and bounds better than the average sushi takeout place. Sushi was very fresh and well executed. Portions are not huge, but I would rather quality over quantity anyways. Would definitely eat here again. 5 3
I don't know how this place stays in business. The menu is so limited. Would you like chicken or chicken? Chicken in a pita? Chicken on some lettuce? Chicken rolled in a tortilla? And the pita chips are bland! Yuck! And  the potato salad has something in it that is way too tangy. I've only been twice and tried different dishes both times but I just don't get anything greek about this place. 2 1
$20 an hour, I've paid for less and gotten more in LA.  I have to tell the lady to go harder like 3 times and they still expect a $10 tip.Definitely not coming back for sure. 2 1
The pretzel bread and spread is amazingly delicious. The food is really tasty. The servers are horrible. If you ever get Rodger run in the opposite direction. We Ate here two nights in a row thinking maybe the first server was new, but no both nights received the same low class service. The best part of the staff is the bus men and woman and the hostess. We have learned that the servers "pool" their tips this could indicate why they do not care about service or it may just be that they have better things to do than give halfway decent service at one of the best casinos and hotel in vegas? 2 3
Everything from start to finish was perfect.  I went for my anniversary last night and it hit the spot.  The host was lovely and seated us right away.  We were twenty minutes late and he wasn't bothered in the least.  Told us we did him a favor since the reservation before us lingered.  We eat meat occasionally but ended up ordering entirely from the vegetarian menu.  I had the mushroom salad which was wonderful.  My husband had the gnocchi, which I was jealous of and if I had a longer arm I would have eaten half of.  My main was the tortelloni and my husband's the tortiere.  Both were delicious.  I wouldn't change a thing.  The Bellwoods Brewery beer from just down the road was nice and the wines by the glass were interesting.  4 oz pours may not seem like a bargain at $9 - $15 or more, but I guess the alternative is to make it 5oz pours and jack up the price by 25%.  We got the dessert board for two, which I feared might just be a bunch of fancy sweets prepped earlier in the day by a pastry chef who was long gone by evening.  Turns out it was, but that was ok.  The madeleines were lemony with a little crispness around the edges.  A square of nougat was chewy and nutty.  The vibe was lively though not too loud.  As luck would have it they played one of my favorite albums of all time during the second half of our dinner.  I read a lot of other reviews and my assessment is that Woodlot is a victim of its own success.  People love to find a reason to take down really popular and trendy places so they can feel good about their superior discernment.  Don't be fooled.  This is one of the best casual restaurants in Toronto and it deserves five stars on Yelp. 5 3
These movers were great. They came at short notice after some sketchy movers fell through, and they did the job in very quick time. The fee was as quoted with no hidden additions. I would definitely use them again/recommend to others. 4 5
This place is decent, and I'd definitely recommend it over one of the Rio Mirages. The food is a bit on the pricy side for what they offer, and I prefer Popo's in Glendale. If I just need some quick Mexican food though, this place has always been satisfying. 4 3
We used to bring our dog here for his grooming. He was always happy to go and the groomer did a great job on his cut. The problem was that four out of seven times we took him there, they ran two-three hours late having him finished. After missing my brother's birthday dinner, we switched to Doos for Dogs... 2 5
Kind of tucked away and hard to notice, especially being next to the really glammed out Ella's Deli. But worth a visit if you're looking for a good gyro or kebab. :]The donuts are alright too. They have a wide variety! Myself, I really rather like their cookies. They also offer homemade baklava.Really though I can reccomend their sandwiches with a side of the seasoned fries. Quite yummy! Vegetarian options also available such as potato kahbi or falafel sandwiches. And they had a lot of beverages to choose from too.Although the location is not ideal, it's worth a stop if you're in that part of town. :] 3 4
Have been going here for years, and getting...and loving the cornbread.  However, as of the 1st of the month, they started charging $3.00 for the cornbread...but neglect to mention that.I would think if they changed the policy just a couple of weeks ago that they would now inform customers that they are charging for cornbread...which was free. 1 3
good pho for the west-end.very clean, very unusual for asian places, especally vietnamese restaurants. however, usually nice asian restaurants aren't authentic but this place is run by true viets. don't get their thai mango salad though, it REALLY sucks. it is DRENCHED in fish sauce or whatever. 4 3
Saw a car I liked on the internet on Monday for a price I thought was very fair. Got quoted a different price over the phone, went in on Thursday and yet ANOTHER price. Sat down and worked some numbers and couldn't get where I wanted to be so I left.....came home and? You guessed it, a different price AGAIN!!!!!!! This place is shady! I have fantastic credit and have purchased a multitude of cars and trucks.....run away and run away FAST!!!!! 1 5
When you walk into Korean Village you will be quickly greeted by their friendly staff. The restaurant is roomy with a nice atmosphere and has large comfy booth seatings - my fave! The menu is extensive with many options from platters to BBQs and the usual Korean dishes (pork bone soup, bibimbap etc.). My partner and I ended up sharing the assorted Grilling BBQ Platter (pork, beef, chicken, seafood). The selection of meat was not bad but just a bit over-marinated in sauce which made eating it quite salty. Prices in comparison to their serving portions are not very filling but other than that, the service is excellent as the waitress was helpful in coming back and forth to check on our cooking meats. Overall, fun experience with attentive staff that really want you to enjoy your time there.         Note: take notice of the many pictures of celebrities and newspaper articles on their wall that have eaten here. 3 4
Having been to every brewery in CLT multiple times, I can easily say, this is my least favorite.  Not trying to be too mean to the place but first and foremost, the beers are very 'meh'.  None of them stands out for quality or taste.  I always get a weird vibe in this place, the crowd is just a little off, certainly comprised of the locals that live within walking distance.. which is not terribly appealing.  I would go to Lenny Boy or Triple C any day over Syc if i'm in that area. 2 3
My husband is peter piper pizza #1 fan, and I must say I have gotten to love it to. Today I placed a care your order and was pleasantly  surprised that the phone only ringed once and one picked up so super friendly with a great attitude. Once I got there I proceeded to pay the girl in front was very helpful and with a good attitude. I asked for a cup of water and the manager asked if I was waiting for a Carry out and he gave an actual drink cup. I thought that was very nice. I'm happy to see that people take pride in serving well with a great attitude. After being in many fast food places and stores people really have bad attitudes and are not helpful I was happy to be treated well. And not to forget the food it was delicious as always. 5 4
Dear Yoshi's.  You and I go way way back.  Remember that one time I ordered Combo #2 (Teriyaki chicken)?  Oh yeah I mean that was about 500 times.  Remember that time the girl behind the counter was puzzling over my request for some Gomasho?  Oh I meant the 500 times (it's ok, eventually she figures out what I'm asking for).  Remember that time Kirk and I saw a cockroach hanging out near the bathrooms?  It really happened!  But only one time did I see it.  Don't get defensive now, Yoshi's, but please take care of that problem if you haven't already.  It's ok, we will still do business together---especially if you keep your prices moderate.  I'll still order Dragon chicken.  I'll still brave your parking lot, fending off the odd transient here and there.  It's nice to know you'll always be there for some decent japanese style food at a moderate price. 3 2
This is our second time visiting Claim Jumper and this time I was extremely disappointed with the service. We arrived at the restaurant around 1:30 and it wasn't crowded at all either. My waitress name was Cinthya and she was very rude. We came in to celebrate my daughter's birthday. After we placed an order it took very long for them to bring out the food to us and it was another waitress that brought out the food and I asked politely if she could bring me some chipotle sauce and she never came around to doing that. Almost at the end of the meal I barley saw my server at all.      Then I went up to one of the other servers at the front and told them that it was my daughter's birthday and then a few minutes later my server Cinthya came to the table and questioned out loud in front of everyone at the table and asked "is there someone's birthday at this table?" very rudely. This was a surprise for my daughter from my husband and I and for her to ruin that was unbelievably frustrating. My husband responded for a no because it was meant to be a surprise so I corrected it that yes it was my daughter's birthday. A few minutes later she brought out a red velvet cupcake and she light the candle and just threw it on the table without having the courtesy to even wish my daughter a happy birthday.    Then we asked for a to-go boxes and bags, she brought out the boxes but not the bags then she disappeared off somewhere! If this is how Claim Jumper training their employees to treat their customers then mostly likely we will never return to Claim Jumper again. 2 1
Totally mediocre. I'd just as soon go to Applebee's or chilis. Came here on a Saturday night for some preseason football, but they only had two games playing.  They got my order of wings wrong, but quick to redeem themselves with $5 "Zipps bucks. " the wings were tasty with plenty of meat on them. The service was friendly. Probably wouldn't come back just because there's better places for wings and football. 3 2
So I love Bomberos. I like the fire pit, and the trees, and the decor. But the thing I love the most is the atun escabeche(sp). Salty, sweet, and delicious.  As a side note, my 7 year old daughter loves to come here to hang out and read, apparently Junie B. Jones books fit in really well with the ham and cheese sandwich. I highly recommend it. 4 5
I had my hair cut by Anthony a few months ago. At that time, my hair was desperate for a cut and pretty dry, after I grew it out for my own wedding and a friend's.  Anthony was very nice, and I was impressed by the clean, professional salon. However, I wasn't too keen on him talking me out of getting layers when I said that I wanted them, as I have had layers many, many times before and am happiest when I have some bounce to my hair. I appreciate a professional opinion, but I know my hair best of all, and I regret letting him talk me out of it. I left with a healthy, yet all one-layer cut, which became boring to me within a week.  I just feel like for the price that I paid, I should have gotten more. I could have had a friend with a steady hand cut my hair all one length for free.  Overall, this experience just taught me to stand up for what I want and not let people talk me out of something I really want for my hair. 3 4
saw employee hork and spit. saw employee picking nose while putting out produce. prices good. most of the staff do not speak English so shopper cannot get help. veggies fresh...fruit less fresh. on-sale OJ often not refrigerated. buy selectively here and you're ok 2 1
This was some of the best Mediterranean "fast" food I've ever had in the West. Casual atmosphere, friendly staff, convenient. Ask for a sampler of their sauces. 4 5
I can say that is one of my favourite burger. It's simple maded but delicous. Grilled Cheese menns two slices of melted American cheese, spread with onions on a freshly baked bun is one of the secret menu. Marvelous! You also can order a double cheeseburger... 4 5
So basically I made a reservation for bottle service for my birthday, letting them know it's my birthday on Thursday at Candi bar for 5 people and everything was good. I had done this for my boyfriend's birthday last year so we knew what it was like. They called me around 4pm the day of (Saturday) confirming our booth leaving a voicemail message while I was sleeping so I hear it and call them back at 6pm confirming it and everything was good. They told us to come around 10 or 11. It's 1045 and I call them telling them that we will be there in 45 minutes and everything was good. So we get there and the bouncer says we aren't on the list and there was never a reservation for us. He's being a rude prick and was trying to find a way to not let us in like looking at the guys clothes, but they were dressed up so that wasn't the problem. So after pleading with the bouncer and manager they let us in telling us to go to coat check so we go and pay. Then another manager comes up to us and is all nice shaking my hand knowing that I made the reservation. And leads us away from where the booths that we expected are to the corner of the club to these shitty little wobbly cafe tables that only fit three people. So I'm like no this isn't what I asked for and they said that since we are only five he bumped us down the list for a party of 7 even though I made the reservation first. So we are going back and forth with the manager being like we want a booth since we are still paying the same to sit at these tables as the people in the booths. So we then decide fuck them let's go to another bar. When the guys are getting their coats I'm like well I'm here I paid for coat check I might as well have a shot or something before I go. As I'm ordering the manager comes up to me, taps me on the shoulder and tells me I have to leave because I don't have a table anymore. So I'm like fuming and almost crying. So we get our coats and leave. And the only nice employee was the coat check girl and a big bouncer inside that asked me if I was alright when I was about to cry. So we leave and walk a couple blocks to Edgar Hypertaverne where I spent my birthday last year and have some drinks served by nice employees. 1 2
The food was ok. You get a lot of food for the price. There is bot a lot of seating. 4 3
Place is funny, bartender was telling this guys wife some very crazy things he was going to do to her....not for the light hearted. 3 1
After my 8 lb poodle was attached by a coyote, I went there. The staff and doctor were very nice and took good care of my dog Bradley.  This will be my go to ER for all my pets. 4 5
I keep coming back for the massage. Lisa is a professional! I highly recommend the soy candle massage. The experience with the staff is always exceptional. 4 5
Came here to get togo...got a sisig bowl and a tocino bowl wanted to see what it was all about...also ordered side of egg for the bowls $20 wid tip. Got home and saw no eggs!!! checked my receipt and got charged for them too. Also i got garlic rice which was an extra .50cents ea. most of upgrades u hav to pay for extra and i didnt even know until i saw the receipt. Its pretty pricey for a food truck sized order very small. Sisig was very sour and tocino was just ok meats wer shredded. Didnt even fill me up. Id rather go get a 2 item combo at fiesta fililina across the street for $6. Probably wouldnt come back here anymore. 1 2
At first I was a little confused with how the place was set up, where to order what I wanted. The staff was okay, chatting with each other while I looked around. Finally a cook explained the set up. I had the vegetarian tacos and my boyfriend had chicken tacos. Flavors were good. salsa bar was overwhelming, I wish they would label the 8 different salsa. Mexican corn was beyond good. Dj playing in the corner on Saturday night was a great surprise.  Planning on coming back again. 4 3
Food was relatively tasteless, some was served cold, some overcooked so it was tough. I won't be back. 2 1
I ordered from here online and I was very impressed at how quickly and accurately the order was processed and delivered. It was delivered in less than the expected wait time, and the sandwiches were wrapped and packaged very nicely. It's very obvious that this place loves good sandwiches. 5 4
We stopped in last Friday to have a quick bite to eat and take advantage of happy hour specials.  In a city full of great food, we couldn't have regretted our choice more.  It's partially our fault, as we were in "we're on vacation and we can eat whatever we want mode" and ordered fried calamari, fried cheese sticks, and fried chicken fingers.  No, the menu doesn't state fried so redundantly.  Taking the blame for our unhealthy choices, I still have to say this is the worst food I've ever had in the Phoenix area. We were raking our brains trying to come up with any other place that was even close to this bad, and couldn't come up with anything to compare it to.  My boyfriend's comment, "how can you screw up fries?"  The only plus was that our waitress was quick, and nice.  She offered to replace my beer (ordered the special, terrible!) with something I would like, and was very pleasant. 1 2
Ok disclaimer, the food here is pretty good.. Like 4 stars good. I would even say it's my go to Korean restaurant here in calgary. We were craving Korean tonight so of course we decided to come here. We knew it closed at 10 so we walked in the door by 9pm. To our disappointment we were turned away by staff saying they were closed. I politely pointed out to the staff that the open sign was still on so it was misleading. He proceeded to correct me saying the open sign was off. I walked outside and there it was, a bright ass sign saying "open" with the hours printed underneath (sign said 10 btw). I understand restaurants closing 30 minutes early if they're slow but a whole hour? That seems pretty unreasonable. 3 2
Ehhhhh...I just don't know. I've dined in at this Claim Jumper about twice a month for the past 8 months that I've resided in Vegas, and probably ordered the take out another 5-10 times or so when I was working more frequently in Town Square. Everything here is so unbelievably inconsistent, that it's hard to give this place a solid rating. When the food is good and the service is good, this place is definitely 4-5 stars. But when its bad...boy is it bad. Claim Jumper has an excellent menu and dessert selection. This is their strength and weakness - they offer a little of everything for everyone while specializing in absolutely nothing. They also offer a full service bar that's pretty handy to grab a Stoli Cranberry when you're waiting for a table on a Saturday night. And the drinks are pretty darn good, especially when this blonde guy Chris is in the bar. He makes a mean martini - the kind that makes me shamelessly fall off my bar stool when I get up to follow the hostess to my awaiting table.The servers are hit or miss. I've had a few that were friendly and talkative and gave me free dessert for being a sweetheart. I've also had some that were outright hostile by slamming a plate or cheese toast on the table or rolling their eyes and groaning when I meekly asked for a refill of iced tea. Luckily, I've found a server that is polite, friendly, and thorough, so I just request him when I go in. "Are you sure you're willing to wait 40 minutes for a table with him, ma'am?" Why yes, yes I am; I've got my appletini right here to entertain me.The food for the most part is mediocre and generally lukewarm by the time it reaches the table. But the portions are ridiculously huge. I order off the Little Jumper's menu most of the time (when I have a server that's willing to accomodate that), and even then I end up taking about half of it home. I've had a variety of different dishes (lobster, steak, turkey dinner, burger, pizza, country fried steak, etc.), and I find I'm disappointed most of the time. Their mini pizzas and sliders are phenomenal though.Decor is nice enough. Booths are comfy. Bathrooms are clean. Outdoor spring/summer seating looks nice. The music that plays is mostly 80s and is completely awesome. It's half the fun of going there.Lunch take-out has proven to be a worthless joke for me. Despite ordering 15-20 minutes before I even jaunt on over there for pick up, half the time they forget to put my order in, and the other half of the time something happens in the kitchen and it has to be completely remade. I appreciate the quality checks the staff makes before handing my order over to me, but I'm starving. It's just one freaking soft pretzel! Pleeeeeeaaaasssseeee feed me...I only have 5 minutes left on my lunch!Worth noting are their fantastic managers. If something goes wrong, they're there at your table to make sure it gets done right. They're very friendly and on top of things.So there you have it. Some good points, and some bad. I've put up with it, mostly because it was easy and a comfortable routine for my husband and I. But recently we discovered "I Love Sushi" so I think that's going to seriously cut into our Claim Jumper visits. Which is absolutely fine by both of us. 3 5
Charging customers for decaf coffee or requesting to have same type of ice cream on your Profiteroles is a bad practice to keep faithful clientele. 2 1
The food is excellent. However, the ambience is horrible and the service is terrible. We have picked up there three times within the past two weeks, and every time we did not feel welcome. The waiters and the servers do not speak to you and the the girl behind the register seemed like she was annoyed that we didn't know what we wanted and was rushing us. They look at you cross-eyed and are rude.  I did not feel welcome there. 3 2
Makers and finders was a hidden gym located in the Fremont District of downtown Las Vegas. The food was very good as well as the different products an atmosphere that we were privy to. I will definitely frequent this location in my near travels to the Las Vegas area and look forward to it. 5 4
Six of us dined and took down a fairly large portion of the menu to share. Highlights included tender grilled octopus, the delicious trout, head on shrimp, and well-priced wines by the glass. Service was very good as well. Unfortunately, not all was great. The beef brisket was actually terrible. Extremely salty, very weak chimichurri, and a giant inedible fat cap. Awful. Papas bravas should have a spicy sauce. These came with a pedestrian aioli. At $45, the paella was not worth the price, as it was relatively small, and I didn't taste even a hint of saffron. Brussels sprouts were bitter and very unevenly cooked. They will have to up their game to succeed in such a pricy spot. Hopefully they can pull it together. 2 3
While visiting Montreal from NYC (yup, a tourist), I wanted to find a place to eat that was not filled with my fellow ugly Americans, and that I could walk to from my lovely Latin Quarter B and B.  This was it.   The goat cheese salad was so good that I dreamed about it and had to go back again for another taste.  It was sort of like the early stages of addiction.    That said, the gazpacho was eh- the bread was not entirely blended in, and getting a soggy crust half  way through my bowl was not that pleasant, though the taste was good.The atmosphere- sidewalk cafe on a nice night-- was lovely.  So, too, was the service.   Sad to say for the local patrons, I highly recommend Les Deux Gamins to my fellow travelers. 4 2
I love this place. Nice selection of craft beers,  late night food,  solid To Go set up. The service has never been fantastic but I love the atmosphere and the GOURMET Asian food. I love people watching at this place and love stopping in for a beer. This will always be my first TO GO option on  the way home 4 5
This is the place to go to if you are out with your friends looking for cheap going out clothes. They know their market they have good items at great prices- which is exactly what the girls who shop there are looking for.With that said- i was not pleased with my experience. The merchandise is cheap- but you get what you pay for- but there were also no small sizes. I'm a xsmall or small depending and there was nothing for me to even try on, everything was a size large. Also, I was shocked that while me and about 5 other girls were in there shopping the two sales girls were in the fitting rooms trying things on! I'm sorry but you need to help your shoppers- not yourself. you do that once you close or before your open but not while your on the clock.Their accessories were cute- $8 sunglasses were pretty great, but i couldnt get myself to buy anything. I didnt want to help them if they werent going to help me. 2 3
Chompies changed their corned beef a while back. It's not the same quality and flavor. Scott's and Goldman's corned beef is superior . We  used to be regulars, now we are occasionals 2 3
I can't even tell you how much business I gave this place... two words: never again.I got my hair cut/coloured there for about 3 years. They did a good job, but the service is really not up to par with the other salons I've recently been to. Firstly, I hate it when people try to hard sell me stuff. They are masters at trying to sell you Aveda products. I'm sorry, but I'm not interested in purchasing a 30$ bottle of shampoo. Secondly, I don't like trekking 30 minutes to a salon only to hear "Oh, your appointment is cancelled, oh your hairdresser moved you to another time..." In other words, "your hairdresser is booking other, more important people in your time slot." I know this for a fact because when I arrived for my 11 am appointment (which she who shall not be named "suddenly couldn't attend,") she was at her station with another client, one whom she seemed to be very friendly with. Lest we forget the time I had a wedding and had to wait 2 hours for a stylist (one which I didn't even book) to start working on my updo--- which was apparently impossible. 3 different stylists tried to do a simple braid before 1 finally got it done. and when i got my makeup done, i told the artist i wanted a nude lip colour... she put dark red. i kindly asked her to change it and she gave me major attitude and said it looked good. I'm just beyond turned off. I'm sure many people have had great experiences, but I've been very unhappy with the neglectful service. Screw up my appointment once, shame on you. Screw it up at least 5 times, peace out. 2 1
The decor and food presentation are very nice, and the food is alright - but for the portions they serve, the prices are downright criminal. I walked in off the street and asked for the most popular item - it was an $11.29 Butter Chicken Kathi Roll. While the roll was decent (chicken was pretty dry but flavours were good), the size of the thing was comparable to a McDonalds Breakfast Burrito. I'd call it a snack rather than a meal. It's too bad the place doesn't sell these rolls for $5 - there would be lineups out the door!! 3 2
I've been going to lou's for over two years now. He's honest and he does very good work. He's my go to guy. 4 5
This is the best fish and chips place in Mississauga I've been to. I've only had their halibut and chips, and stick to it, though I'd eventually like to try some of their other fish (if I can get past the halibut!)I've only ever gotten take out here but it is served pretty quickly and properly for fish and chips, in a cardboard box. I can't stand places that use styrofoam as it makes the fish soggy. Thankfully, these guys do it old fashioned!Their fish is lightly battered and crisp. The fries as delicious and obviously fresh. I also believe they are double fried. The home made tartar sauce is good, though they usually give you the packets with your to-go bag, I would like their homemade stuff! It's much better! 5 4
Do not go here if you are not a fan of smelling like a cigar nor if you like your espresso martinis!Pleasant open spot to people-watch.Ideal for older couples and seems to be frequented by groups of middle-aged to older men 3 1
Tonight was the first time I have ever walked out of a restaurant because the food was taking so long.  After waiting an hour, numerous tables received orders ahead of us who had arrived after we were seated.  Manager did not show up to talk with us after waiter said he would. We have eaten here many times and enjoyed the food. This might be our last visit.  Management showed no interest in even talking to us. 2 1
I haven't yelped forever n my first yelp ia bt dmv...that's how bored I am. Lets see ky review the vending macines r overpriced. The chairs suck. It smells funny. Pep smell. At least the ac runs well. Maybe I shld do what I did last time n buy someone's numb for 100 bucks...muhaaahh 2 1
Sweet little place! Great burgers!! Live music. Sorry to hear they are moving to a new location. Loved the little house!Second trip--crab "burger" was like a blob of crab salad on a bun. Not real tasty for me. Husband tried the crab and shrimp stuffed portobello- 2 1/2 stars out of 5, he said. It was thickly covered with melted cheese, a (less than) subtle touch it could be much better without. He said the asparagus was good. The service was good, and they did comp my meal, which was nice of them. In the future we will stick to the burgers!! Live music was very pleasant. Beers good. 3 4
My husband and I stayed here last weekend for a much-needed Vegas getaway. The particular room we stayed in was alright..."A-OK" as my 3-star rating can attest, but honestly? Despite the additional kitchen sink and wine glasses in the cabinets, our room in particular wasn't any more special than a Hampton or Garden Inn. Maybe I'm spoiled by suites at the likes of the Venetian when I travel to Vegas. They're clean and comfortable, and if the price is right...as everyone says, you don't really spend all that much time in the room anyway in Vegas, right? Least you're not likely to find a dead hooker in your mattress or anything. It's also kind of far from the action of the strip, located essentially across from the Sahara and a good few blocks from the Stratosphere. While I'm not a high-rollin' Vegas snob in the least, keep this in mind if this is your first time in Vegas. No casino and no crazy cigarette smell, which is nice, depending on your preference. Hilton Grand Vacations definitely has perks...a 24-hr. convenience shop if you want a late-night sandwich or want to split a bottle of post-cocktail champagne or wine with your sweetie. Nice exercise room. There's also a cool rec room with foozball and such if you're stuck here for a business meeting or what have you. Seems like the perks are better if you're a time share owner here. I'm a measly Hilton Silver member so that's probably why I got an "eh" room. I'm also going to be honest and knock off an additional star for the constant barrage of phone calls I received booking AND staying at this place. I was called at least once a day on my cell prior to arrival (whilst playing phone tag...I'm somewhat respectful and try to return all calls) to "ensure check-in was smooth", which basically translated to me as "Purchase our time share plan!" They will also call your room once a day to try to sell their time shares on to you (loud phone ringing in your room in Vegas is always kind of startling, especially when you're trying to sleep off that last 4am cocktail...)I'd recommend this place if you're already over the hooplah of the Vegas strip and want a somewhat-inbetween getaway. Overall it's clean, comfortable and reasonably priced. In other words (and I abhor this saying but) it is what it is! 3 4
Been dropping in here for several years now, the odd lunch or breakfast. The food is tasty, plain cooking, nothing uber-creative. Fresh ingredients, always. Service can be slow or reasonable, depending on the capacity. Plenty of coffees and teas. I see all these reviews about friendly service, and I guess that's fair for the most part ... still, there is this one lady who serves and takes orders who's always busy and really hustles ... but always looks like she's just swallowed a glass of vinegar. I have NEVER seen her smile. Takes away a little bit from an otherwise pleasant experience. 3 4
Was craving a Belgian waffle after having an amazing waffle down in NYC. After a quick Google search this place came up and my girlfriend and I decided to check it out. She ordered the strawberry delight waffle and I ordered a breakfast crepe. The waffle was tiny and my crepe wasn't up to par with what I was expecting. The waffle was good but it wasn't great...the dough didn't taste fresh. My girlfriend ordered a hot chocolate which was actually very tasty. The service was also very slow, we were surprised to see only 1 employee working on a Sunday. Will probably search for another waffle place the next time we are craving Belgian waffles. 3 4
No liquor, had very good hot sauce, made me have the toots after but all Mexican food does lol. I would give this place a try if you're looking for a chillPlace to eat it but you can also get out of quick. 3 4
I think it's too expensive for the type of food served. I've been there a couple of time and food is ok. Service is good and I guess it takes the usual time time prepare food as any other Mexican restaurant. Not bad for the family. 2 3
This particular location had a lot of their products however, lacked the service you would expect from these places. Walking in, there were two employees standing at the entrance and soon as they saw us, decided that we were not worth their time. Another one did smile at me later but didn't offer any help or assistance voluntarily rather stood there looking beyond the entrance door. Probably waiting for a more rich looking customer.We walked around and found quite a few items we wanted, but no one offered to help even after seeing that we were looking and holding so many different products. This didn't necessarily make us angry, rather disappointed that the workers feel as if they own the brand rather than work for it. We did purchase a few items, a wallet and a cashmere sweater, but didn't feel that happy forking over our money. Whereas if you go across the street to Chanel, could spend thousands of dollars and feel triumphant because of their impeccable service and zeal to help their customers. I don't really recommend this place unless you truly need something from here that you can't get at Holt's. 2 1
Im an average height guy 6', and I get into a comfortable position in seat g13 and there's a stupid piece of glass blocking half of the screen. The glass has no purpose except to block the screen. Remove it or I would never come back here again 3 1
I LOVED my experience at R Salon. Cool atmosphere and nice people. Kenzie was sweet and gave the best head massage EVER!! I loved the results-she did exactly what I hoped she would do with my hair. I didn't want anything but they also have coffee, lemonade, tea, and snacks for their customers!! 5 4
Filet sliders - goodTomato soup & Brie sandwhich - mehSurf & Turf (shrimp, chorizo & tomato) covered in a salsa verse - excellente 4 3
Ordered delivery, and the food was great. There is a $20 minimum, so expect to place a big order. Customer Service: The woman on the phone was extremely rude. Beyond a confrontational tone, she basically hung up on me. After I spent 20 dollars, of course. 3 2
I am one not to write reviews but since I have plenty of time on my hands waiting here I decided why not. Well if you plan on coming here on New Year's Eve for dinner expect to wait 2 hours !!! We were initially told 1 hour and 20 mins so we decided to accept it, but it has now been 2 hours and we still haven't been seated. I just don't want others to get the wrong impression I don't appreciate when restaurants tell you a certain time but then it extends way over. Once you have invested an hour and 20 mins you just keep waiting I sure hope the steaks are good. So once again expect the minimum of 2 hours 3 2
Very nice independent coffee shop near old town Scottsdale.  Usually some great jazz playing on the radio (they have live music too) and it a nice quiet and open feeling space.  Friendly staff - definitely recommend.  It's 'attached' to a church but don't worry - it's independent and nobody has attempted convert me ;) 5 4
So I went here on a Friday night after work just looking to eat something quick before heading out that night. I got a burger, fries and drink and it came to like $15 lol. Ok so with that price I'm hoping this is going to be a really good meal. Wrong. I got a some kinda bacon cheddar burger and it took 15 minutes to make. Employees didn't really seem to care. Then it turns out the smart cook mixed up my 4oz burger with someone else's 6oz. Then the sandwich lady said she'll just switched the patty's and rubbed a bunch of shit off the burger with paper towel even though I told her not to (YEAH, SWEET). Overall, it's just another burger joint that thinks they're hot shit but they're not 1 3
This shop is great if you have a honda or acura. I found them before I moved here from my specialist in Arizona, who I used for about 10 years.james is straight up and gets stuff done fast and cheap. Anytime I leave the car for more than hours they hook up free stuff like buffing the LED lights(much brighter after), rain x windshield, etc. 4 5
It took me a long time to find a great Mexican Restaurant in Scottsdale, so I was very excited to find Frank and Lupe's!   The chips and salsa (one of my favorite parts of the meal) are delicious and I have been satisfied with them every visit.  I also have never been disappointed in the food.  I have to agree with some previous reviews that the service is terrible.  At times it seems like you need to beg to even eat there and they are never friendly to the customers!  Improved service would make this a 5 star review! 3 4
I've never had a bad meal here.  And while I wouldn't say I've had a mind-blowingly great meal here, everything I've had has been a well-executed, slightly-upscale take on the "supper club" food I grew up with.  Well, one exception on that "mind-blowing" thing - the fried cheese curds are amazing. It's a feat to elevate something as heavy as fried cheese to a crispy, transcendent little morsel, but they do an excellent job (and offer a wide variety of tasty dipping sauces.  I prefer the smoked paprika).Breakfast, lunch, dinner - always solid, always delicious.   Breakfast/brunch here is a hidden gem - fresh scrambled eggs, house-cured smoked salmon, granola with Door county cherries, and other takes on brunchy classics make appearances, and there's even a few actual good options for vegetarians.I've always had fresh ingredients, excellent preparation and seasoning, generous but not overwhelming portions.  Oh, and they have one of the better Friday fish fries in town, especially the walleye.  I've heard their Saturday prime rib is delicious, too, but I've never actually been able to get a table on a Saturday night to try it.And therein lies the restaurant's main problem.  The Old Fashioned is a victim of its own success.  Even after the expansion into the old L'Etoile space, the restaurant is seemingly always uncomfortably crowded, loud, and the waits for a table are often unreasonably long.  If you do choose to wait, you can either pack into the bar area, stand outside, or try to cram yourself into the tiny vestibule.  It's not really something they can do terribly much about (although I do wish I didn't feel like I was running a gauntlet past the bar to get to the restrooms), but it is uncomfortable enough that when they say "it'll be about an hour wait for a table" I usually go elsewhere. 4 3
Brought my Mesa Lonestar in for repair a while ago, not only did they take the time to diagnose and fix my amp problem, they also took the time to sit with me for a while and help me dial in my tone better. Quick turn around and friendly service. 4 5
First, the owner is not customer friendly, she did not seem to care at all. Second, the prices are outrageous, $3.10 for a donut and $4.50 for a pizza bun which were good but nothing exceptional...Not impress at all...Will not go back... 1 2
Came with friends to celebrate wedding anniversary, we liked the food and the wine (great selection), but what made us give a 5 stars was the service from our waiter Pedro. He helped us get started with the tapas menu, great suggestions and the way he handled the wine made the meal complete. Would for sure visit again and we hope Pedro still there. 5 4
This was my second time eating Ethiopian food and my friend recommended this place. We shared three main dishes amongst the three of us. I enjoyed having a taste of all the food but I felt that I was mostly filled up on oil and not substance. Also there wasn't much difference between the dishes; a few stood out though it got tiring at the end. I did enjoy the bread though; it was nice and moist with a little bit of sour taste. (like sourdough bread?)Service wasn't very good as we waited a long time for water, ordering and the bill. The tablecloths are also pretty gross since there's leftover food other people spilled all over it.It was a good experience for trying new foods but I'd rather go somewhere else to fill up and leave a smaller dent in my wallet. 2 3
Ok food. I guess, given the concept,  I expected a bit of interaction with the server. That was minimal. I even told the hostess 'i wait tables back home, so he can really be a dick to us' and we got a basic schpiel from the server and a dropped check.  Not really any interaction, which I feel like is the point of the brand. 3 2
Good Servants does an okay job when they show up on time.  I have been using them for about six months now, and I have finally had enough.  They are very disorganized about scheduling.  They have shown up at my house to clean when I never called them.   Each time I had them come clean, they were well over 45 minutes late.  The last time I was supposed to have a cleaning, they were an hour late.  I called and the woman said they were finishing up another house and would be there in 15-20 minutes.  Unfortunately, my time is too valuable and I will be looking for another service. 2 3
I've been to this firehouse a few times recently and have been pretty pleased. The first few times the service has been a bit slow and lacking personality. However I took my wife with me this last visit and there was a bar tender with a broken foot who had us almost in tears from laughing so hard. There were a few older gentlemen a few seats down from us and she was joking with them and chatting about their family and her kids. This bar now seems to be more of a local place to hang out with good company rather than a typical sports bar that you just go to from time to time.  If there were a better selection of craft beers the firehouse would have 5 stars easily!  Not even a decent IPA! The bartender was knowledgeable about beer however the bar had nothing good to offer.  We were  also introduced to the eli steak which was delicious! It is not on the menu, which makes no sense to us but we will be back for it! 4 3
Mixed experience.  Sausages and home fries were cold.  Server seemed genuinely upset.  In summary:  Service? Great!  Food?  Not so much. 1 3
There wasn't anything special about the food. We went to have all you can eat sushi and didn't feel like we got what we paid for. The service was average. The food literally took 50 mins to come out. Come on the place has a 1 hour time limit and took that long to serve. Basically we only got to order 1 round and that's it. The fish also wasn't really fresh and was obvious.  I felt the place was a rip off. Not everything was horrible, the restaurant has a nice interior design and atmosphere. But other than that theres way more better sushi restaurant better than this in las Vegas. 1 2
Aw man, I really wanted to love this place. Got lost as mapquest told me to turn into 6th street but it's just off of 6th. When I walked in, felt like I was in the 70's. Pretty small space but cute interior with classic oldies playing in the background. Ordered the root beer float, nutella, fruit loops, smores, bacon fritter, mexican, blackberry, and lemon meringue donuts with a salted caramel almond milk latte all for about $25. The root beer float, nutella, smores, and bacon fritter were pretty good (not pictured: the fritter and nutella because I ate them before I snapped a pic); everything else, I'd pass on. The coatings on the donuts were very melty and I wasn't too fond of the fillings in them. It was runny! Tip: have a bunch of napkins on you while eating them because I spilled all sorts of fillings on myself and had to lick my fingers off. They also have their own homemade syrups for their coffee drinks (salted caramel, vanilla, and hazelnut) but the latte I got was just alright.Overall, cool spot, friendly staff, and okay donuts that are on the pricier side. I'll give it another try but for now, I still prefer pinkbox and ronald's. 3 4
BFG was amazing! Fellow yelper Ramil B. introduced me to this place and it was awesome. BFG stands for Baked, Fried, Grilled which are the 3 options for how to have your chicken strips. They have a variety of sauces to accompany including "Wasabi Cream." Sides for the chicken are fries, grilled vegetables, garlic bread and mac&cheese. There's something for those who come just to stuff their face and something for the more health conscious.The owner, Jin, is super friendly and he definitely makes it his mission to have a relationship with each of his customers.The artwork on the walls are cute and inviting.This is a great mom&pop shop. A definite cane's replacement. In fact, they are even cheaper than cane's! I LOVE THAT!Speaking of canes, I could choose BFG's garlic bread over Cane's texas toast ANY DAY, HANDS DOWN. The garlic bread is smaller, but it tastes way better.Only downfall, it's nowhere near my house. HAHA. 4 5
I've been here a few times with my family and there's really nothing for me to "complain" about.... their service is on point, if not, gets better every time we eat here, the taste of the food is always consistent, and the serving you get for the price is great. I've read plenty of comments about the service..... maybe you guys should make sure your staff is consistent with the service? I'd really hate to come here one day and end up with a server who doesn't take care of us. 5 3
This is one of Las Vegas' hidden gems.  Unfortunately it's become well known (which is why I didn't give it 5 stars).The deep fried whole lobster is nothing short of incredible.  Definitely my favorite Thai Food in Las Vegas 4 5
REALLY WANT TO LIKE YOU SAUCY. You are getting 1 star though. Only for the beer. Living in Hingetown I was super excited to find out we were getting a Brewery that also crafted pizza!  I keep trying to give Saucy chances and they keep failing me. July 5 opening day we went in and my first impression was WOW! I liked the look and feel of the space. I sampled all the beers on tap. Really like the IPA and the Hefe. Got the Bees Knees pizza and was very impressed. At this point I was thinking YES, this is going to be my go to spot. Second and third times in this place got a bit peculiar. A day later rolled in here after work. It was packed and the ordering areas were chaos. People seemed to be confused on the beer and pizza ordering lines. The bartenders had trouble pouring beers. There was no seating anywhere. You would think for such a big space they would have better usage of it. Upstairs is nice and open but there is only a few seating options. This puzzles me? Saucy has beer and pizza. These two things require inviting comfortable seating areas. I can tell they tried at this but failed miserably. This is not a place for locals. It's a place for the masses. They want to herd you in like cattle. Get in line. Order beer. Drink beer in a corner while waiting for the pizza you ordered in a separate line. Then shove pizza in your mouth as quick as you can because there is nowhere to sit and enjoy it. Worst part of all is consistency. I've ordered the same pizza 3 times. Always turns out different.  One time my 12 inch pizza was only 9 inches. How does that even happen? One night after work I went in just for beers. I really do like the beers here. The "core" beers weren't even all available. The ASAP IPA and B. F. Hefe weren't on draft!!! Another day I placed a pizza order and got a text it was ready. Went to the counter and long and behold no pizza. They said the order was entered wrong and I will be getting a second text when the pizza is ready. This process took roughly 45 minutes entirely. Overall Saucy is not very welcoming and there pizza blows. Hingetown is a small Pocket of Ohio City that tends to feel more like a community. Saucy has a West 6th / Townhall vibe that doesn't quite fit in our neighborhood. I will be across the street at Jukebox like always wondering what could have been. 1 2
We had the grilled salmon special and greek salad with chicken it was good .  The service was excellent.  I m hoping they will serve breakfast.  Not many family own restaurants in Huntersville that serve breakfast.  Will be back for the potroast dinner special next time. 3 4
We're not going back for a long time.  There was crap, bits of food and paper, of one sort or another under the tables that we could see from sitting on the patio.  The tables weren't all that clean.  Our waitress dropped my salad order on the ground and cleaned up only half of it.  She left the rest there until half way through the meal when she came back to our table to refill our waters and I pointed it out to her.  She cleaned up so little of what was still on the floor that when we left, I put my napkin down on the mess she couldn't be bothered to clean up so that we wouldn't step in it on our way out.  They weren't busy this evening; she certainly had the time to clean the floor.  Cleanliness isn't a priority on the patio; it makes one wonder what the kitchen is like.  Not cleaning up her spill lacked courtesy and was just a bit of an insult.  The food was just meh. 2 1
I get take out there 3 or 4 times a month every month  since the store opened a couple of years ago.  I've never had a bad sandwich and never met an unplesant employee.  Clean & polite & decent prices. 4 2
I'm sorry, but the only thing authentic about this place is the word China in its name. Yes, I understand it's a chain, but not a large one so I would suggest spicing up your kitchen and serving less corporate chinese. I will give a better rating for the sole fact that I do like their lettuce roles but that's it. 2 3
Went here to see what the hype what about this place, I wasn't that great like I thought it would be. Their cupcakes were okay, just way too much frosting which made it too sweet. However, they do have a variety of different flavors to choose from but they just need to lay off the frosting a tad bit. 2 3
Food portions are very small, and very overpriced.  Was underwhelmed with the tacos, meatballs ,guac and cevice. Nothing special. However the Mojitos were delivious and the patio is lovely. Will be back for a drink only. 3 2
I've been at this location a few times. Great food. The servers are okay---not great. But I just wish the place was bigger. Sometimes you can't get a table to get some dinner. 4 3
The whole smell and flavour are exactly how it tasted when I was in China, although the noodles tasted a little bit harder than I thought, I still think it's a good dish 4 3
The food is pretty ok here.. But I found part of a clear plastic bag in my food once. 2 3
I've been here twice now and both times have been disappointed. Both times it took at least 20 minutes to get our food. That the longest I've ever waited at a Noodles & Company. The staff isn't very friendly or helpful. The first time we went I paid for extra mushrooms and there were 3 mushrooms in my food, my food which was supposed to already had mushrooms and was supposed to have extra added in it. When I said something to one of the staff, she got an attitude and said that they are busy and that's extra mushrooms. Once I showed her and said there are only 3 in there, she reluctantly offered to get me more. She then slammed it down on the table and said "here." Tonight I got my food to go and was very disappointed. I got the Pesto Cavatappi and there was almost no pesto on it. I got a side salad which has the dressing container inside so cutting my salad in about half. The dressing container was less than 1/3 full so it makes it seem like they are just using it to take up space so they don't have to give you as much. I am VERY disappointed in this location. Noodles & Company is one of my favorite places to eat. Even though this one is the closest to my house, I don't think I'll be returning. 1 2
OK DONT GET ME STARTED ON POPEYES. THIS PLACE IS AMAZING AND THE BEST.I came here 5:50 on a Friday night and I went to drive through. It was a 45 minute wait which totally made me evaluate my decision on coming here next time. Though I think I will wait till the hype goes down to come back. Though the wait was worth it. The chicken is delicious and crispy and everything you want. I had the $7.99 2 combo meal which include 2 chickens, a biscuit which is my favourite thing there because it's buttery and matches perfectly with the chicken, a choice of side, and a drinkHonestly this was so very good and I would come back on the biscuits alone. I FUCK WITH THIS SO MUCH.  If you had just eaten KFC since now, this will change your life because it's WAY BETTER. the only thing that sucks is the waitHonestly its a good place to go but it is a tiny location and I could say how I alone could speed up the drive though but I'm not the manager. The food is great, service is polite, Popeyes is a good US branch, and blood is red. It's just the facts 4 5
Very disappointed.  Considering the price was way too expensive, we expected much more in quality.  Service was not good nor bad.    Small burgers and serving size for fries was worse. 1 2
Alrighty...so I'm Vietnamese and for me to give a high rating for Vietnamese restaurant is a mighty challenge in itself.If I end my meal with out drinking all the broth (for Pho) or throwing back the shot of fish sauce then it's not high on my list.  This place is close to home and we didn't feel like putting on our kevlar to head over to my fav Vietnamese restaurant. Got seated right away, but took a bit for our order to be taken.  I make it a point to order in Vietnamese with hopes they prep the dish with a little bit more of an authentic touch.  Call me crazy but that's how my mind works. For the food, we ordered the lemon grass pork on rice which came with two spring rolls and fried egg.  One large pho sate chicken and also one large pho sate beef.The rice dish, is ok.  I don't know how to explain it, nothing stood out to me and screamed eat me!  It wasn't bad, just ok..The pho sate, I honestly believe they just used the regular broth and added the sate hot sauce to it afterwards and in my humble option that's a no no.  I love pho sate when the broth is specifically made with the intent to be sate, my absolute fav is the sate that has a strong peanut flavour to it.  Unfortunately this wasn't that.Again it was alright.  Next time I get a craving from the motherland, I'll make the trek across town.Oh, and no complementary hot tea, what!? 2 3
I was out looking for a place for a late lunch in rural Geauga County, and found that the pickins are slim.  Mangia's entry on here was pretty good, so we decided to check it out.  I have no complaints with the service, but the food is mediocre at best.  I had the eggplant parmagiana and my partner had the chicken parm.  Both dishes were essentially pre-formed, pre-breaded patties covered by a thin layer of marinara sauce and a slice of provalone that was placed under a heating element.  Both meals came with a side of pasta, which, had it been a steak, would have been great because it was tender and you could cut it with a fork.   But it wasn't a steak ... it was pasta. And pasta shouldn't be "fork tender."Don't get me wrong, it didn't taste bad ... it was perfectly edible, but it's not anything an Italian might recognize as food of the motherland. 2 3
I ordered chicken fingers, bacon cheese fries & a oreo cookie shake. The delivery took 1 hr & 45 minutes. The food was cold & the fingers were over cooked. The shake was described as a custard ice cream shake but it tasted like crushed ice-milk with that consistency too. If thats a  custard milkshake, which I have eaten, then im a blonde lol...On the plus side was that they put a lot of bacon on the bacon cheese fries. But, thats about it. Needless to say, im never ordering from this place again. 2 1
I don't understand what all the fuss is about. They're oversized, overpriced sloppy donuts. Nothing new or fancy. Just a fad. 2 1
This food here is fantastic! My wife and I eat vegetarian most of the time, and this is one of our mainstay restaurants for take-out nights. But don't let the 'vegetarian' label scare you off, this is just damn good Indian food by any standard.Our usual order is the aloo paratha (potato bread), masala dosa (dosa stuffed with spicy potato), and the chana masala (chana dal in a liquidy masala sauce with rice). One order of each of those is enough food to stuff two people, for a total of $18.53+tax+tip. Note that's 1 order of each of those, total, not 1 for each person.I'm docking one star because the service when you eat in is lacklustre to say the least. Most of the time they don't seem to care whether you get water, take your order in any reasonable time, etc.But the food is good enough to keep me coming back again and again for take-out. 4 5
We had a great experIence , the waiter was super nice and helpfull, the kids chicken fIngeRs were delicious and so was the chicken pot pie! Salads and soup were fresh and tasty, also the poppy seed little munchkins were yummy!!! 5 4
This was my first experience eating Ethiopian food.  It was a fun communal experience as our dinner club ate with our hands getting food from the center of the table.  We ordered the combination platter to sample a variety of food which I enjoyed.  My friend had the Ethiopian wine which had a smell that I wasn't use to, but was different to me.  Service was fine and the waitress was friendly.  She educated us on what to order.  I did notice a roach in the bathroom crawling on the sink. I hope they exterminate.  The place is in an old strip mall that doesn't look like the most visually appealing area near the strip, but its a hidden ethnic joint for Las Vegas foodies. 2 4
Went for dinner Aug 2012 at the roof patio. Food was ok for a pub I guess, standard menu with no surprises and fair dishes. Service was below average. Too many tv sets around for a patio. Small separate place in the back for smokers - not too friendly for a big open patio. Bit overpriced as well - would rather spend that amount of money to go a restaurant trying a new dish or better cooked. Overall average rating although it looks great from the street view. 2 3
This is the some of the yummiest Chinese food I've had since moving to AZ, and absolutely the yummiest Chinese delivery I have had since moving here.  I've only found three or four places total that have delivered, and all of them have been mediocre or worse, except for Asia Lee.  Everything I've gotten from them is delicious; last time I ordered Szechuan Beef, Pork Egg Foo Yung, and the free Chicken Fried Rice that comes with any order of $15 or more.  I wasn't a huge fan of the pork that came with the Egg Foo Yung, but the egg patties themselves are savory and delightful.  The Szechuan Beef is my absolute favorite, and it made a great lunch when I reheated it the next day, as welll.  I've never been inside the restaurant, so I can't vouch either way for the last review, but honestly, why would I go to the restaurant when I can have all the yumminess delivered right to my door? 4 5
We always thought the Farm Grill was great, but were very disappointed this trip! Whom ever sold them on the idea of the drinks offered at the fountain, really did them a disservice! The need to go back to offering adult selections like Coke or Dr Pepper again instead of the crappy flavors like "Tractor Cola". It tasted awful, so both my wife and I tried a couple of others. They were all terrible. I settled for water, and my wife drank the root beer, which was tolerable! We liked the do over in tables and atmosphere, but did the burgers shrink, or was our disappointment in the drinks just putting us in a crappy mood! 1 2
I have always wanted to try this place based on awesome reviews on their breakfast from friends and family, especially the French toast.  Finally stopped in this morning around noon for lunch and was kind of underwhelmed by the whole place.Typical 15 to 20 minute wait for a table but noticed everything looked very classy, with white tablecloths and Specialty menus because of it being a Saturday. Talked to the waitress and she commented how they are trying a new thing with the specialty menus and going for a more decadent feel. Not really what I was looking for since I had two small kids with me, but we decided to give it a try anyway.They did not have many options on the specialty menu for the children so we paid $16 for a waffle and chicken for them. We could get ala carte items on the side , so we ordered a side of scrambled eggs.For the adults, we ordered the strip steak,  asparagus and gruyere scrambled eggs with hollandaise sauce.Everything was delivered to our table and looked very well plated. The waitress was slow to fill our glasses and we never got our side of scrambled eggs. By the time they came we were basically done with our breakfast. The chicken and waffles was very tasty and the kids enjoyed it.The steak and eggs was disappointing. It was two very small slivers of medium cooked steak, with a few half pieces of asparagus over the scrambled eggs. What was supposed to be hollandaise sauce looked more like a combination of egg yolks and butter. The taste wasn't awful, but for $22 a plate I guess I had higher expectations.Overall it was not a terrible experience, however be prepared to know that you are ordering from specialty menus on the weekends and it is on the fine dining end of the spectrum. I was looking forward to having some great local French toast, so I guess I will keep looking. 3 2
The family and I have gone for the 'pumpkin patch' the last 3 years (we don't get live Christmas trees).  Great pumpkin selection, reasonable prices.  Wish they had a few more food vendors due to family food allergies.  Definitely enjoy going and making great family memories. 4 5
Very loud, service is very slow and food is just ok.  Went with a group of girls and we couldn't even order dessert because it was impossible to get our server to take our order.  Will not be returning here. 3 2
Had the Chimi, Tacos and Bugogi fries.  Had no ides what to expect of the fusion taste.   Simply put, I was blown away.  Definitely on our return to list of places! 5 1
Ok BBQ. I prefer the sauce added during the chopping, so adding it was just ok. The price seemed high for a pound at $12.99. Hushpuppies were a good blend of corn meal and onion. Staff need smiles. 4 3
Great healthy veggie options with environmentally sensitive packaging. I had the 5 star salad. Delicious!! Service was fast and friendly.   Clean upscale decor. 5 4
We were there in the afternoon and the place was pretty empty but the food was excellent we ordered the Korean BBQ combo for 2-3 people and it was plenty of food for us, I would say it feeds 4 people. We ordered spring rolls and dumplings as appetizers and it was really good. I highly recommend this place. 4 5
Frisch's is pretty reliable, family-friendly fare. Decent prices. I usually get a bacon burger. Their onion rings are above average. The salad bar actually seems like a pretty nice option, although I've never selected it. I have done the breakfast bar, which has a surprisingly nice selection. My inlaws seem to love the liver and onions, but I'm not quite prepared to go there myself. 4 3
Pizza is cooked ahead and slices are reheated when you order.  Tasteless and expensive. $7 for cheese slice and $8 with topping. 1 2
Slow slow service, very dirty place, menu complicated any topping that you add is an extra charge, food average : Go somewhere else you will be there for at least 1.5 hrs for just breakfast 1 2
I took the Ballet Barre class, and it was pretty good. I went on a purchased Groupon, which was 2 classes for the price of 1. What I liked: The atmosphere: I did really like the minimalist / modern decor. It's cool and fits right in with its uptown location.The class itself: It was relatively low impact, and only about a third of the class was actually using the barre (the beginning was arms, the middle on the barre, and the end abs / stretching). The instructor was great, and the class size was good. I do wish we had spent more time on the barre.The locker room was very clean and nicely arranged (although there are only 2 showers, which could mean waiting a while after a lunchtime class).What I didn't like so much:Price: This place is pretty expensive. It was okay to take 2 classes with the Groupon, but to join full time is a lot of money to only have access to about 3-4 different kinds of classes. I am a full time Y member, and for a lot less money they offer many different choices.Mats: When we arrived (I went with a friend, who'd also purchased the Groupon), the guy at the front desk asked if we had mats. We said no, we didn't know we needed them. "It's in the course descpription" was the answer; though no one reminded us of this when we registered for the class. We had to pay $2 each to rent a mat for a 1 hour class. $2!!! Definitely a rip off. For my 2nd class have no doubt that I will remember to bring my own. I mean, $2!!!The windows: The exercise room is right at street level on the corner of Stonewall / Church St., and it is totally windowed. So people are constantly walking by and staring. Maybe I am extra self conscious, but that was distracting to me, and at times in the class it made me pretty uncomfortable (like when men are walking by and starting at a class full of women doing hip thrusts). Also, my guess is that in the summer being in that room is like being in a fishbowl of magnifying glasses; meaning, won't it be really hot in there?Overall - it was a pretty okay experience to try a different kind of class with the Groupon, but I wouldn't pay the regular price for a class, not would I consider becoming a member full time. 3 2
You walk into Joel Robuchon and know that every detail is going to be taken care of. The interior was so beautiful. We sat in their atrium which had a wall covered in beautiful green flowers and were nice and secluded; we felt like we could be a little louder here than in the somber, yet gorgeous dining room. The wait staff was phenomenal and they seemed to adapt their personalities to their customers - they could tell that we wanted to be a little bit more laid back than the atmosphere so they brought it down a notch for us. The food was nothing if not spectacularly presented and everything was very flavorful. One of my favorites was a tomato and mozzarella salad - now that would sound simple if you were dining at any other restaurant, but here it was quite a masterpiece. I also enjoyed the Pea soup, the turbot and the lamb. (I normally don't eat quite so many dishes, but all of the menu choices were Prix fix.) My favorite things about the restaurant are the cheese and pastry carts - the things that add ceremony to the evening and that make a dinner at this restaurant an experience rather than a meal. I guess my only complaint is that the dinner was so well orchestrated it seemed as if some of the soul was missing. 5 4
Their claim to fame, the Smoked Meat, is pretty good. But everything else I've tried has been just OK (or in some cases unavailable due to weird supply shortages). Soups are OK, knish was OK, beef brisket OK, fries were soggy and greasy, meatloaf was overpowered by thyme or rosemary (don't recall which)..I really wanted to like this place, but unless I order a smoked meat sandwich I usually end up disappointed. 3 2
I went in for a cut and color last month. The color turned out okay but the cut is messed up. When I called to make the appointment the owner (recognized the name from the reviews here) answered and I asked for someone experienced because I have very fine hair. I obviously didn't get someone with much experience. Will not be going back. 3 1
I've had samples of their ice cream which are also very good, but I always go back to the Ferrero Rocher! 5 4
My first 3 star review.I really can't write that the food was terrible because it really wasn't. The problem is that it was nothing special. The burger had gristle and was salty, boring. The toppings are nothing special. Offering one "special" topping and one generic topping is not worth the prices they ask. $11.00 for a combo? I'd rather go to Moxies and get a burger from them for the same price. Much better. All the hype for these "specialty burger houses" just makes the disappointment they offer that much worse. Lower the prices, offer more selection and give more fries, then you might be worth the hype. As it stands these places Hero burger/South St/Five guys are nothing more than hyped up dives with not much more to offer than the "regular" burger dives. 3 2
Decent pho place. A little skimpy on the meat (only about 3-4 beef balls in my large). 2 3
Best thing going for North Town. You must try the hot wings & hot chicken tenders! The fries are perfect but burgers are whatever. I've never tried the Mexican or sea food because I'm addicted to the wings and fingers. You get a lot of bang for your buck! Last night i went and ordered 2 regular cheeseburgers, 10 piece hot wings, & 4 chicken fingers which came out to $20 and some change. Parking sucks though when it's busy. 4 3
This is such a beautiful spa! I had visited here for the first time recently and I will be coming back! 4 5
We visited October 2013 before and after a show at the hotel that Dick's is at. Our lunch was overpriced, but we enjoyed the crude entertainment and drinks. We did opt for the souvineer cup knowing we would want to come back for drinks after the show. Our first experience was pleasant enough and left us happy. When we came back that evening though, the bartender was spending so much time with a patron across the bar and taking selfies for her, that he flat out ignored others at the bar. When we finally got his attention, he tried to overcharge us for our drinks. We did have to ask him about it, and this is where it draws the line between funny crude joking to flat out being a true dick. The bartender didn't know the difference at that point and was literally being a jerk. We did call him on his attitude knowing we could be misinterpreting it, but he had a totally jerk ass response and validated that he was being rude. We didn't deserve this. We paid, but left without tipping. He went back to flirting. I would have expected better from the bartender (even mediocre service) being that this place is a tourist location. 3 1
It's no secret I go out of my way for Artigiano.  Love the coffee!  Hard to find a table at peak hours and gets very noisy, but you'll know why if you are a coffee lover.  They are the only place in Canada that I've been to that is able to include coffee art on a soy latte.  Almost hate to drink it... NOT! 4 2
I love the food here, I've never gotten something that I didn't like. The customer service is hit or miss. However, this morning was awful. There were 4 people in line when I came in, no biggie - actually that's the least amount of people I've ever been behind. The young man taking the orders, not only mumbled every word, he also spoke extremely softly - I heard the two customers before me say "Huh?" or "Excuse Me?" several times for him to speak up, while placing their orders.  The employee that was taking money was polite, noticeably stressed, but polite. After paying for my breakfast sandwich, I stepped aside to wait. The other busy bees were running around between the back of the house and front counter getting bagels made, sliced, toasted, boxed... While waiting, I couldn't help but notice the orders that were coming out before mine - 3 out of the 4 were wrong. Wrong bagels in a Baker's Dozen box, the other box's bagels weren't sliced, another gourmet bagel was the wrong bagel all together... I've never seen that many missteps from the employees! Also while waiting (it took quite a while for my order), I overheard someone, who I'm assuming is the Manager, complaining to another customer her annoyance in having to train other employees and how she just "didn't have time for such nonsense." Hmm.. 2 1
Nice place.  Reasonable price.  Some of the staff might not have the most perfect English.  But mostly understandable.  As most guys probably don't need anything super elaborate this should be fine.Cheers, 3 4
This has a beautiful classy style as soon as you walk in. Great professional staff. The menu has something for everyone. Clam chowder & the lobster bisque soups are the best in the Valley. Sea Bass is tasty as is their burger and the fried chicken. If you love Fresh sea food cooked perfectly and creative dishes? This is the place. A little peace of heaven here in Arizona. 4 5
The buffet always has a long line to get in. Then It is pricey, but The seafood is good tho. I might come back. But i liked The ceasar palace's Better :) 4 3
Had dinner here a few nights ago, overall it was nice but I certainly didn't leave thinking it was all that. Spent a while looking at the menu. For one there are no capitol letters and the font can't be any bigger than size 10 so I sort of found it difficult to read. Secondly, nothing really sounded that good, maybe they switch it up often. Girlfriend had some sort of girly pear drink in a martini glass, this probably stood out the most. It almost tasted like drinking a fresh pear but with a little booze, quite good. On the other hand, my Coors Light tasted like beer. Several different artisan type breads were offered, we tried a couple, I like the pretzel one the best. For dinner I had the mushroom risotto and GF had a steak. Risotto was fine, GF's steak came pre-cut up into little pieces. Is this supposed to be for the dog? We both thought that was pretty odd and basically cheating if they're trying to see how well they cooked it. To wrap it up, we had the tiramisu. Our waiter said it was the best ever (I hate it when wait staff say that). It was good, I mean it's not like I'm not going to eat a big cup of tiramisu but it was by no means the best ever. It was on the dry side actually. Mph, we tried it but I don't think we will come back. 3 2
I would give them 2.5 stars because the donuts are always on point- when they have them in stock. Can't say the same for the drive-thru service! They are rude and interrupt while placing an order, they are usually out of donuts, but don't tell you until they have already ran your credit card. This has happened 3 out of five times (no matter how early or late I get there).  The problem is, it's the closest one to my house and my kids love them on Saturday mornings as a treat. Oh, and please put back the picture signs with the donut names. This would be helpful at the drive thru. Thank you. 2 3
There has never been a more glorious hole than this!After lusting over the website for weeks, my husband decided to take me out on a Sunday lunch date which included Glory Hole Doughnuts as "dessert". We got there at about 2:45pm and were told that unfortunately there weren't any donuts available until quarter after 3pm. We were given a number.We came back promptly at 3:15pm. At 3:30pm the donuts started rolling out in batches. It was like a fashion show of sugary creations and we started naming the donuts out loud as they came out. By that time, the line-up was out the door so it was good that we had come earlier and got a number because they employed the numbering system for only half an hour and only up to the number 5. We were number 5. Numbers 2-4 were nowhere to be found. We may or may not have bound them to chairs in an abandoned warehouse prior to 3:15pm. We ordered a half dozen mixed. Also ordered two coffees, which we realized afterwards they gave to us for free. The service was great. We joked. They laughed. They smiled. We skipped out the door in merry delight. Now, on to the taste test...Here's what was worth mentioning...Butter & Toast - When I go to heaven, I wish to float in butter and eat these til eternity.Elvis with Marshmallow - One word: bacon.S'mores - I want s'more! (Sorry, bad pun)The donut itself, though, is the real winner. Its soft and light without being too airy because it needs a little weight to carry its hoard of toppings, which also do not disappoint. They are deliciously huge - bigger than a bagel. They range in price from $2.00 to $4.00 each, and you can get a half-dozen for $20. 4 3
This review is for the Scottsdale Red Robin, at Pima & Shea.  Very disappointing visit.  On a Sunday afternoon and I wanted to take my son to lunch while we watched some football.  I had seen the commercials about their gourmet burgers, and decided to give them a try.  While looking for a booth to sit in, we noticed that several televisions were not working and were unable to find a place to watch football, not a big deal.  We finally found a booth and sat down.  A member of the staff come over and told us that we were not able to sit in that particular booth, because it was too close to the bar!  I couldn't believe it, it wasn't even close to the bar.  It was about 20 feet from the bar, I thought they were kidding.  She said we had to move to the only available table which was in a corner, next to the bathroom without a view of any television.  I kept asking about other tables and booths, she kept telling me that they were too close to the bar area.  I asked if we could sit outside, or was that too close to the bar, but she said that no tables were outside.  I have never in my 50 years experienced a less desirable atmosphere to experience a meal.  Unfortunately I will never get to experience the food at Red Robin.  Not a friendly family environment at all. 1 2
We went there with high hopes & but got disappointment.Many of the items had just rice with charred vegetables without any spice. Even meat items had no taste. We felt it too costly for the quality we got.Desserts were okay. 1 2
Food was def on point! Got fried whiting, greens and mac and cheese! The greens and the fish stood out the most! Mac and cheese good but not great!! Greens were seasoned to perfection with a perfect hit of sweetness. Fish was rather thin in my opinion but seasoned pretty well....Their whiting is a joke compared to Mert's!! Nevertheless food was good and I will definately be back when Im back in the area!! 4 3
This restaurant opened my mind to the whole vegan/gluten-free thing as a dining option.I mean, I want to be healthy, but I don't want it to be... unpleasant.  Especially when I'm paying for it.  I got the Soup & Salad Combo of Amazingness that everyone here raves about.  And it was.  It was amazingness.  The soup was hearty and rich.  The salad, deceptively filling.  And so well dressed!  Delicious.  Delicious.  I recommend it v. much. 5 4
Great burger black and bleu Fries good but not fresh cutShrimp cocktail excellent and great homemade horseradish Ice cream sandwich cheap at $3 not bad but straight from the box nothing specialService and burger both excellent 5 3
Great sashimi.  Thought I'd test the so called "world class" tuna melt, like there really is such a thing, but if one wants to use great tuna then possibly,  but otherwise not world class by any  means except the tuna, which great, but then really just a great piece of tuna between 2 sliced of bread.... Hard to beat a "real" tuna melt folks!  Especially for the price! 1 4
We had heard of Buldogis from fellow yelper Anthony S, but had never made it out there because it was so far from where we live. One random day, Kalila and I found ourselves on that side of town and took advantage of it by finally trying this place out.My favorite food is hot dogs, so I definitely had high standards and high expectations.I ordered the beef buldogi dog and kaliia had the banh mi dog. We also got the chicken wings with a side of asian ginger sauce.The beef bulgogi dog was very delicious and flavorful. The meat was tender. The bulgogi mayo was a great compliment to the hot dog.Kalila's banh mi dog was really good as well. The sriracha mayo was perfect for her. Not too spicy and not too mayo-y. The pork belly and banh mi slaw worked well with the hot dog.The hot dogs themselves are thick and juicy. Each hot dog is really loaded up with its' toppings so you get your money's worth... if not more.The chicken wings were not anything special. I was looking forward to the asian ginger sauce being something similar to the asian zing sauce at buffalo wild wings, but it wasn't even close. The asian ginger sauce was more like an oil and you could barely even taste it. Somewhat of a disappointment since their hot dogs were so good that the same amazement couldn't transfer over to the chicken wings, but it's ok. You're not really ever going to go to bulDOGis for chicken wings. You will go and get hooked on their amazing hot dogs.I just couldn't resist another hot dog. I then ordered the buckeye dog. The corn relish was the business. The bacon was crispy. It was awesome all around.They have a large menu and plenty more foods to try.Aside from the menu behind the counter, they have an additional menu of specials written on a chalkboard wall to the left.There are clean restrooms inside (separate men & women, individual use).They have 2 tv's and if you ask for the remote, they will allow you to change the channel. We watched the rebels lose to SDSU. Our stomachs were happy, but we left heartbroken.MUST TRY THIS PLACE. 4 3
Cheap and right down the street, but they don't take appointments. Ann is great for eyelashes though, the best in central Phoenix. 3 4
Atmosphere - a bar for bicyclers with bikes hanging all over and arty photographs of Pittsburgh and/or bicycles or both some for sale. On walking in I thought we'd made a mistake on seeing the very small bar with a couple tables then walked up a couple stairs in the back to a room with 10-12 tables. Mid-Sunday afternoon there were a couple beer drinkers and as we left a Triathlon group of 10-15 came for a meeting.Service - surprisingly excellent for a bar considering we were the only ones eating at the time and brought 2 kids with us. Kids were offered coloring books and a selection of markers. One small topping mistake with a burger was quickly remedied and even the chef/cook apologized in passing which was exceptionally nice.Food - the menu is fun with wild mixes of toppings (peanut butter bacon burger, burger on a salad) that looked fun to try. The kids' meals (usually 2.99) were actually free (Sunday special) and there are a few typical offerings that come with fries, applesauce or celery/carrots. Burger 1 - Primanti style with egg, cole slaw, fries - was a strong good. 3 starsBurger 2 - Veggie (all burgers can be made turkey or veggie) boca-style dipped in hot sauce with hot pepper cheese, bacon (yes!), lettuce, tomatoe, blue cheese dressing on side. Delicious. Bun was soft yet not too squishy. Onion rings - can choose for .95 extra instead of sides. Delicious beer batter, perfectly cooked real onions inside, generous serving. Could have used a little more salt in batter but forgiven because tasted homemade instead of an oversalted mix.Pretzel appetizer - yummy, typical baked not fried, served with a yummy cheese that seemed like a real cheese spread made with butter instead of plastic nacho cheese. If so quite surprising.One surprise is that most of the choices on the menu were not very healthy for what you'd think would be a healthy-eating bicycling crowd. Maybe if you triathlon then you don't need to watch what you're eating. The salads were few and very simple. More thought went into the burgers and the sandwiches. There were a a couple simple vegetarian with cheese paninis and the veg burger options and the seitan wings that we didn't try.Overall primarily a bar with fun and pretty good sandwiches and burger and a couple salads. I'd return for fabulous happy hours and daily specials. $5 burger night for example. $10 any sandwich and a beer night. 3 4
I don't even remember why we decided to go here...but we did and it was a hit w/ the out of town friends.  We came here twice with friends & family from Chicago and Arizona.  They were very impressed w/ the place!!  The price is alright.  But, would I pay $30+ to hang out and freeze my butt for fun...no I would not.  You get black fury boots, thin gloves, jacket and 2 drink tickets.  When I first walked in, I was really impressed.  It was bright, had a bar, bar counters and seats.  After a while, it gets cold.  And the music they play is not the kind I really listen to...I believe it's house music?   Overall it was a good experience...a must see in Vegas.  We would definitely come back to show more friends from out-of-town...only because it's different. 4 3
Definitely not the worst sushi I've ever had. However it wasn't good at all. I would stay away from the tuna it tasted off and very mushy. The only thing good about this restaurant is the service. Lastly, it's very easy to order too much. Keep track of the quantity as they charge for every uneaten piece. 2 1
A bit of drive, wish there were more locations but I love the food. Pretty pricey but...whatever. Treat yo self!! 4 3
Quiet a decent place for brunching and if you're a big fan of coffee and beer then they have something for you in the menu, a coffee flavored beer. Just swing by. 4 3
I really enjoyed the food while eating it, however it seemed to be like clockwork for our whole party, 4 hours after eating made you want to throw up. It ruined our evening events. Also I think that it's absurd to automatically add 20% gratuity for parties of 6 or more. Most places only start to include gratuity after 8 people and at 18% to split the 15-20% debate. It's as if we are tipping them for their inability to handle more than six burgers. I believe that the servers would be more enjoyable if they actually had to work for their money using their personality. 2 3
Super Expensive and quoted one price by the owner Michelle and charged another that was three times the amount.  Quoted minimum amount for maintenance of $100 and charged $525.  In fact, my card was said invalid funds as I did not expect to pay the much. I ended up writing a cheque for very cheap hair and I got taken.  Not a pleasant feeling especially when she knew I wasn't working.  Used the worst quality hair that came out within five weeks (extensions) - not a good experience for me.  I always had to wait for service and I was never treated nicely.  I thought it was a racist thing.  Luckily I found a wonderful place that does great extensions and colour called Wave Length Hair by Joyce Jones who is amazing.  In fact, she couldn't believe how bad my hair looked and ha to take out the extensions that I had in for only five weeks from this salon and put in her own extensions using high quality hair and didn't charge me.  She only charged me for maintenance because that is what she quoted me on the phone.  Her colour was beautiful.  I had many compliments two hours after I left.  I thank God I met her.  She's been doing hair/extensions for 35 years and is truly the best and very honest! 1 5
My wife and I were eager to try this restaurant having just finished a five year stint in Washington DC where we became big fans of Chef Jose Andres.  China Poblano didn't disappoint.We sat at the Dim Sum/Noodle Bar (there's also a Taco Bar as well as regular dining tables) overlooking chefs meticulously preparing different dim sum dishes.  My wife ordered a margarita, which comes topped with a salt foam in lieu of the traditional salt-rimmed glass, while I ordered a Singapore Sling.  Both were quite tasty.While we looked over the unique menu we ordered up some lengua tacos (don't knock 'em until you try 'em), which were one of our favorites at Oyamel (a Jose Andres restaurant in DC).  The tacos were as delicious as we remembered them.Meanwhile, the dim sum chefs in front of us inspired us to try some lamb pot stickers which had a nice flavor highlighted by some cumin and other seasonings.  A gentleman next to us was eating some type of Chinese sandwich which looked and smelt fantastic. We decided to get one for ourselves to see if it tasted as good as it looked.  Sure enough, the Rou Jia Mo sandwich was simply awesome.  My wife and I agreed that it would make a great late night snack...especially if you had a few drinks.The one downside about most of the dishes at China Poblano is their size.  If you go on an empty stomach, plan on ordering a few dishes.  Of course, that also means you get to try more dishes which is something I can live with.Now that my wife and I are based on the West Coast we go to Vegas often, and now that Jose Andres has a great place like China Poblano here I'm guessing we'll be frequent visitors. 4 5
Rooms were acceptable, great pools, good restaurants.  The valets and servers in the pool areas were great. However, the service and the attitudes of the concierges and housekeepers at this JW made me a lifetime Hilton customer. 2 3
We moved down here from Flagstaff, so the first time I had Pita Jungle was up north. It was great food, but piss poor service up there. Occasionally we'd get sat and then the server or whoever would never show up... ever.When we got down here we found out there was a Pita Jungle down the street and we were a little apprehensive to go there due to a few bad experiences at another location. When we finally went, we had great service, and have returned quite a few times since.We try not to come here too often for fear of it getting old. The food is not always great, but still eatable. When it's not great, it's just a little bland (only thing keeping it from being a 5 star). The Chicken Curry Salad is hands down my favorite dish. I'm usually shocked by the portion sizes. I don't think I've ever had a small portion here. The Chicken Curry Salad and the Medchilada are HUGE. And that's not a complaint. They also have, hands down, the BEST hummus.Every server we've had here has been on point and speedy. I read a couple of other reviews about this location and I have retort: I don't care what my server is doing elsewhere in the restaurant as long as I get good service. If he/she is serving a table clear on the other side of the restaurant and my service doesn't suffer then I'm a happy camper.Part of the other reasons we keep returning to this location are the prices. Good size portion dishes are right at $10. Other places with similar dishes would be in the realm of $19-$23. 4 3
First of all. I'm a fan of chef ramsay and hope every thing perfect.  This is first time i try this burger.  When i walk to the host two girl cute asian just talk to each another and doesn't look at me. Until o ask for table for 1 they offer me to sit at bar it ok for me but she just point to bar and say go ahead snd back to talk to each another again. The burger need more salt it no test and asian salad is so so. It not matt for 14$ for burger and 13 for salad. In&out is alot bettet. 2 3
I first heard about this place from Cleveland Magazine's 2010 edition that focused on Cleveland's best diners.  We decided to check it out on a Saturday morning at about 10 a.m. The address is on Lorain, but consider parking on a side street to avoid the metered spaces out in front of the restaurant.  We parked on the north side of Lorain, because it seemed to be a slightly better neighborhood than on the south side, and only had to walk a quarter of a block to the front door.We were lucky when we got there, because there was just one open table and it was a two-top. Actually there seemed to be a charmed quality to the morning, because the place was continually full, but it seemed like every time a party walked in, one of the tables would finish up and leave ... no one ever seemed to wait more than 2-3 minutes before they got a table.The ambiance of the place was interesting.  As for the decor, it looked a little schizophrenic.  One side of the restaurant is sort of an industrial-80s homage, while the other side is a neo-graffiti mural of a Japanese-style monster attacking Cleveland.  It almost seemed like there were two owners who each got to choose the decoration for their side of the room.  The crowd was incredibly diverse for Cleveland.  There were a few families with kids, while at another table there were a group of bikers, and at another was a table of gentlemen of three different ethnicities. It was a mix of different races, economic groups, ages, and social statuses.The service was pretty quick.  We had a very attentive waitress who welcomed us and informed us that the restaurant had been in the newspaper that morning, and told us that she'd bring us the article to read.  We found this charming, although we didn't really care so much about reading the review.The menu is extensive and the prices are surprisingly low.  We took advantage of the the economical options to try out a few extra dishes.I ordered the "Three Eggs with Two Sausage patties, hashbrowns andtoast" for only $4. I also ordered a side of three pancakes FOR $3.50.My partner got the "buiscuits and gravy" which came with three eggs, and hashbrowns, for $5. He also got a side of corned beef hash for $2.50.Overall the food was just fine; it's exactly what you expect from breakfast food at a diner. My critique is that nothing was extraordinary.  The eggs were done very well.  Mine were scrambled, and were fluffy, without being too moist or too dry.  My partner had his over easy, and they were perfection.  The pancakes were light and very hot, which made them perfect for soaking up the butter.  There were a few minor disappointments though. The hashbrowns were mushy, without any real crust to them.  I think they were frozen potato strips that were kept on the griddle for too long without enough oil to make them crisp.The gravy for the biscuits was a little underwhelming, and may have come ready made.  The corned beef hash also seemed like it was from a can. Again, it tasted okay, but these are simple dishes that can be done easily and well from scratch.I mentioned before that the waitress was very attentive; unfortunately, the kitchen was a somewhat slow.  Despite the delay, the waitress did an amazing job of keeping our coffee full, and letting us know about where things stood in the kitchen.  While we would have liked our food about 10 minutes sooner than we got it, the customer service more than made up for the delay, and she waitress could hardy have done a better job of making sure we knew we had not been forgotten.Overall we really enjoyed our meal and will definitely be back. 4 3
Well white spot.... Now you've gone and done it. We have been coming to the white spot for years and noticing the service start to tank. It's been three or four times of hour and a half plus meals because of service/not enough staff/no glasses/no cutlery. I honestly feel bad for the staff having to deal with hordes of angry people on a regular basis. Pity, because the food is always good. No more white spot for me, I'll be taking my business elsewhere. 1 2
Got take out tonight. Trust me when I say Level 1 spicy is pretty damn spicy. Had the Street Noodle 2. Good choice. VERY limited menu. Don't go expecting to peruse lots of options. CASH ONLY. Good service. 4 3
Hyde Park does a nice job capturing the ambiance of prohibition era speak easy - a true relic of days past. The iceberg wedge was ambrosial but not byzantine. It was your typical wedge but infused with  a raspberry vinaigrette reduction. The taste flow of the burger starts with a fresh crispy sesame seed bun and finishes with the velvety savor of grass fed cow. The service showed flashes of eloquence but graded out average. The waiter forgot the asparagus but we didn't ding him for it. 4 3
Burgers were pretty good. I had the Nad-alie and my husband had the Tallulah Hula. We shared the Cajun fries which were just okay. I had the Peach is in Fashion Manhattan which was okay as well. Our server was very attentive and nice. Sitting outside (upstairs) was really nice! 4 3
It's pretty much already been said so I won't bother repeating. This place runs like a factory. Smiles all around. Great food, although not particularly light food as you may expect from a Japanese place. 5 3
I had a chicken caesar wrap, the wrap was a green one denoting it was spinach. A pretty standard green flour tortilla wrap, but the contents were certainly worth the money. They load the wrap with real chicken breast meat that appears to be cut off a rotisserie chicken! It's very good along with the fresh romaine, and shredded asiago (?) Cheese stuffed inside. It was rolled nice & tight so it wasn't messy at all. My only gripe would be that they need to add more Caesar dressing or make the chicken more moist. I mean, it is loaded with chicken but the breast meat can be a bit dry. All in all, would def go back to to get a Wrap, or their pot pie-heard it was to die for good :) 4 3
This hotel was actually fairly nice for being so cheap. The rooms were clean and they have a free continental breakfast. I would have given this place 4 stars but their free wifi was broken and they've charged my credit cars 4 times now for this room. I understand that mix ups happen when charging hotel rooms, so I placed a call to the front desk to clear this up. The front desk clerk basically went psycho on phone screaming at me he can't help me. Didn't offer to take down my phone number and have me called back, just went straight to screaming as soon as I explained my situation. So now I'm dealing with their corporate office and my bank. Super 8 is a franchise, so there's not much their corporate offices can do to help even though they can view the transaction history and that I've been charged 4 times for the same room. What a headache! I would have saved myself a bunch of stress by staying at the Hilton Garden Inn for $25 more 2 3
This is one of my favorite restaurants in Arizona!  Great food, drinks and really unique and nice atmosphere.  However, tonight's service was not on par!  Our server skipped me when going around the table to take orders and then she left quick.  When something was said when the food was brought out she told me she thought I wasn't eating.  Well, I never said that I wasnt eating but did say I was not drinking.  Either way, as a server you should never assume. Then when I paid for my diet coke. .. $2.45, I gave her a $10 and she brought me $7 even back!  (Do the math) granted .55 is not a huge chunk but that is not right!  I was very disappointed, then when we asked who the manager was we were told it was that young lady who was our server. . Of course. 3 2
good food, but if you order To Go, especially for kids, know that you don't any salad or bread for them and hardly any for regular meals. LAME. Their unlimited salad and chicken picata is yummy, but DINE IN for the unlimited salad and bread. 1 3
Came here with a group for lunch and was very pleased to get to know this spot.  Service was excellent - quick, unobtrusive balanced with helpful.  I'm a sucker for duck of any sort and the confit was the perfect portion and very very tasty.  I'll be back! 4 5
I have been taking my kids here for years and they really like it! They really enjoy open gym every other Saturday night from 6-8:30pm. 5 4
I hate leaving bad reviews for nice people but this deserves it.  He did great work and was in and out, which is why he got the two stars he did. But he didn't have all of the necessary equipment to fix a flushing mechanism in a toilet on his truck, when that was what we told him was broken. Seems like he would show up with the necessary tools for the job! To make matters worse, he was referred to us by our leasing company, it took him 2 weeks to get to us. 2 weeks without a flushing toilet!!! I understand it's not a huge job but it's also in out and move on! The most irritating part of it all, $73 for a simple fix. $8 for parts, $65 for labor when he was here for less than 30 minutes! After waiting 2 weeks I am happy to have a flushing toilet again, and he was very friendly, but next time I will be finding someone else. 2 3
Food was good the service on the other hand was terrible. Upon arriving we did get greeted and seated. However, we had to get the two servers attention to take our order. When we told one of the ladies we are ready to order she gave us attitude. When she brought our drinks over she just slammed it on the table and didn't even give us any straws. Now to the food. We ordered the beef soup dumpling, beef dumpling, house fried rice, deep fried squid, and duck. All were delicious! You can tell that the dumpling are made fresh. Overall, I would of gave this place a better review if the service wasn't bad. 2 3
Had salmon Benedict which was pretty tasty and the side potatoes were great.  The real surprise was was the fruit bowl that came with breakfast - best I've ever had! 4 5
Asked our cab driver for the best seafood buffet and the Rio Carnival Buffet was recommended as the best.  Our party of 6 was extremely disappointed as soon as we saw the seafood spread.  Variety was actually pretty good, but nothing screamed quality.  I would not pay the extra for the seafood if I were to do it again.  The regular buffet was an ok value but there are much better buffets for a few bucks more such as the Wicked Spoon at the Cosmopolitan. 2 3
Love this location, have been going for at least 5yrs. Staff is great. Facials fantastic 4 5
I have a love/annoyed relationship with this place.  The love part is it is at the end of my street, about 10 seconds away.  The annoyed part is every time I go in there I end up spending $20 on like 2 or 3 items.  However, as a person with food requirements their selection of organic, vegan, wheat free, dairy free, etc is excellent.  It is always the same friendly guy working there and he is always suggesting new things to try, the last being tofu bacon which now makes a tomato sandwich a real treat!  I wish I could shop here full time but the reality is I just can't afford it.  I do visit occasionally as they stock a few of my dairy free staples and the location is just too convenient for me to ignore. 3 4
Ehh. Ok. Nice looking spot, but the entrees left something to be desired. Bar was full, but would be a good spot to just drink. 2 3
Went to new location behind cracker barrel last night. Really hopping this space will work as it is close and a cool building. Sorrentos moved from a small location by the college and the wait staff is NOT ready. Highly unorganized and not attentive. Sat at bar to get good service but did not receive. They forgot to put in appitizer, were not knowlegable about wine selections and 3 bartenders walked by our empty glasses for 10 minutes. There were only two other groups at the bar!!Knowing my wine I found a nice bottle of of Italian wine from Piedmont region. Wish I could remember the name as it was good. I had to order a bottle since after two glasses we couldnt get someone to pour us another. Ordered calamari app. Which the waitress forgot to put in. nice work. I did like it as the calamari was tender but the batter was a bit oversalted. The marinara was good. I had the veal marsala and my partner had the special halibut with a lemon caper sauce. Both were very tastee and it is worth mentioning the zuchini side with the fish was above average. they were not grilled but also not mushy and finished in a red sauce that was modified from the marinara. The canolis were average at best as the filling was little more than sugar and ricotta and was a bit thin on consistency. We love this location so we will give them another chance probably with the kids in tow. Hopefully they step up the service. 2 3
Pho is served in larger portions but unfortunately don't make up for its lacklustre taste. Haven't tried the other menu items . 2 3
I went to this place on my birthday because I had driven by so many times and needless to say was interested. I loved the overall atmosphere, it was so fun and the waitress was very nice. The menu does have a TON of choices but as far as the foods quality goes, I wasn't in love with it. It was a good time though so i'd probably go back. 3 4
For a discount sushi restaurant, this fits the bill! They give generous portions and their soup and house salad is good. Their salad dressing is just the right combination of soy and sesame - very addictive - I am trying to replicate the recipe at home. The service is average to slow, but never intentional rudeness that I have experienced - more that they are overrun with fewer servers than they should have... but if you need something - just ask for it. I like their teriyaki bento boxes, and the S7 lunch special - spicy honour roll & unagi roll. 4 3
All depends on when you go.  The course itself speaks for itself ( top notch) however I went Sunday afternoon and it was only $60, then went again Wednesday morning and it was $160.  So I recommend check the times for your price range. 3 4
I hate this airport!! The security lines are consistently the worst I've ever experienced.  They have TWO tsa lines for the ENTIRE airport.  That's right, TWO!  I once missed a flight because it took me 45 minutes to get through.  And the parking is terrible, too.  The lots are usually near full, forcing me to plan an extra half hour just for parking and walking.  And the tram is such a pain...they are understandable in larger airports, but PIT can find a way around it.  I fly out of Cleveland whenever possible.  They have security lines for each airline, parking is WAY easier, and the airport is much quicker and easier to navigate. 2 1
I used to enjoy Blazin Bills.  But the last couple of times we have gone we got slow service, high prices an the food is lacking. 3 2
So, based on my prior review, the district manager sent me a few complimentary meal vouchers.  I was hesitant to even go back . . . and I shouldn't have.  I got a cheddar, bacon burger that was so full of grissle and bone that I nearly pucked on the second bite.  I ordered a steak for my mother.  It was smothered with  . . . oh heck, I don't know . . but it tasted awful.  The steak was ordered medium, received well done, but did have good taste.  Sadly, and 85 year old woman couldn't chew the well done lump of a steak.  The chips and dip were as nasty as before.  The oil is old and tastes rancid.  The only good part of the meal was the dessert.  The brownie and ice cream were delicious, and about the only decent part of a $40 meal.  I'll never go there again, comp or no comp.  Not good food. 1 2
First let me say, we ended up here after leaving another resort that did not meet our expectations. One step inside the front doors of this place and you know it's going to be a wonderful stay. All I have to say is you get what you pay for. Resort has absolutely stunning grounds and 10 pools! How can you not love that. Very nice Adult only pool with bar and grotto. The other pools with kids were still very nice and I found all of the kids to be well behaved. There were not tons of them as this is mostly an adult place anyway. Did I mention the grounds were stunning...we paid for a room with a garden view and it was worth it. I just loved sitting on our balcony taking in the view. Only weird part is that you share a balcony with the room next door which I did not like and proved to be a problem later on. Ate at SWB, food was good, prices were in line with resort fare I guess. Enjoyed the martinis at Cafe Due. Didn't have a chance to try Alto, though I hear it's out of this world. Live music was wonderful, I really enjoyed the Falmenco on Saturday night. Staff was always very polite, although poolside service is incredibly slow and the drinks are not that strong. For $9 solo cup pina colada I'd like a little rum please....I'm just saying. Back to the balcony issue. Our neighbors decide to have a large get together with their patio door open....this meant I could hear everything...I'd had fantasies about smothering the loud cackling woman who was keeping me awake with a pillow. By 1:15 am I had had enough and had to call the front desk. They said they had a "no tolerance" policy and would send security up. 30 minutes later no relief and no security in sight...I think I just finally passed out. The only other downside were the beds. Very uncomfortable and had a spring in my back all night. For the life of me I don't understand why hotels have to be this way. You pay a high price, you offer 5-star dining, you have the word "resort" in your name..lets find a way to put in comfortable matresses....mkay? Would have given them 5-stars if not for the issues listed above. 4 3
I'm never impressed by quantity over quality but I really wanted to like this place. The wait was 90 minutes for breakfast so we went and gambled and returned in 75 minutes $150 richer. Score!  So, we're all riding a jackpot high ready for some good food. I was drawn to the Benedict menu, while my dining partners had sage chicken and corn beef and cocktails. Maybe it was the alcohol -- they loved their food but I was greatly disappointed (drinking coffee).  I had the HH original that was supposed to have tomato cream sauce. I was unpleasantly surprised to receive a plate covered in marinara sauce; eggs, mash, biscuit covered in marinara. The biscuit on it's own-delicious. The mash-yum. The combination?  An utter failure. Where was the cream sauce?  My recommendation, drink heavily or win the price of the meal and you won't care so much. 3 2
Used to be one of my favorite places till the pulled pork sandwich got smaller and the price got higher. As if this place wasn't already expensive enough. 3 2
Slow service all while the front staff was flirting and chatting with each other.  Good food, just hard to come back when service is so poor and your paying a decent cent for the food. 1 2
I was very disappointed with my visit here. I was here to make  3 copies of legal documents, I was here for less than an hour. I am not savvy with computers so my page kept turning off on me.. To make the story short I was charged a total of $2.79 ( the break down for these charges are as follows: 4 sessions @ .30 each time,  printed document @ .49 each .. hence total of $2.79).  I know $2.79 is not really much but its the principle .. honesty towards everyone.  I was here before and it didn't cost me $.49 each copy .. .. 1 2
My friend and I were bored one late late night, and quite famished, so we decided to google a 24hour restaurant; alas we stumbled upon this quaint little cafe. It wasn't ANYTHING like the pictures and website described it to look like. I was quite disappointed with the false advertising I received. It's not as nice as they make it out to be...AT ALL. It's anything but nice (in terms of what you're promised)...but it's got character, and its 24-HOURS. You can't beat 24/7...ESPECIALLY when they make desserts as deliciously as they do here. I inhaled some 4 slices of cake in one sitting! It was so moist and soft, it sort of just melted in my mouth. I barely had to chew.Oh yes, another thing I didn't find to my liking was the TERRIBLE SEATING! In every direction, there are people just an arm's length away. I'm VERY seat picky, they really took the terms 'close&cozy' to the next level. It was uneasy, and uncomfortable, I could hear my neighbour table's entire conversation. TMI lol. 3 2
So good. Just try it, you'll understand. From what I've tried, the Cream Of Leek Soup is the best item on the menu. 5 4
I bought the Groupon for 3 gel manis/pedis. The first experience was was terrible as I had Danielle, the same person Michelle C. had and I felt the same way about the quality. I was told that Danielle is the manager, so maybe doing the mani/pedi is not her area of expertise. This was the worst/mani pedi I have ever had. She didn't paint the edges of the nails, which left a really bizarre look with the whites of my nails showing all around the edges. My gel manicure lasted about two days and gel is suppose to last two weeks! I am giving this review 3 stars because of my second experience, which really redeemed this place for me. I had Gaylee (sp?) and she was fantastic! She did one of the best gel mani/pedis I have ever had. My gel manicure lasted 3 weeks! She was professional, friendly and very competent. My advice to the owner is - don't torch your reputation as a new salon by selling inexpensive services on Groupon and then have incompetent people like Danielle perform services in which they are clearly not  trained. I would have happily given a 5 star review if I would have had someone as adept as Gaylee on my first visit. 3 5
So I was at the Bier Markt tonite. It is definitely a packed place but I think they dont like coloured folks going over there. In this day and age that is so sad especially in a city as diverse as Toronto with all its diversity. The waitress was awesome but the patrons are just crazy. There is this small dance floor. I was dancing on the dance floor and for no apparent reason, this guy just kicked me on my chest. Usually when I go out for the weekend, I spend about a 100 bucks. I guess I will be taking my business else where. Sorry Bier Markt, if you cant treat your patrons nice, they will move else where. 1 3
This small Pizza Restaurant in Parkdale is one of the favorites amongst my friends.  I have only had the pizza there and it is delicious.  It is served on a raised pizza serving tray and is cheesey and authentic.  In the summer the back patio is great. Be sure to check out the photos of the staff from 30 years ago! 4 5
I don't know what happened to this place. I went with my girlfriends on a Saturday night around 9 and the place was dead. Like no one there. The main floor just had the hostesses, same with the patio. The music was all over the place...country then hip hop then rock etc etc it was just kinda weird. I'm not sure if they changed their menus or if menus are different between weekdays and weekends but a lot of it wasn't on the menu (I got the Goat Cheese Bake during my first visit but it wasn't on the menu) and for the price that was paid for each dish, we really didn't get that much food. I got the perogies and although they were scrumptious, it wasn't enough to fill an appetite. The flatbeard is fine and fills you up. The fried shrimp and calamari is basically half an appetizer, even with the side of asparagus. And the Mediterranean chicken kebob is three baby skewers of dry chicken. I can understand if this is one of those places where you pay a bit more for higher quality but we barely got that. We were told by our waitress that there was a burlesque show later on in the night so we finished our food and went downstairs to watch. When nothing happened for about 25 mins we ended up leaving and going to a fest at celebration square. On the patio the waitresses were nice enough to provide our table with a heater and warm blankets. I really hope &co steps it up a bit, I really enjoyed my first time there and I would like to again in the future. 2 3
Okay, this review is long overdue, but I just had the worst experience at Pandora Queens Centre Mall in NYC that I remember the verrrrry nice lady at Pandora Fashion Strip Mall Las Vegas who helped me select my first ever set of charm bracelets in 2012. Until now, I remember her kindness and patience in helping me select my charms. She was very positive and never pressured me. She convinced me, though, to take the Vegas dice because they are limited edition, and it was a good decision. She was a single mom to a teen-age boy who moved to Vegas to start a new life. If ever Pandora is reading this, please promote her to Staff Development Leader...then let her teach the ones at Queens Centre Mall how to do it right. She knows what she is doing and she doing it from her heart. When I return to Vegas, I will sure go back to her and experience a magical purchase again ( one I was robbed of here at Queens Mall NYC).j 5 1
I walked around the building 3 times before figuring out the entrance was in the back. Then figuring out where to order was a challenge as there are 2 areas that look like they could be ordering stations. Terrible service. The people that work there have an attitude. I ordered a coffee with whipped cream. They put maybe less than a tablespoon on top. So I asked for more. The woman looked at me and disappeared. I assumed she was getting more whip, she comes back and calls my name for my coffee. I'm already standing in front of her and I ask again for more and she leaves again this time comes back with the whip and puts less than a teaspoon on. Needless to say the whip was amazing but why be stingey with it?! The coffee tasted watered down. 2 1
We went in for Restaurant Week and it was fantastic. We were both happy with the caesar and the mixed green salads. The steak and lobster was a really good deal plus you get a sizable loaded baked potato to go with it. The lobster tail was also larger than either of us anticipated. Our server was extremely helpful and as good as it gets. The bar service was very good as well as we had a couple drinks there first during happy hour ($7 off regular price). I'm sure we'll return. 5 4
Seemed completely over staffed. While that's fine, someone in that staff should be competent, associates seem fine, but even manager/lead seemed incompetent. Employees should be trained better, and that does not exclude the manager. Don't tell customers false information, if you don't know, just admit it. 2 1
Beer = good. Sliders = burnt meat nuggets on cold stale bread. Nice servers. Nice atmosphere. 2 3
Decided to take the family for a late Saturday breakfast .  The waffles were quite tasty, and the fruit toppings were fresh.  Great selections and variety.  The place had a "local" moms/pops feel to it which was nice.  The breakfast waffle came with eggs and choice of meat...and unlimited coffee.  My daughter ordered the Yooni special which was so yummy- strawberries, bananas topped with chocolate sauce and a large scoop of vanilla ice cream, almost too pretty to eat!  My son devoured a plain waffle topped with powdered sugar and whipped cream (we added bananas for a small add'l charge).  Pros:  Variety, taste, fresh fruit, price and friendliness of staff. Cons:  Waffles were kind of cold, no refills on soda (cans)Overall, it was a good experience. 3 4
Love love love it..... Al pastor is bomb not huge on the ground beef empanadas are life.... Over all great 4 5
I guess this place is OK if you live nearby but there is no reason to go out of your way and this place is definitely out of the way.. Dark, depressing atmosphere. Usually dead inside.Food is just OK and actually overpriced. I ordered a Tuna Melt for I believe $8,95. I got the smallest tuna melt I'd ever seen. Seriously, I left still hungry. And oh yeah... this place has the TIGHTEST VIDEO POKER MACHINES IN ALL LAS VEGAS! 2 1
Great customer service from this location. Food was descent and dining area was clean. 3 4
SO much fun!! The show was about an hour and a half long and filled with great music, comedy, and, of course, awesome dancing. A lot of the music is geared for a younger crowd so some people may not care for it. But it was a blast! 5 4
Very serviceable the few times I've been. Won't blow you away but the food is good. The Las Vegas roll is delicious. Tootsie rolls are good too. A bit pricey if you really get in a sushi mood. Atmosphere is good and service is generally good. Decor is a bit weird especially if you get seated in the awkward area in the back near the rest rooms. 3 4
This cute little breakfast spot was a great find on our recent trip to Montreal. The little old man stirring the milk in a pot at the front of the restaurant to make the perfect cafe au lait was a great touch! We had the cheese croissant, pain au chocolat, and butter croissant, and all were delicious! We will definitely be stopping back in this place on our next trip to Montreal. It was quaint, nothing fancy, but you can tell it has seen many years of grateful patronage. The tables in the back are mostly antique sewing tables with push pedals for old sewing machines! 5 4
Pros: Environment, waitress serviceNot so con: Asian Chicken Sesame SaladCons: Not know their Wi-Fi password Is it a good restaurant for kids? NoIs it good choice for big groups? NoIs the parking lot enough to accommodate the customers? No parking lotAround 12:00pm after I found that the St Lawrence market does not open on Mondays, I started to find a good place to have lunch on Old Toronto and I discover the The Corner Place. When we arrived, we could sit on any place because the place was not crowded.The service was friendly and nice and the salad did not take so much time to arrive. But, at least, for me, when I arrive at place where the Wi-Fi is available I like to have access. I tried all the variations provided by the waitress and none worked. On the end, she asked me to look for one of the customers and ask him how they connect. Very bad negative point for me.Overall, the salad was okay. To be true, I prefer the Asian Chicken Sesame salad from Panera Bread. The dried noodle was very hard to eat and most of the salad components were cut in chunks instead of niece pieces to eat with a fork. What makes a mess while you are eating. Well... I did not get excited with the food this time. But I intend to come back here again next time that I visit Toronto, I notice other dishes on the menu that called my attention. 3 2
The food was so bland. My wife got shrimp fried rice and I've had better at the food court in the mall. And I had a seafood soup that lacked a lot of seafood... both of our shrimps in our meals were dehydrated flavorless  not fresh shrimp ...we will not eat there again .. not sure what all the stars were about 1 2
1st time dining here on Friday. With friends. Nice cozy place. Ordered many appetizers and  entrees and tried them all. Fish was fresh and appts were unique and tasty. Fish stew was excellent dish. Bartender Brandi was a delight and Server Dottie made for  a perfect evening with friends. We'll be back. 4 5
This is a pretty good Metro. (and Yes, 3 stars is good for a Metro... it's not like we're talking Longo's!)Highlights:- Huge store- Fresh seafood with a wide variety- Excellent meat department- Bakery- Deli- Decent size produce usually well-stocked and fresh fruits and vegetables- Wine rack- Private parking lot- Close to the Beer Store and a gas stationTips:- Stay away from the hot food section and "The Creeper" (see Anton K's Review) 3 4
Fun after-school stop for me and my daughter. Iced Coffee was so good and she got a chocolate muffin which looked good. I'm happy to see they also carry gluten free baked goods. The guy working was really sweet and let us stay and hang out past 4(closing time) and didn't rush us at all. They almost should stay open until 5 though since it was so busy right around closing time.I've been here twice before and both those times were great too. Friendly staff, cozy seating and great coffee and treats! 5 4
My fav place for 2 reasons 1 Butter Brew!2 Luke!  one of the nicest baristas I have encountered 4 5
I purchased a car from here and continue to have minimal service done here.  I do my own oil changes and other small service since I don't trust dealers to do it right.  I have had warranty work and things like tire mounting and balancing done here.  The tire mounting and balancing has always been fine, but the warranty service has left a little to be desired.  After replacing a shock in my car, the car now sits lower at that point where the shock was replaced by about a quarter of an inch.  However, this is within the generous factory specifications for the car so they won't do anything.  For things you can't do on your own like a tire mount or balance, they're fine with a coupon.  However, anything else I wouldn't really trust them to do it right. 3 4
Don't get me wrong- the food is great! Fresh and tasty and better than any Greek place around. But the service sucks! In all the times we have come here, we have never gotten our food in less than an hour and our order has never been right. Not even once. This place needs some decent wait staff and  to get organized. If it did it could be one of the best restaurants in town. 3 5
The food was ok.  The mushroom appetizer was good, and so were the sushi.  The major complaint is the service.  When we are sitting down, a woman was complaining already that the server took a long time to come around.  But her english was bad, and I don't think the hostess took it seriously.  Unless my wife and I experience the same thing.  We order a bottle of decent saki, and our waiter had to be reminding twice to refill our drinks.  And he got two of orders wrong.  He made some excuse about the system, but one order was wrong after I reminded him of my hamachi order after getting the yamato roll.  We told this to the manager, not sure if he will do anything.  I think we was just going to calm the customer, I told him it was one of the worst services in Vegas, and we have been to many places (including cafes and Joel Robuchon's place) of wide range.  I strongly recommend you complain quickly if you see a skinny waiter with glasses and goatee comes over.  A true disappointment. 1 2
I ordered rangoons and Pad Thai for delivery through grub hub. My order arrived in about half the predicted time--score! The rangoons were a bit too cream cheesy for my taste, but the Pad Thai was mmm-mmm good. The only thing is that I'd probably order the spiciest rather than medium-spicy, since I'm a chili head. Overall, two thumbs up: the feel-good restaurant of the year. 4 3
I was with citizens Bank of Massachusetts for 10 years. We  relocated to Squirrel hill and I thought that the service would be just as good. Unfortunately the service got worse. Extremely long lines at the squirrel Hill branch and managers that have their hands tied and can't do anything to help fix problems. Any issues you may have you have to call the 800 number and you have long hold times. I like a bank where I can go in and talk to somebody and I can get something done. I am not a fan of citizens Bank. 2 1
For the price that I paid, it was definitely not worth it.  I would understand if it was a school, where stylists are still learning, then you get what you paid for, but that is not true here.  When I got home I noticed an area on my scalp that had dye and melted saran wrap stuck to it, which was super awkward to get out of my hair & now the area is very sensitive.  I also noticed there was a huge bleach stain on my t-shirt as well.  For such an expensive hair cut and dye I don't think I should have had to suffer through peeling dye off my scalp at home or a ruined t-shirt. 1 2
The food is good, perhaps great, but the service is so piss-poor, that I feel offended every single time that I dine there.  Yet, I still keep coming back for the good food.  If I try to place an order over the phone, no one EVER picks up the line.  When we go there to dine, there is always an unbelievable wait, and the apathy on the part of the staff is offensive.  Often, certain items that are on the menu simply aren't available.  I have a love-hate relationship with Lolo's.  All soul food restaurants in Phoenix suffer from this same lack of professionalism.  It's a disgrace to our race and impedes us from entering into the mainstream. 3 2
The mall is just ok, typical mall stores. They are doing some remodeling which helps, but our biggest complaint is the only sit down restaurant is pretty much Johnny Rockets which needs a serious visit from the health department. Very sad for being the only mall on the west side. 2 3
Food was awful and overpriced. Carpaccio was smothered in mayo and inedible. Tomatoes in Caprese salad were pale and not flavorful. Fries were pale and flaccid. So disappointed as I support Lakewood businesses. Loved its former incarnation, Players. Second time I've been to Sarnitas and most likely will not return. 2 1
Pro tip: be prepared to wait. The restaurant is located near the entrance of the Planet Hollywood Casino. I went for dinner at around 6 and was seated at about 7:30 pm, BE PREPARED TO WAIT! Especially for dinner, I had a party of 3. If it's just a couple they will most likely have you wait in line in front of the restaurant. The hostess were very snotty and I was not told any party that's isn't for two must check in with the hostess and they will text you when your table is ready. I waited for about 20 mins before a hostess came to get information for each couple. At that point I was told to give them my information. There was a huge misunderstanding. Be various of the line, it is best to check in with the hostess first.Once we were seated, I started off with the sweet potato fries which where delicious. The food overall was probably one of the best gourmet burgers I had. Although I am not a huge fan of over easy egg, the duck bacon was spot on and the combination of both gave it a great pazzaz.Overall the is a must if your in Vegas. Defiantly worth the wait, it may be pricey for what you are getting but the burger was a mouthful. I would recommend to be spontaneous in what you order because Gordon Ramsey special designed each dish. A job well done! 5 3
Not really my thing and I am an experienced lifter.  If you are someone who super sets,  would not recommend unless you only like using machines.  It's not organized for efficiency but designed for the masses.  Positive note, the club was clean and the staff was friendly. 2 5
Just came by to check the menu!  But as soon as I walked in; it presented a great atmosphere!  All were kind! They gave me a all day breakfast menu, along with the Lunch Menu.  I had the steak and eggs, it was made just the way I like it!I'll be back to try some more! 5 4
Pretty reasonablly priced crepe and fondue place.  Had the Flamenkuche at the waitress' recommendation which was a soure creame, cheese, bacon, onion tart which was nice. The chocolate fondue was pretty run of the mill but it had some creme puffs as a dipping options which I liked.   Date liked the cholocate ganache dessert crepe.   $10-$15 per plate. 4 3
I don't get it regarding the Lamars reputation. The donuts are so average. The coffee is nothing special either. It may sound snobby but I have high standards because I have had donuts from bakeries in New York. Now those are a real treat to look forward to. I'm glad LaMar's has their fans but I will not be going back.I'm done trying them and each time hoping it will be better than the last visit. The Bell and 23rd Ave location is clean and comfortable. The service is friendly. I don't care for the twenty something music playing overhead and it is too loud. 2 3
I have never had a bad experience at this nail salon until today.  The tech I requested was busy so I unfortunately had to go with a different tech.  My pedicure went fine, that was just fine.  As for my manicure...this is the first time I have ever recieved a manicure that the tech did not soak my hands in soapy warm water..  Instead used a squirt bottle.  She barely wet my finger tips and then proceeded to barely push back the cuticles.  Needless to say there was not much cuticle to snip off.  Granted, it had only been 4 weeks since my last manicure, but I could see that there was plenty she missed!  I was irritated and told her that I had never had a manicure like this and she gave me some lame answer.  She had been talking and talking to the other techs the whole time until I questioned her about the job she was doing.  Then she got real quiet.  She didn't even put lotion on my hands and massage them like the techs always do there.  She painted my nails and by then I just wanted to get the hell out of there.  I was there an hour before closing time so my guess is she just wanted to get the hell out of there too.  It was the lamest most unprofessional manicure I have ever had.  I can't believe I paid for it.  I should have complained to the girl at the desk but instead I'm on yelp.  Her name starts with an H and ends with a N.  Good luck to you if you are unlucky to get her.  I'll go back to the salon and make sure I stick to the techs I know do a great and professional job.  Again it's the first bad experience I've ever had here.  I have been a customer there for the last two years. 2 1
It unfortunate that this is so close and convenient to me. The food is fresh, which is the only reasom I go. The employees have such an attitude EVERY time I go. I have never been there and had a good experience with the workers. They are incredibly rude. Also during times that are busy, especially lunch, they only have one employee in the building. So the line will go to the door. I was in there when that has happened and 3 people came in and waited for a minute then walked right out. Something needs to be done on how rude they are. 1 2
The noodles may be good but the kung pao chicken was a total dud. Wildly expensive at $18.95 and not nearly as good as airport fast-food Chinese. The dish was sweet (not spicy) and gloopy. The chicken had no saute marks. I think it was boiled. 1 3
The beef empanada , Chocolate mousse cake and cheese sticks were average at best.Haven't tried their bagels but I doubt they compare to the  bagel shops in toronto.Service was friendly. Decor was non-existent and the food was overpriced.Unfortunately I don't have any childhood memories associated with the place nor am I a fan of overpriced average food to give it more than a star. 1 2
I really like Cost Plus! The staff are helpful and friendly. So many unique items. Bought a few items for my home and am waiting on an item that was out of stock. 5 4
Pizza is terrific, perfect combination of sauce, cheese and toppings. Beer is real cheap and bar is non smoking. Haven't eaten much other than pizza. Not impressed with hoagies, but i'll stick with getting their pizza and beer. Defiantly will return/ 4 5
This restaurant is right by my house, so I decided to try it out since I love sushi! The restaurant itself is very nice and modern and the service was good. I got a variety of different rolls, gyoza, and some udon soup. They don't have all you can eat here, so it can get a bit pricey! The rolls however were very big, so they fill you up! I like my gyoza pretty crispy and the server told me they couldn't do that, so that was a little disappointing! The food though was all good with fresh tasting ingredients. I would come back since it's so close to home! 3 4
Ok, so service isn't always the best. The workers can often be clueless and even rude. Luckily, I know Target very well, so I don't need these workers! I can find it myself! The cashiers are hit and miss. Sometimes they don't even mutter "hello", but whatever, I'm at Target. Yeah, it's my happy place. They always have fun stuff and great prices. Things are always well stocked (at least the workers have that part figured out). I can easily drop $100 here even though I just went in for toothpaste. How? It's one of the mysteries of the world, I suppose. So when I'm trying to save money, I don't go here! If I really need something, I do not, repeat, do not get a cart, but a basket! That way I can't fit much in my basket. I think Target is a girl thing. Guys don't really get it. But if you are a girl, you get it. It's Target. 4 3
Was very impressed with decor and even the food the first few days after it opened. However, the last 2 times i have visited the quality of food has clearly deteriorated. I really hope they can maintain a consistent level of quality and the taste of the food. Their menu is quite limited and feel it is extremely important to maintain quality and consistency to succeed. 2 4
Not worth the money. 30 dollars a person. The wait staff was very attentive but the food got cold before you got back to your table. If you don't mind sushi it's not bad. Wide variety of sushi but nothing else. Overall I would skip this buffet if we'll ever go back. 3 2
Not just noodles!  Stomach discomfort and gas that could kill a small child, too! (presumably from the greasy, MSG-laden food). 2 1
Went for a foot massage, the masseuse spent about 10 mins on the foot basically putting lotion and rubbing it in. The rest was spent giving me a basic body rub/massage. It was a half hearted massage (maybe just that masseuse as my friends had a better massage than me)I was like ok whatever but there was more to come. When the time came to pay, the base rate was 22$/hr but tips are fixed: 10$ 15$ 20$. They would not budge on this. I felt like I was coerced to paying this tip. That's a 50% tip. A classic case of "bait n switch". Not cool. Avoid this place. A business should accurately communicate the terms and rates, not advertise one and surprise you with another. 2 1
I didn't make a reservation but they still have a table for me (party of three). The dishes taste good and the waiters are friendly. It's noisy only because there were so many people inside, not because someone was shouting. We ate a lot of bread and pickle (taste good!) while waiting for the entree. 5 3
Weekly I stop by Trader Joe's and it comes to mind when I think of a good piece of baguette bread.  Their Garlic & Thyme bread has my name on it...I usually put it in the oven until it's crispy then spread my cream cheese over it or Trader Joe's garlic butter. At least 3 times a week I am strolling their store for either my polenta or garlic bread, kale or turkey meatballs. I keep telling myself to stop shopping but I go for quality when it comes to my food and that's the best quality so far especially if you are into organic or good quality. 5 4
Breakfast served 24 hours, waitstaff is efficient and friendly, drinks are a good pour, what more do you need? 5 4
Very pushy, "buy today" atmosphere. Was not impressed. It is interesting that the salesperson only attempted to communicate with me when I was looking at the more expensive beds... Thankfully, I found another mattress company that was more helpful than pushy. 1 2
Great little place on Kingston. We have only been here for brunch but the dinner menu looks good. For brunch I usually go for the Breakfast and those HP potatoes are amazing! Perfectly crispy on the outside and soft on the inside. Portions are a little small but perfect for if you're not feeling too hungry. 3 4
The rice to fish/meat/topping ratio is amazing!  You definitely get your money's worth.  Lunch specials are always cheap and filling.  This place is a hidden gem. 4 5
It's been a long time since I have been here and now I remember why. Seriously the food is just not good. Items missing on the dish, rotting vegetables in the salad. There was no seasoning in the pasta. There was not one spring of fresh herbs anywhere.  Not worth the money. 2 1
My family used to come here quite a number of times when I was little. I recently came back here since I remember my family talking about how good the food here is. The decor is gorgeous they put a lot of effort into it. Can't say the same for the quality of the food. The prices of the food is reasonable and it looks really good. It also tasted very good especially the lo mein. However, the first time I came back here, my tummy felt a little queasy after eating the food. I thought it might have to do with something else and not the food here, but then I came here a second time. I ended up having very bad food poisoning the second time and I'm positive it's because of the food here. I have no idea what their sanitary rating is but God I am never coming back here. 1 3
First time here. Walked into the restaurant and half the tables I saw were piled with dirty dished with half eaten food on them (I have no idea how long they've been sitting there for). Waited 10minutes for servers to clean a table for us to sit. They used a dirty cloth to clean the table with!! I know this because the table smelt horrible after!! This definetly made me lose my apetite. I had to call the server 3 times to take down my order cause evertime i said "excuse me" she would brush me off and say "wait a moment" then go to the back to chat with her friends. (what the hell?!") After the third time i was finally able to order, but had to wait another 30minutes for the food!! Service was sooooo SLOW!When i got my food, I tasted the curry and I thought it was okay but was really chunky compared to other places I've had. I know malaysian curry and this was definetly not worth a 45min drive to try. I dont think I'll be going back. The only thing i really really enjoyed was the Coconut Shrimp. 2 1
I ordered some more take out last week (UGH midterms). I was not pleased with the guy on the phone.I called for the late night special and asked for a Chicken fried rice, medium hot and sour soup and a fried calamari. He wanted to charge me 34$ for it! I asked him to repeat the individual prices back to me and asked why I didn't get the late night special. He told me to hold on and changed my new total to 24$ after tax.WTF. They never used to bullshit prices. (Then again, they also used to give out the late-night menu.) The only reason why I'm a repeat customer (for the past 3 years) is because of how fast and how late they deliver.  Mediocre food at best but great for a desperate and stressed college student. Take precaution and do the math!!(Edit: I forgot. Portions have also decreased dramatically. If you look at my delivery food photos you can see holes where food should have been. They used to pack everything in. Not anymore apparently....) 3 2
The pizza and spaghetti are very yummy. The calzones and meatball sub is amazing. The staff here is incredibly friendly, and their prices are very reasonable for the quality of food. Definitely worth your time. 4 5
You can get a free meal on your birthday if you sign up for it beforehand. It's been hit or miss the few times I've gone. But whenever they've had the Kaya Fest the food is always sooo much better and tastier than what they usually serve in the resturant so just go to that! 3 4
Wasn't thrilled with the place! Very hard to find. And no lasagna!!  What the heck. We won't be back. 2 1
Our group of 4 was seated 40 minutes later than our reservation without an apology from anyone. After the meal we found the service was so slow it was no wonder why we were seated so late. Food was cold and quite bland. I ordered the chef's sampler menu and only the bananas foster was above average. The worst part of the night was having to ask for the manager after never receiving so much as an apology for having to wait so long for a reserved table. The manager (Tony) had no idea and could not have cared less. One of the worst dining experiences I've had in Pittsburgh. If you are looking for a nice place on Mount Washington, Monterey Bay is about the same price point with much better food and vastly superior service. Although your local Applebees would have better service. 1 2
Best pizza chain around this area. Thin and thick crust are both good. Great sauce and pepperoni. 4 5
Hit or miss. I've had some good hair cuts in the past here and always felt that the value was great for the service. My last visit I was dissapointed with the cut. I hate to give a bad review since my stylist Yuna was very nice and gentle with my hair. I asked for a simple cut straight across. What i got instead was uneven and not like the photo I brought with me. The shape of my hair is now rounder than when I came in with a chunk taken out of it :/ 2 3
Best vegetarian pizza in town - great ingredients, great tasting, love it. 4 5
I came here yesterday for my first time after wanting to try it out for months. The decor is too die for, so adorable! We got seated right away, I would of preferred the patio, but since it was Valentines Day I was happy we got seated at all without a wait. Our cute and bubbly comes in to greet us and we immediately ask to order the guacamole and she apologizes and says they are out and she should mention they're also out of flour tortillas?! Um, what? Mexican restaurant that doesn't have guac... you would think that would be simple to remake. But, of course maybe they didn't think they'd as busy this weekend being Valentines day and all. The great thing is they have happy hour all day on Sundays and the drinks were amazing and delicious and pretty and anything else you can think of. The food on the other hand was nothing spectacular. I will definitely be back to give them another try when they might be more prepared and not so busy. The place was too cute and I've heard too many great things to not try them out again. 3 5
Why can't a simple order for eggs over easy result in eggs over easy : semi-hard yokes are not that.Once a year I re-try this place and once a year it's a fail. Otherwise this place is fine. 2 1
Quickly became a staple and the go to place for half of my office. Simple, fast, flavourful and Good for you! If this was the standard for fast food the world would be a better place. 5 4
Their menu is pretty diverse and their appetizers are my favourite that I've tried so far. Must-trys are the Green Mango Salad (sweet slices of green mango topped with fish sauce) and the Calamari (fried to crispy perfection without being overly oily). For the entrees, I tried 2 different curry dishes (lamb and duck) and 2 noodle dishes (pad thai and glass noodles). Wasn't a big fan of the curry, I found it to be overly sweet with too much coconut sauce so it overpowered the meaty flavour. But i think in general I'm more of a Malaysian Curry lover than Thai anyways. But what won me over were their Pad Thai and the Pad Woon Sen dishes. They were sooo yummy and flavourful - i loved it.The waitstaff was super friendly but service was a bit on the slow side but I didn't mind too much since it was pretty packed. Overall , it was good meal. 3 4
My friend and I were visiting from out of town and decided to try this place out when we saw their groupon. The first thing we noticed was an empty parking lot at 7:30 pm on a holiday weekend. Awful location?Upon entering we felt a little relieved with the warm reception from the young host. He found us a booth quickly and was kind enough to turn off the fan that was blowing our paper table cloth everywhere. Although delivered quickly, after one sip of our Diet "COKE", it was obvious that it was RC Diet Cola and right from a flat 2-liter bottle. The salad bar, if that's what you would call it, was slim pickens and only offered hearts of romaine and three dressings. They had some other Italian appetizers as well, ie. rolled deli ham and cheese cubes. The hot plate section was not labeled and it took an explanation from the young host in order for us to know what the dishes were. The Chicken Cacciatore and Cheese Balls were incredible :) Main course: As the first round of meats arrived, you can tell that they were made very recently. We received italian sausage, grilled pineapple, garlic bread, pork rib, grilled chicken, and top sirloin. They were up to par in taste and served from a hot skewer and the portions were fair.  We never received any tri-tip, leg of lamb, or filet mignon - all of which are advertised on their groupon/website! The highlight of our underwhelming experience was the warm smile and friendly attitude from the head chef and his staff. In all honesty, the groupon price we paid ($65 incl tip) is still a pretty high for what we received. 1 2
This is really more of a 3.5 kind of place food wise but the service was excellent. I got the pad thai and my friend got the drunken noodle. They were about $12 each which is a bit expensive but the portions they gave were more than enough to last two or three meals. It wasn't the best pad thai I've had but it definitely wasn't the worse.  If you're a student you get 20% off so don't forget to tell your waiter! 4 3
We opted to try the place despite some of the bad reviews. The place is very quaint and sets the mood. The tv didn't bother me as I had my back to it. We had the lasagne and squash ravioli. Both were amazing!  Best food since we've been in Italy! Good size portions. The brusetta was fresh tasting and the bread crispy. The waitress was from Venice and only in the country for three weeks. She was attentive and the service was great. Worth a visit. 5 4
Eyebrows are done well.  Pedicures ok, nothing that makes you want to tip. (Which I always do) Every time I get my nails done,  they break within the week. Definately need a makeover and might attract a lil less ghetto.  I've seen a fight, and yes they kicked them out,  but I still was annoyed by the yelling. Salon overall needs maintenance and cleaning.  I go because they are a family owned business,  but starting to make the drive just a couple miles away.  Much happier with my busy schedule, and attention in just remembering my name. Customer service is probably the least happiest with in this place. 3 2
Chill place. Many e-juices to choose from. The attractive woman working helped me to pick a couple of new flavors I really like. Very helpful, extremely courteous. Their mods looked cool as well but I didn't take the time to browse those. Inexpensive tanks and up to the higher quality is there. I like that the juice is all natural and it tastes great, vaps great as well. I'll be back. 5 4
Fantastic food & drink. Great selection of lunch and dinner foods. The patio seating and bar are fantastic. 4 5
Been on an exhausting hunt to find a place to get a great facial where you aren't paying for the location/decor & where you aren't pummelled with selling while trying to relax and enjoy.  Finally found it here.  Janina was gracious and welcoming, even though I showed up an hour early, my mistake.  Felt immediately like my business was appreciated.  I was paired with one of her newer employees who did a wonderful job but with a guided oversee by Janina which shows a great deal of care and attention on her part.  She patted my hand and told me a joke.  It was a really pleasant experience.  I was upsold on a moisturizing treatment but she was right, I needed it and it wasn't done in an aggressive way but more a recommendation.  Saw a huge difference in my face, especially the yucky frown line in between my eyebrows.  I now trust her recommendations and will be open to hear about her products in the future.  Because she is charging a reasonable price for her services I will go more often rather than treating a facial like a luxury.  You would think spa owners would understand that.  It's not a luxury environment so if that's your thing, probably not the place for you.  I'm okay with a few less leather couches and water features to get a quality experience.  Really happy to have found her. 5 4
We came here on a recommendation from a friend, it was close to my parent's house so we didn't have to travel very far, and we didn't want to wait very long to be seated. In the beginning service was slow. They had a party of 12 that was here before us but they were getting dessert after we sat down for about 10 minutes. Seemed like they were more attentive after I whipped out my yelp coupon for free draft beer for checking in. It Nigiri definitely has way too much rice on it. The fish was pretty fresh but sliced so paper thin I could see through it. Almost like they were trying to ration their fish. When the server delivered our combo tempura a freaking ant came with it!!! They don't do half rolls unless it's your very last roll. The rolls are the standard portion of rice but some looked scaled down. In the end the menu is pretty large with a lot of variety just don't expect large portions. Would I come back? Probably not due to the traveling distance. 2 3
I've hesitated writing my review hoping I could write a more positive one...The hotel and the Statehouse are beautiful with excellent views.  The food is hit or miss. That being said, we have had some excellent meals there.  The service is very disappointing and hasn't improved with time.  From the bartenders to the servers no one seems to own their position or seem comfortable. A few of our experiences...We were at the Statehouse for our anniversary and my parents had called to send over a couple glasses of champagne to us.  The host told them that they couldn't seem to find us.  We were one of two tables seated in the restaurant that night. They could have found us if they had tried.  Also, my husbands steak was horrible, shouldn't have been served. We were in the bar another night with 5 bartenders behind the bar discussing who should go home since it was a slow night.  As the only two in the bar we sat listening with empty drinks.A couple friends and I stopped in for drinks and appetizers after the homecoming game.  Yes, it was busy and yes, they knew they would have a huge crowd due to the after party they were hosting. But, they all seemed flustered and irritated. It took at least 20 minutes for someone to acknowledge us.  We asked about the wine and she said she didn't know because it was her first week.  I knew for a fact it wasn't her first week. I hope the  assumption isn't that everyone is a one time customer due to the fact that it's a hotel and people come and go. But, that's how we felt.  I could go on...It's such a beautiful hotel and restaurant but the service does not live up the standards that you should expect to experience in a place like this.  I really do hope they can figure it out and turn things around.  Not sure how many more chances we will give. 2 1
Does anyone else find the price outrageous and the service mediocre at this restaurant? The food is great but the servers act like you are begging them for food! LOL.. the portions are so small and unlike most restaurants, the choices are so limited and unaccomodating 4 2
Get the cheese! Get the cheese! Get the cheese! I could come here just for that! Otherwise the wine selection is great (obviously a lot of French wines). The salmon and lentil dish I've had was prepared really well. The service could use a smidge of help though- I feel like it could be better or maybe the two servers I've had at different times were having off days. Otherwise it's not just a perfect date spot, it's a perfect any occasion spot! 4 3
Everytime I order through their mobile app my drink is never prepared in the "estimated time". Many times I arrive and after the 8-12 minutes and they still haven't collected my order from the printer  . Today I arrived 15 minutes after placing a mobile order for an iced flat white, once again my drink wasn't ready. After I enquired about it the barista went to check the printer and my order sticker was still sitting there. Instead of making my drink first she proceeded to make 3 more drinks before mine. The service here is always slow, what is the point of preordering something if you still have to wait a while for it. 2 1
One of the best vanilla lattes I have ever tasted! It has a pure vanilla flavour without the excessive sweetness that flavoured lattes tend to possess. The brewed coffee was also delicious; dark and strong without being bitter.  They have a full menu of fair trade coffee and tea options to choose from and the staff will adjust the drink to suit your preference. The baked goods didn't really appeal to me for breakfast but the brownies would make a great late night treat along with your delicious latte!The inside is clean and comfortable. Not exactly cozy, but I agree with the reviews calling it sleek. Its a really nice place to go for a relaxing chat.I will definitely go back! I'm looking forward to trying more things from their menu including the Macadamia nut latte.**update: I changed the rating to 3.5 after trying some other lattes. They're really sweet even at half the original sweetness, Its still a nice place to meet up with someone for a relaxing brew. 3 4
I go here because they offer a gluten free crust and vegan cheese. I usually get the arugula and pear Pizza, as well as the quinoa salad.  Both are delicious. I am subtracting one star because their servers don't always know what Vegan means. Also, the water they serve is absolutely disgusting. I've never tasted anything quite as bad. They say it goes thru a filter but I don't know. It seems so dirty. 4 2
For the price, very reasonable... I laughed, I was entertained and I had fun!!! xxx 4 5
this place is great. came here about twice now. food is exceptional. i got the nachos and some friends got very different entrees. i am a nacho fan and these nacho were really good. not to mention the size of these things. i love the rainbow sugar they have. i think i consumed a bit too much. the second time i tried this place. it seemed like the prices went up and the portion size got smaller. probably the only reason why i have not gone back. oh wells, this place is good. would recommend for first timers. its a fun place to be. 4 5
The staff over at Big Frog was very helpful. They were able to design a custom logo for me from a picture I had on my phone. I stopped over at the store and was able to have an order placed within 20 minutes. This was a last minute idea that I had and Big Frog was able  to  turn around my order within 2 days. I wanted to have something special for my out of town guests that attended our party. The shirts were a big hit. 5 4
Came to Oakville to meet up with a friend and we came to this restaurant, and I have to say I was disappointed. Ordered the crispy beef for myself, and the dish had about 7 pieces of beef and the other 90% of the dish was vegetables. The portion size itself is already small and there was not enough beef in a dish that focuses on mainly beef. It was definitely overpriced, and compared to asian restaurants in Toronto, I've had much better crispy beefs that were cheaper and better portioned. 1 2
I have tried this place several times. Sadly, the only thing I have ever enjoyed here was the Round Salad. The last time I went I was extremely hesitant because of previous visits, however, I figured one more time couldn't hurt. I was so wrong. The she crab soup was decent but barely warm, my chicken was way overcooked, and a person in our group of 8 found a large piece of plastic in his jambalaya. The service was decent so I cant fault her for the over hour wait for the food. I definitely will not be going back. The manager came over (maybe the owner?) on a Saturday night with a toboggan on his head, which I found a little odd for a place that is supposed to be a little more "upscale". (Especially with the price point) I wish I could say maybe it was an "off night" but with the two previous experiences I don't think that is the case. 1 2
Very mixed feelings about this hotel.Location is very close to ASU's tempe campus, so it's convenient if you're visiting ASU. The surrounding city of the hotel is fillllled with methamphetamine addicts. And yes, it is very creepy- and that is coming from a 24 year old male.The customer service INSIDE the hotel was great. The breakfast buffet also tasted good. The hotel rooms are nice, although they only have $5 water available which is annoying and the fridge is LOCKED so you can't store any of your drinks.The reason why I docked 2 stars was not so much the tweakers, as it was the LOUD clunk sound whenever the AC turns off. From what I've heard, this happens in every room.So, if you need to sleep with AC at night (and you will, in the summer) - be SURE to buy or bring ear plugs. It's the only way to get through the night - trust me.... 3 2
5 stars. The restaurant looked a little mis-leading, almost furnished like a smitty's but the food was insane. Honestly one of the best meals I have had from start to finish. I was blown away. Fantastic service as well. Just amazing. The rooms were different from your average hotel. Nice fixtures on everything. Wine glasses. Hot water kettle. Nice steam room and hot tub in the basement. I'll be holding all hotels to this standard now! 5 4
The staff was excellent across the board.  Helpful and knowledgeable with none of the grumpiness you might expect from people who sit behind bullet-proof glass and help people navigate through complicated exercises in paperwork.I am American and was going to file a Consular Report of Birth Abroad.  Your experience may be different if you are going to apply for a visa to visit the U.S. The line was definitely longer for visas, and as one reviewer notes, if it's busy you may very well spend time waiting outside.A couple of things could be improved:1. The list of things you can't bring inside that's posted on the web site is different from the one posted outside the building where you get in line.  The web site specifically says no cell phones, but in fact they will allow you to check a cell phone at security and pick it up when you're done.  The web site doesn't say anything about large purses or backpacks, but the sign outside says they are prohibited (although they did let me bring in my backpack full of art supplies to keep my five year old occupied while we waited).  I should have snapped a photo of the poster outside that lists prohibited items.  It's plainly visible from the street if you want to have a look in advance.2. They have an interesting interpretation of the word "appointment."  It doesn't mean come at a certain pre-agreed time and someone will see you at that time give or take a few minutes like it does in the rest of the world.  It means come at that time, take a number, and depending on how busy we are we will call you in 1-2 hours. Tip: don't kill yourself getting your Express Post envelope before your appointment.  You can duck out to the Staples across the street to get it while you're waiting for your number to be called.  Just make sure you get a slip of paper giving you permission to re-enter without waiting in line again. 4 1
Wanted BBQ. low-and-behold two joints right next to eat other. The only reason we chose Rudy's was because it was busier, we assumed because it was better of the two....Scanned the restaurant; picnic tables, clean and open. OK., awesome I can bring my toddler and not worry about her ruining other peoples' meals.Greeted right away by a lady at the "country store". She asked us if have been before which we hadn't, I replied that we needed help (I have a20mo and a 4mo infant in a carrier). She came over to show us the menu, the line to place our orders and let us know that the cashier can give us samples of the meats. Fan-frickin-tabulous.We figured out our order then went to the counter. ALL DOWNHILL FROM HERE. Miss boring-as-all-get-out brunette. She didn't even look at us. HELLooooo.She wasn't even up at the register, but back about a foot. I asked if they had a kid's menu, she mumbled something incoherent. What??? So 2 registers down was a young man so we passed on miss head in the clouds. As we head to the other register the cashier left. ARGGGGGG! Back to the brunette.I start the order..... turkey sandwich and brisket sandwich..... to which she yells back and a man starts carving. Sandwiches were brought FAST. Then we ordered potato salad (get it yourself from the fridge), corn and new potatoes. She turns and gets the corn and potatoes, meanwhile my sandwiches are getting cold. COLD.She tap-types on her register and then says our total. Excuse me, can I order drinks????? Her bubbly reply (add sarcasm) "oh yeah".We grab napkins and a table, apply the bbq sauce and dig in..... to ice COLD meat sandwiches.Quick back track to the menu...NO KID's MENU?No mac and cheese?No fries?No cornbread?No green beans?No salad?The goodTurkey was moist and had a good flavor, would have been excellent if warm.Husband said brisket was really really good, but cold.The bad-Sause sucks, worse sauce I ever tasted. Like water and pepper. They have 2 sauces and both taste the same. One has a ton of pepper, the other has more.-Potato salad, really is potato salad so difficult?-Corn was soggy and had no flavor.-Red potatoes (called NEW POTATOES here) are water logged gross.The ugly-Napkins on the other side of the restaurant in a dispenser on the wall (bathroom 3-fold paper towel dispenser).-STYROFOAM- THE DEVIL OF THE PLANET.One star for the country store greeting gal.One star for the turkey.I'll be back for the turkey and a soda, skip the sides and bring my own sauce. 2 1
Great tea selection in a coffeehouse that's unique 'cause it's in a converted gas station. 4 5
Super cool idea and I love the elevaotr... but the regular rooms are meh. For how much I wanted to spend it would have been nice to have something nicer... Still a really pretty hotel and the Titanic meuseum was really cool. 3 4
This review is STRICTLY for the nightclub at Lavo.  I've been to Lavo a few times.  I was not impressed at all the first time I was there and have only grudgingly gone back for friends birthdays/bachelorette parties.  I'm a local and I just cant understand the hype about Lavo.  The decoration is cool and its a very sexy vibe but for as much as you expect from their reputation, Lavo is TINY!!!! There's really only one square cut out for a dance floor and the stairs that lead up to it are always wet.  I don't personally think there should be stairs leading on and off a dance floor anyway.  Nevermind the few flights you have to walk up and down to get in and out of the club from the restaurant as is. The music was average. Not really much variety. Just all house music.  And it's so crowded in such a tiny space I've been burned by smokers' cigarettes on more than one occasion.  I'm not even a smoker.  Like I said, I understand the Vegas nightlife and I've seen smaller clubs than Lavo but for how many people rave about this place I think it's way over-hyped. 2 3
For our Vegas getaway we stayed at New York New York. Every time we passed by this place there were tons of people and the place seemed nice, so on our last morning we decided to give it a try. And here starts the reasons for just 2 stars:1. We walked up to the podium a min after the couple ahead of us. Instead of greeting the two of us as well and the host COMPLETELY ignored us! He just acknowledged the first couple and took them to their table, not so much as a smile in our direction. I would have been willing to overlook this if the meal hadn't continued in the wrong direction.Before I go on, a kudos to the management: My bf ordered waffles and I ordered an omelette. About 5 min after our order was taken the manager headed over with a beautiful plate of waffles. He explained that their waffle machine had been broken all morning and it just started working again. The manager didn't want to take the chance that his client wouldn't get the requested order and so decided to let the order go out early. Nicely done.2. My bf didn't want to start eating before me and we figured an egg couldn't take too long, so we kept chatting and waited. The table that was seated after us received their eggs and I was still foodless (this was 20 min after the waffles arrived). Just as I was about to say something I saw our waiter realize the mistake and turn a 180 on his heels back to the kitchen. However, he did not see that I had witnessed his mistake and was expecting him to head over to our table to give a small apology for the wait. Not so. When my omelette finally arrived I expected that to be his opportunity to give a small 'I'm sorry'. Not so. The mistake was never acknowledged, quite the contrary, our waiter ignored us through the whole meal!That should teach me not to expect. 2 1
Great food! Excellent service and food was made fresh! Must try calzones and pasta. Went close to closing time waitress was still friendly and professional. 4 5
Amazing customer service, went there with no appointment and they fit myself and 4 of my bridesmaids in to shop for bridesmaids dresses. We had one designer and style in mind that we were hoping for, but unfortunately David's Bridal only carries "David's Bridal" brand gowns/dresses. Beautiful, but slightly disappointing.The bridesmaids dresses and special occasion dresses are all grouped together, so tread lightly before getting attached - as the special occasion frocks are only available as they would be in a retail store, whatever sizes and colours they have, is all they have.Besides those two slight flaws, I would recommend to friends based on the wonderful customer service the ladies working there provided. 3 5
If you're looking for a location in the downtown that's close to the Eaton Centre, Ryerson Campus etc. you can't do much better. It's ideal. As well, if you're looking to pay as little as possible and still be in a hotel this close to the action, the Bond Place is your place. That said, the rooms are very very small, the TV is incredibly tiny, the bed and pillows are probably some of the most uncomfortable in recent memory (but if you like your mattress VERY hard, you might not mind it too much), and the bathroom is clean but basic (no fancy amenities in there).Can't say much about the restaurant. Ate breakfast in there one morning and the service was good. Not sure what the food is like overall, as what I ate would be pretty tough to make poorly.Overall, like another reviewer said, you get what you pay for. No surprises there. 2 3
I've been to Combs a number of times and I've always been satisfied with their service.  I also recently recommended them to a friend after the Mini dealer told her she needed $5000 worth of repairs, and Combs took care of her for $1500. But you never really get to know a place until a problem arises.  That's the trial by fire.It seems like I've been to a number of shops over the years where they'll fix a problem and then a week or two later another problem pops up in the same general area and they *never* admit to even the possibility that they were responsible.Combs was different.  They had replaced my fuel pump and a couple weeks later the Check Engine light came on with a code 'evap system leak'.  I guessed it was likely it had something to do with the previous repair since they had had to drop the tank and reinstall it to replace the pump.  To my surprise the service manager volunteered the same guess.  He thought a seal maybe hadn't gotten seated properly and asked me to leave the car with them so they could drop the tank again and check it out.  They ended up finding a hose that had come loose and fixed it.  No argument, no hassle, no charge!Combs is a long way from my house but they're my first choice when it comes to auto repair.  They're an honest shop. 4 1
do not eat if your diet lately has been healthy. your stomach gonna hurt real bad. other then that classic drunk food. mini burgers fries and a cherry coke. 3 1
Though the food is good but they have The most pathetic service ever!!!! They have no idea how to handle service in rush hours 1 2
The only place where I get yummy red bean or green sesame balls.  Also their steamed pork buns are my favorite.  This is where I order birthday cakes - mocha cake with coconut filling is a must-have! 4 5
Been there several times and they serve the best steak I've had in Madison.  A good place to have a conversation or a special night.  You do have to like their ambiance. For my wife and I though it was too pretentious.  Too artificial.  Too stiff.  Too self aware.  They need to pull it back and relax just a bit.  This is Madison.  But again, the food, though pricey is outstanding. 3 4
I tried Thai House after having recently returning from a trip to San Antonio where I was forced to go to a Thai place for lunch.  It was a highly recommended place and I loved it.  I immediately thought "when I return home I am going to Thai House to try it."I had high expectations that this would be a great place, but after one visit my expectations are much lower.  I ordered Tom Yum soup and the Spicy Basil Chicken.Tom Yum soup was tasty and I did enjoy that.  If I had the taste for just that soup, I would order it again.  The Spicy Basil Chicken (same dish I ordered in San Antonio) was not good at all.  It was listed as a "spicy" dish, so to find it bland when it it supposed to be spicy was a major disappointment.  There was also too much of it pilled onto the plate.  You need room to move the food around to let it cool from just being cooked but to also give you room to separate and eat what you like and see the food.I may try other menu items again sometime, but I wouldn't go out of my way to eat here again, would have a backup plan, and would not recommend this to anyone. 2 3
We were in Pittsburgh on a family reunion two weeks ago.  My wife and I wanted to try some of the local restaurants and stumble upon Jimmy Wans.  The restaurant looked interesting with a great decor.  The staff was very responsive and the service was good.Unfortunately, the food missed the mark.  For the starter, I had the wanton soup and my wife had the spring roll.  Tasteless, similar to Glenn C. opinion.  We had already ordered the entrees - kung pao chicken and  szechuan beef  -- They were large portions but again tasteless.  The Staff tried to help, but they were not the problem.  We talked to other at the reunion later, and were total the Fox Chapel restaurant was new in the chain and that it had some growing pains.  Maybe it will get better after they "season"  the chef.    After eating int the Strip District, this just didn't cut it. 3 2
Brio is one of the nicest places in Town Square, especially when you can seat outside. I was there at  least two times a week but recently they reduced the menu and left out some of my favorite meals. So disappointed... 3 4
The reviews made me nervous, but we ate here anyway because we were hungry and didn't want fast food.  It's nothing fancy, but overall the food was decent.  Our waitress was attentive.  Plus it didn't take long to get our food.  Overall I was glad we decided to take a chance. 4 3
I am often way too lazy to write a review but this place is so amazing that I must do it.  After reading on Yelp! about all the goodness of this place, I gave it a try. I love middle eastern food and grew up in NY where we have very good middle eastern food.  I was greeted very warmly by the owner, Isam.  I told him I heard about their famous lemonade so I will have that and something else he would recommend.  He gave me a sweet smile and told me that the lemonade is on the house as it is my first time.  (how nice!)  I ordered to go the Lebanese chicken (one breast split in halves, rice, tabouli, and one large fluffy, pillowy pita made fresh) and the falafel (smaller than I'm used to but very tasty) that came with tahini sauce that is very very good.  I finished my drink before the food came and he gave me a free refill! I wanted to get a lemonade for my coworker to go, and he gave me that for free too! He was very easy to speak with.  I hate going to places where the food is great but the owner makes you feel like you should beg (think Seinfeld and the soup nazi).  But this guy was very nice.  There was a lady behind me who went for the first time yesterday, and came back today with her friend.  The owner immediately recognized her and apologized to her for something.  It turned out that there was a guy (I think from the store next door) that was bothering her as she walked in yesterday.  She told the owner about it. The owner (after she left) spoke to the guy and he apologized to her for what he did yesterday.  The owner also apologized for the guy's behavior.  What a man!My food was really really good.  And when he packed my food in the bag, he gave me two big slices of bahkalava on the house (again)!!I am definitely coming back and bringing more people. 5 4
Went there last night and was very pleased with the selection and quality of food. There was a large selection of fancy, small portioned dishes such as gnocchi, mushroom risotto, sushi items, French onion soup, wedge salads, Caesar salads with little anchovies on top, BBQ ribs with a great char flavor (also had chicken and pork shoulder), shrimp flavored rice paper which was fun and tasty, salmon, and sooo many delicious and fun desserts including a gelato selection. The crab legs were just ok, but we had gone near to closing time so I can't complain. Alcohol is not included. Great atmosphere and great food overall and I definitely recommend it! 5 4
This is a great place to get something different for lunch or a quick dinner.  I love the chicken masala wrap.  As the other reviewers have said, it is a "Chipotle" type setup, as in, you choose your rice, your protein, veggies, and sauce.  It's really an excellent wrap.  I also love the Bombay spice iced tea - yum!  I can't believe people are sitting next door eating a bland Jimmy Johns sandwich when they could be having one of these exotic concoctions.  I am really sad people are giving this place bad reviews, but I never went to the original location, so I'm not sure what they are comparing it to.  If you are coming in looking for a traditional Indian restaurant, that is not what this is, so set your expectations accordingly. 4 3
I had a nice experience with this salon! Being from out of town i wasn't sure where to go and who to trust. I was in bad need of a hair cut and color. The receptionist was friendly and introduced me to Josie who did a great stylist cut and covered my grays!!! Best of all the hair color products was gentle on my skin. 4 5
Food was not good.  I had the bacon, eggs and pancakes.  Bacon was cheap.  Eggs were disgusting. Pancakes were bad.   Wife had steak and eggs.  Both were gross.  Also, waiter was in attentive and rude.  Last time I come to place.  Something positive. 2 1
After I finally got the keys to my room at the Flamingo in Las Vegas, I opened the curtains & my mouth hit the floor when a pink sign across the street at Caesars Palace caught my eye. I can't believe Serendipty & the infamous Frozen Hot Chocolate is in Vegas!  I don't have to fly to NYC to get one. 4 5
Lack of attention to detail.  Called them to replace a Wayne Dalton garage door opener that that no longer is in production. They were not able to service it, ok, I understand it's an aged opener.My issue starts with the quoting process that happened on site.  Was quoted on a brand name garage door opener and was told that it was wireless so there would be no need to bury the line in the walls.  Also was quoted a price on a 7' door, when in actuality it's an 8' door, (I have a tape measure if you needed to borrow it). As well as told that it connects to the internet so that a smart phone can be used to open door remotely.Day of installation, find out that it's an 8' door so there is an up charge for additional rail. As for the wireless, that was a false statement as there is now a wire stapled diagonally across the ceiling.  The standard wire is also only x number of feet long, so now the open button is not near the interior door.....but 18 feet from the interior door where the existing wireless button was located.  Lastly, the internet connectivity mentioned would come with an additional purchase of hardware so is not native to the garage door opener itself.At the end of the day it was a low ball quote to win the business with none of the proposed features delivered.  I didn't stay in the garage to micromanage installation so the end result was a lack luster completed job.There has to be a better service out there. Should have went with the referral from a friend instead of the manufacturer's contractor. 2 1
Pleasantly surprised at how good the food tasted. Asian flavors were spot on with the pad thai and bun. Next time will have to try a burger, it looked real good. Will come back for sure. Lose one star for slow service, not the sole servers fault, i think they only had one cook. Worth the wait though. 4 3
Nothing special unfortunately. That didn't come to a surprise though. Tiptoeing the line just like every fredricos.. 3 2
Although a beautiful place and overall I am happy to have my grandfather here I am incredibly displeased with the administration.  From the lack of greeting, the general disorganization and forgetting to schedule the honor guard.... My grieving family was every disappointed both in our experience today and in not providing the the last honorable salute for our loved one that he so richly deserved! 1 5
AMBIENCE: A little hectic, especially when you first get off the escalator. You walk straight into a crowd and it's not clear where to go to get your name on the list (hint: it's on the right). SERVICE: Friendly and patient while I pored over the tantalizing menu, asking repeatedly for a couple more minutes. Even though the waitress was clearly busy, she kept checking on us. FOOD: I got talked out of ordering the (gigantic) blueberry pancakes and went with the chicken and waffles instead. It comes with 4 big waffle squares and 2 large fried chicken breasts. Definitely too much for one person. If the chicken fried steak is on the menu when you're there, you have to get it. It was enormous. VALUE: Excellent. Especially for being on the strip. You may want to split an entree. DRAWBACK: The wait can be super long. We actually got on the list, went up to our hotel room for 45 min, came back, and then waited another 15 minutes before we were called. Then we waited another 10 minutes before actually being seated. The food/value make this place worth the wait though. 4 3
The previous reviewer got this spot-on.  I mean, who WOULDN'T want to go to the UN-friendly neighborhood bar?  Oh, wait.  EVERYBODY.  The BF and I are new to the DeFo area, and looking for a local hangout.  Upon entering The Landmark, we immediately learned a helpful tip that I am happy to pass along to you: don't try to start a conversation with the bartender/owner, because his personality seems to be a curious mix of hung-over crocodile and rubber spatula.  My conclusion is that he must be independently wealthy:  I'm guessing that the geriatric regulars are not the highest tipping bunch, but how DARE new people walk through his hallowed doorway?! 1 2
Not my favorite place in town . Sorry not sorry #brysontiller Go to famous faces across the street . Not bad just not my favorite . 3 1
Eli & the rest of the gang here are amazing! Stop in and let them give you a demonstration; you won't regret it! 1 5
my wife and i went on a saturday afternoon . the place was busy,( always a good sign). The pho I got was good and flavorful But i think that the sandwitches are are the best! yum! Im there for the sandwitches 3 4
This place is ok at best. Debated on giving it two stars but there are some nice things that I did enjoy about my stay. Bed is ok. No fitted sheets and they don't tuck the flat sheets in so that kinda grossed me out. I liked the color scheme and decorations in the room. The showers are weird, the glass partition covers LESS THAN HALF of the shower. The water pressure is great but since there isn't really a shower door water shoots out like a fricken waterfall getting the floors soaking wet. I used all the towels in the room and still couldn't dry the floors. I talked to housekeeping about this (very sweet woman, the rest of the staff treats you like a second class citizen) and she said all the rooms are like this. You can see the bathroom door is warped on the bottom from water damage. The location is great if you're into Freemont St. Its so close, you can hear the live music/DJ from your room loud and clear at 1am on weekdays, later on weekends. The casino has a kind of steampunk/vintage feel with a touch of modern that I really liked. Parking is in a garage off site(free) valet was 7 bucks(even for guests) Long story short, I would stay on the strip next time, really didn't save much money by staying out here at just an ok hotel. 2 3
Pizza was ok, mozzarella sticks not too great, tiramisu was partially frozen. I asked for ranch twice (with the pizza and again with the mozzarella sticks) and didn't get any. Probably won't order here again. 3 2
THe service was not the best.  The lady argued that we received the number for our order, when we were the only ones in the restaurant at the time.  The Salmon was bland.  The beef was flavourful.  We had asked for tap water.  We had to ask again.  The lady put the pitcher down and gave 3 cups without saying anything.  We will not come again. 3 1
A few of us went here for lunch on a Friday and while the food was very good the service was very slow and inattentive.   I had the Blue Petit Mignon and the portion size was just right for lunch. 2 3
First time eating there the food was good but the atmosphere and service was lacking.  Was not busy, dining area had trays with dirty dishes laying around. We had to ask for silverware.  Some tables were set up others were half set up. This place is opened 24 hours maybe it should have business hours like other restaurants of this type.  We felt like we were at Denny's at 4 in the morning.  Don't go there on purpose. Ok place if your hungry and you happen to be by it. 3 2
I've been wanting to try this restaurant for a while now and finally made it out for Arizona Restaurant Week. Unfortunately I did not have a good experience. The waiter my partner and I had was so unattentive. After we were seated we had to specifically ask for the restaurant week menus since they weren't provided to us to make sure we were only charged the special price for Restaurant Week. Not once throughout our entire meal did our waiter come by to refill our drinks and we were never offered a bread basket that all of our surrounding tables were provided by other waiters. It took forever to get our food while parties that were seated after us were receiving their meals before us. We both ordered the pina colada cake dessert it took over twenty minutes for us to receive our cake slices. Food was okay, service was horrible. 2 1
Very tasty quick stop. Carne asada tacos were delicious. Portion sizes were huge, so go there hungry. 5 4
I got right in and it took me only 15 minutes for my oil change, on a Saturday.  It is a little overpriced in my opinion, but what oil specialty shop isn't. What bugs me about these places is they try to vet sell you on stuff even when you want just an oil change. Theses guys weren't too pushy. Super nice and friendly. Gave me $7 off for being a new customer! Don't forget to ask if your new 4 2
??????????????????...?? ?? ?? ??????????????? ???????? ?????????? ...????? ????????? (???)?????????????  ???????????????????? ????????????????? ??????..  ???????????????????????????????????? ????????????????  VEGAS?????  ???????????????????????????  ???????????????????????????????????????  ??????????????VEGAS?????OK ????? 2 3
Avoid at all costs if you are coming here for food. Coming from a mexican household, my dad was disgraced by what they call authentic Mexican cuisine. I got the steak tacos that were dry and bland, while my sister got a burrito that was cold dry and tasteless, you could tell that the meat they use is frozen. My dad got enchiladas that were a soggy depressing mess. Will not return unless they fix the food quality. 2 1
The whole process can be confusing for a first timer. Be sure to grab a ticket on your right as soon as you walk through the door. I missed this crucial step on my first visit, and spent 10 minutes standing in front of the sandwich meats like an idiot.Once you do get a ticket, it can be hard to communicate with the employees over the loudness of the ever-present crowd, so be prepared to shout.Those problems aside, the meat is of decent quality at an excellent price. Any place where I can get a whole chicken, a pound of ground beef and a pound of bacon for $10 and not get food poisoning gets my stamp of approval. 4 2
As soon as you walk in you know that you are in a different kind of coffee shop from all of the cookie cutter reclaimed wood edison bulb places. The smell of freshly roasted Ethiopian coffee beans fills the space. Walls are lined with specialty Ethiopian foods like spicy Berbere paste and Teff Injera is made fresh on select days. Delicious! You can have a typical machiatto/latte or go full on for the Coffee Ceremony. Croissants from Fantail bakery on Roncesvalles are also brought in daily. This is a great new spot for the Beaconsfield, Parkdale neighbourhood. 4 5
After reading the previous reviews, I feel very fortunate because I rented a very nice apartment in Shadyside for one year and had no problems with the landlord. 3 5
Excellent food, lost a star because wait staff left us hanging without follow up after meal served. Nobody came around again.Had to hover over register to get, and pay tab.Ice tea is instant, not fresh. 4 1
I started to write a good review but I am glad I waited.  I went into the store to just pay my bill and of course they try to up sale and I took the bait.  However, 5 days later I still have no new phone and no response from my sales rep.  He was so attentive and as soon as he knew he made the sale.....screw me......was told I would have a phone today and I even called before going and they said they had it but when I got to the store I could not get not 1 person, not even the manager, to acknowledge me.  Granted I was on my lunch break, however, I was in that store for 30 mins. and on the way out I get from my sales rep, who is trying to make another sale, that he has my phone if I can just wait....I don't know about most people but I have a job and can't spend 6 more hours at that store.  I spent 6 hours at that store Monday and I should not have to continue to wait when all I want is my new phone.  Jeez, thanks Jermaine... 1 2
So, yeah....I actually got food poisoning the last time I ate here.  It's probably my fault, having grabbed a late lunch, ordering soup and sandwich around 3:30pm, which I'm guessing meant the food stayed out quite a while after the lunch rush.  But, um, that'll do it for me!  So if you do go here, go when it's busy. I guess. 1 2
I really liked this place! You go in and the server is exceptionally nice. He suggested a dish he said would be spicy but it was slightly mild but very flavorful. They use Lemon Grass sticks as the "bone". This place actually rivals my favorite vegetarian restaurant in Portland. The price is right and the food is great! If you're considering not going...GO! Don't be scared off by the ghetto neighborhood and trashy strip mall. This place is a diamond in the rough. 5 4
I definitely recommend this place for parents to bring their kids. My daughter loved it!!! They have several activities for them to enjoy. Price wasn't bad, environment was clean. 5 4
This place is right across from the Westin in downtown Pittsburgh.  First, Music was too loud, with no one in the restaurant, making it difficult to even talk to the person sitting next to you.  Food was almost inedible (fish tacos) and the staff was less than attentive.  The bar/restaurant decor was cold and minimalist, but not good minimalist....cheap in all respects.  If this place hasn't been around long, my suspicion is they wont be here next time I come to Pittsburgh. 1 2
The first day we were there, the down elevator from the garage walkway to the casino didn't work.  On the day we left, the up elevator from the casino to the garage walkway didn't work.  The room itself was very clean, but the decor was....  Let me just describe it.  The color theme of the room is white.  There is a vinyl headboard which covers the entire part of the wall behind the bed...what era is that??  There are 9 round fluorescent bulbs above the bed which generates white light...from the 80's??  The bathroom has a frosted sliding door that has no lock.  Another wall of the bathroom next to the shower is also frosted glass.  This glass wall is mounted to the wall (of course) with a gap between the wall and the glass, so you can actually look inside and see the entire toilet from that gap.  The sink is a small round bowl sink on top of the counter which has no place to place the soap.  There is a TV inside the bathroom though.  The drapes are controlled by switches next to the bed.  Overall, we didn't like the room because it was weird. 2 3
We went here for lunch.  Other than the flan (which why I didn't give it one star) everything else was just bland.  Not worth the money. 3 1
I love this club. Absolutely beautiful. Fun times always had. Music is mostly house but they sneak in a few songs to dance to. The club is indoors and outdoors. People were outside in 30 degree weather. Good times had whether one is freezing or not! The club was stupid packed but it was new years weekend. I wouldn't expect anything less. 5 4
Wow, this place was so good!! My parents and I stopped by around 11:15am on a Sunday for brunch and even though we were told the wait might be 45min-1 hr, we were seated in 30min. We all really liked our orders. Our server was very friendly and even the other workers that ran out the food were very accommodating. My dad got the jambalaya omelet ($11) which comes with Cajun home fries and toast... he loved the unique combo of jambalaya in an omelet and raved about the Cajun home fries. My mom got the cinnamon apple walnut French toast ($11) which also comes with home fries. She also loved her meal. I got the carminator ($12) and enjoyed it very much however the mixed veggies in it were cut into very large chunks that overpowered the other ingredients if you bit into the wrap the wrong way. Overall we had an awesome experience and delightful meal and will definitely be back again!! 5 4
Definitely has the cheapest fruits and vegetables you will find in the valley. Only problem, is that most are within a day or two of rotting. I'll pass.  I find price matching Food City or Sunflower prices at Walmart is a much better deal overall. 2 3
Food is good, but does the sushi chef have to drink red wine while making the rolls?  Cleanliness and observation = 5 out of 10.  I left my purse by accident and they didn't see it.  I first called to make sure, and they said "no."  I then go to the restaurant physically, and they say they "still don't see it."  I'm driving back home and a I get a call from them.  They find it under the sushi bar.  Staff is nice, yet I still can't trust them. 3 2
Memo to self - there are a million hotels in Vegas so don't waste time staying at a hotel that lacks customer service. Been waiting in a check in line for 45 minutes - next time skip Mandalay and stay at Caesars or any of the other truly excellent hotels Vegas has to offer! 2 5
As a pizza lover, Salvatore's Tomato Pies are unique and flavorful. We ordered the bacon and fig pizza which was the perfect melding of savory and sweet.  The menu offered a variety of choices, making it hard to decide what type of pie we wanted to order. The venue is pretty small, so it would be smart to order takeout on the busier nights or try and beat the dinner rush. Due to the small size of then venue it is a little loud when crowded. We are definitely planning to go back to try some of the other menu options! 5 4
Tehran is a wonderful establishment.I've been an infrequent visitor for the past 10 years. I always wish I'd go more often.The menu doesn't have too many options. But the choices you have are so flavourful that you won't feel lacking.The plate sizes are quite large, though I have noticed that portions decreased a bit recently, and prices went up. Worry not, you'll still be stuffed and not spend too much.Everyone should give Tehran a try. The food is delicious and the service is quick. And shame on someone rating a restaurant they've never been to and making a judgment based on hearsay. 5 4
I got an email for a free mascara on my birthday.  I made a trip to the store to pick up the item but they were out of stock.  I was told they were getting a large shipment in a couple of weeks but it's been a month and a half and they don't have it, don't know when it will come in, and won't give a substitute.  I've run into this problem with rain checks too.  I've been waiting over a year for a rain-check product.  I might have to switch over to Sephora as Ulta is not a well-run company in my opinion. 2 1
How fortunate to have such a great indian cusine in monroville and owner is quite gracious.Food is outstanding 4 5
I have been to the Strip location of the Pittsburgh Popcorn Company and I would give that location 4.5 stars. Today I ran into the Oakland location which I hadn't visited prior. When I entered the location was a mess. It looked like behind the counter had not been cleaned in a while. I am assuming that this was because of the business of the location, but the Strip location appears to be much cleaner. I purchased two bags, one of the chocolate caramel and the rice krispy. Both were good. My only concern about the product itself was my bag of rice krispy was had other types of popcorn in it. When I ordered rice krispy, I wasn't hoping to get cheddar or dill pickle. I would suggest that if only is coming to Pittsburgh Popcorn Company for the first time, go to the Strip location. I 2 3
I used to be regular at the Burrito Boyz franchises in Mississauga and raved about the epic meal that followed a visit.The particular visit at this location left me disappointed. Last Tuesday I ordered a small chicken and shrimp burrito with all the fixings. I was excited to bite into the hot cheesy goodness. Instead the burrito was room temperature at best and the chicken lacked flavour and was missing the crispy bits that usually followed cooking on the flat top.After struggling through a few bites, I asked to have the food reheated. Instead the supervisor was nice enough to have the burrito remade for me, and offered a free drink while I waited. The remade burrito was definitely hot (temperature wise) but overall still lacked flavour. Will I return? Probably not.Two stars is for the service alone. 2 3
Nacho Daddy...I've tried you again and again and you have not let me down.In my initial review I was sad for the poor starving children and the wastefulness of the portions you serve.  I've now learned "how" to order off of your menu so I don't leave feeling less like a human because of my gluttonous ways.  Your bloody Mary's are amazing, but the Medium gave me enough kick without adding the habanero.  Half medium half mild suits my tastes (even though I always thought I could handle a kick).We love everything your restaurant has to offer for a quick bite after a long day wrangling cats (I mean kids), from the brunch menu (huevos nachos LOVE...but share), fajitas, mahi mahi tacos, ceviche, chips and salsa...oh and yes my margarita is always amazing. 4 5
I live within walking distance of Park Rd Shopping Ctr... and love the shops and restaurant options.  I want to enjoy Charlotte Cafe but seem to always catch it on an "off" day.  I'm now thinking it's just normal procedure for them. In general it's over-priced for what you get.  I was in with my folks this past Friday for a 9:30am breakfast.  The service was painfully slow.  She told us immediately upon seating they hadn't planned to be "busy today".  Really... on black Friday... at Park Rd Shopping Ctr.?? You didn't expect to be busy??  To be honest I don't blame her.  I think it's just poor management and she was left to deal with the consequences as were the rest of us patrons. When our breakfast finally arrived it wasn't room temperature.  It was cold.  Nothing says good morning like cold eggs. grits, and bacon.    And to top it off... when my dad when to pay the bill it took him 10 minutes and 3 three employees to ring him up.  He was the only person in line at the time and they had no idea what to do.  Quite honestly... I do not understand how they stay in business. 2 1
Arrived to check in for a reserved room at 9:00 pm in September. AC was not on in the room so the room temperature was 89 degrees. Called front desk to get bedding for the sleeper sofa for our kids and were told that we would have to come down to the front desk to get the bedding. Really inconvenient when you check in to a room expecting it ready so you can put children to bed. 2 1
The pros: they have a lot of technicians on-site so I rarely have to wait for an appointment. The shellac colour selection is good. And the clientele are all young, urban professionals so you feel OK about going here. They do an ok to good job on your manicure - it's not perfect, but it's way better than I can do at home and it's quick (approx. 25 minutes) so you're in/out. Bonus points for the shoulder massage with shellac. Hey, sometimes you might even want to splurge an extra $10 for an additional 10 minute massage. The cons: you get what you pay for. It's by no means luxurious. They churn you in and out. Sometimes there's a lot of yelling, and if you're coming off a stressful day, it can grate on your nerves. Overall, they do a good enough job that I find myself coming back frequently because it's near my office. For the price you pay, it'll do. 4 3
Why oh why can these people not make a latte that takes 6 layers of skin off your tongue? Seriously people, hot drinks should be just that. HOT. Not lukewarm by the time I've made the 5 minute dash through the Path back to work! 2 1
Exposed brick, checkBad local art, checkRock and roll tunes, checkSpeedy wifi, checkDelicious Mistos, checkCool crowd reading magazines and working away on macbooks, checkPLENTY of outlets, sweet!This place seems pretty swell. Exactly what you'd want for a cafe work sesh or a man date. 5 4
I just went to the Friday night gourmet buffet last week, and that's the 3rd time for me and my husband to be in a bellagio buffet. We had very great food the last 2 times we visited the buffet, so we went again this time we visited vegas. However, we felt disappointed this time as we think the food quality overall was not as good this time.The desserts are all great, but the meat and entree were just ok. And we are meat eaters......so that's why we were disappointed. They did have more variety and meat choices for the gourmet buffet (Fri and Sat only), they had kobe sirloin, grilled quail, prime rib, beef wellington, lamb rack, ostrich, duck breast, etc for the gourmet buffet. However, they are all too bloody raw except beef wellington and ostrich. In the past, usually there would be options to choose from medium rare to medium well, but this time everything is medium rare except beef wellington and ostrich. The chef who was serving lamb rack was nice enough to grill the lamb to the degree that the customer requested, however, the one who served kobe sirloin and prime rib was probably too busy to cater people's requests, so everyone got a piece of raw meat. I passed by many people's table and noticed that they gave up on the raw meat after the rim (usually is more cooked) has been eaten. It's just a big waste of food when they serve meat that is too raw. So in a sense, I like Wynn better for the meat, but the dessert at bellagio buffet is un-beatable. I think if someone is going for a really nice piece of meat, then Wynn is better. If you are all for the desserts, then bellagio is the place to go. But I do feel disappointed at the bellagio buffet when comparing with our past bellagio buffet experience. I've heard that some restaurants quality goes down due to recession....I don't know if bellagio buffet would be one of them....... well....it makes me to think twice whether I wanted to revisit bellagio buffet for future. 3 2
I would love a window seat during a thunder storm!! I wasn't sure if validated parking was available for lunch... The website only mentioned dinner and weekends.The prices were decent! A bottle of wine will run you up quite a bit. I made reservations online last week but wouldn't get a window table since it's made a month in advance. We started with the crab and tuna salad and the raw oysters. Both were great! Our entrees were probably less than ideal, my lobster clubhouse fell apart. The land and sea was a very small portion and was unfavoured. I would probably want to see the dinner menu myself. I would be unwilling to go during summer or winterlicious as you don't get to see the classic menu.For dessert, I shared the chocolate torte and it was delicious!! I would definitely get that again :)Hope this helps!-jT 3 4
My daughter and I were in Whitby Wednesday afternoon and decided to do sushi for lunch. So we decided on Sushi Today after checking the reviews and was recommended by my son who ate there quite often.We were seated right away and it was not busy maybe a dozen tables were occupied. We were quickly served and got our drinks right away. We placed our order and the food arrived pretty quickly compared to most sushi AYCE (all you can eat) I've been too.The sushi was alright some fell apart when picking them up. The orders kept coming and they were constantly rearranging our table as they placed our orders down. The servers were constantly removing our dishes as they were completed and to a point where our conversation was always being interrupted that we felt we were being rushed.I'm giving three stars for the food but zero for the service which was rushed and rude. The price was good but the service was bad and they rushed you to pay your bill.I'll probably never return because I've been to better sushi places around Durham region. 3 2
Prepare to wait. They blame everything on other companies, they don't keep in contact to keep the customer updated. Waited twice as long as a friend who went solar with another company! 2 1
Good luck trying to get in contact with someone here. It's next to impossible. The phone only goes to a voice message, and I'm pretty sure any emails you send go straight to the trash folder. 1 2
They offer 20% discount via text yet when you attempt to get it they've I it after tax has been added..... that is not right. It should be before tax and the lady at the window says her boss says it has to be after tax because he has to pay tax on the whole bill so it needs to be paid by the customer. How is that good customer service or a discount? Yes it covers the sales tax plus 11 percent... but don't lie and say 20 percent. Food is amazing though and that is why I come back. 3 2
Not sure what management is doing but it seems like this location is always understaffed and they are super slow with orders. 3 2
I just can't figure out how this place got so many stars by so many people. My sis and I picked up our friend at the airport on friday night and we were hungry. So we looked up a good restaurant on trusty Yelp to help us decide. We fell on this place which got great reviews and seemed like it would be fun and delicious. We found the place pretty quickly and stepped right in. We were quickly seated, but service was slow throughout. After about 10-15 min we finally got our drinks...OUR DRINKS. My companions got drinks and they tasted bitter. Not worth $10 in my opinion.The food itself was a disappointment. We ordered their Korean short ribs, ginger mint duck salad, beach mushrooms, and chicken lollipops.My issue is not the size of the dishes, we all knew what tapas are so we were already expecting small portions, but with those small portions and the amount of money we were paying we expected good food. Instead we got pretentious food with unbalanced flavor. If you're going to dress up my food, make sure it tastes as good as it looks.1. The Korean short ribs were okay except for the fact that it was drowned in a very sweet sauce. If the ribs were DRIZZLED with the sauce I think it would have been very successful.2. Ginger mint duck salad, I thought the duck was well cooked, but the sauce was overpowering and bitter.3. Chicken lollipops were way too salty. I had to drink water with every bite of the chicken.4. The only saving grace was the beach mushrooms. It was balanced and just plain delicious. It was a little awkward to eat, but I could easily get over that since the dish was such a treat. If all of my other dishes were as good as this one, I'd be raving about this place.     So after all of this, we didn't even want dessert, which is a shame because I love dessert and it was my birthday. Poor excuse of a meal for the price. I expected more. Not sure if it's the prettiness of the place that people fall in love with, but for me, the food was not up to par. 2 3
Have driven by this place several times and finally decided to give it a try.  Got a hamburger with cheese, clive style toppings with jalapenos and onion.  Quite honestly I've had better burgers, was expecting a juicy burger but the patty was thin and well blah.  Did order fries though and must admit it was the best part of the meal.  Also ordered a chocolate milkshake, it was good but not good enough to be $5 bucks. 2 3
Service is good, staff is friendly and knowledgeable. Beer and cocktails are good as well. Food...not so much.  My boyfriend and I shared the Jalapeno Pretzel appetizer which was pretty good, but our entrees.... disappointing.  I got the Baja chicken sandwich and he got the bison burger.   both were super dry. i could not even finish half of mine. He had to drench his in ketchup to be able to get the bison burger down. If i were to go back, it certainly would not be to eat. 2 3
This is the best restaurant  and bar on the strip that makes you feel like you are not in Las Vegas. Having 3 different floors great food and reasonable prices for drinks. Especially for being in Las Vegas. The staff is always really friendly and fast service. 4 5
Went for the first time this weekend.  Amazing looking women.  The cocktails were good too. Great looking female bartenders. A must do if you're single and attractive. 5 4
My wife just brought home a fish taco, pretty good.  Not amazing but one of the best I have had in a while.  I don't want to set expectations too high but worth a try! 4 3
Why would an obviously great diagnostic internist with a fantastic radio show and a terrific bedside manner and a caring attitude not be able to find the time to answer a written correspondence from a patient with a problem? 3 5
Pretty good. We thought to go check out a place up the block, because it had great yelp reviews. Apparently, so did 500 other people, but they thought quicker. The line was down the block and around the corner, so we walked around and saw an empty table here. Glad we did.I had a salad and juice, boy friend had the special - huevos rancheros with chili verde. I was happy, he liked his but said it wasn't worth what I paid for it. Saw a ton of people with french toast that looked unbelievably good, and the breakfast sandwich croissants looked great too. I won't drive across town for it, but any time I'm in the strip won't mind stopping in for a bite. 3 4
Came here with 3 friends on a Saturday night. Slight wait for a table.. maybe 15 minutes, the place was busy, but that was expected. They have a very very very extensive drink list, which includes beer, cider, meade and other tasty beverages! A definite go just for the drinks alone! We all ordered food, I had the burger on special - a twist on a Thanksgiving sandwich... that slightly reminded me of Melt's turkey bomb sandwich. Came with sweet potato fries - which were good! While the food might not blow you out of the water, having a good bar with a good selection of choices and decent food is nice. Will be back! 4 3
I always make sure to stop at the good egg whenever I'm in Phoenix it's my favorite place to eat breakfast or lunch they have the best biscuits and gravy in town. The place is always clean and the staff is very helpful and friendly keep it up good egg! 5 4
Decent pizza for the price.  Probably great for kids party to feed a lot of people without spending a lot of money. 4 3
The quintessential French bistro in Montreal. Still buzzing and still serving up classic french bistro fare.   As all the new restaurants in Montreal delight in serving ever more exotic dishes, L'Express stands out as a bastion of what a classic dinner in Montreal can be. 5 4
We tried this place last night.  I'll get right to the point...  The tots had good flavor but were cold in the center.  The wings were not good at all.  I appreciate the effort on the smoke, but you HAVE TO drop the wings in the fryer to crisp up the skin.  The sauce was not spicy either.  I would have preferred a traditional buffalo sauce like Franks.  The fish and chips were ok.  No lemon with them.  The fries were soggy/soft.  The beer was OK.  About as good as Four Peaks.  The service was good.  I am always amazed at these Scottsdale bars/breweries that have nothing to do but stare at a TV.  Pool tables, shuffle board, darts would be nice... We actually cashed out and went to Fate for a pizza cuz we didn't finish the food at SBC.  We may try it again.  Maybe not.... 3 2
I stayed at the Aria for three days and it was like Heaven.  The hotel is gigantic and beautiful to look at- lots of massive, dramatic art, giant chunks of granite and walls of glass, etc.  In one restaurant the dividers between the banquettes were made of cross sections of huge wasps' nests.  Difficult to describe, but so cool in person.  I was there for work, so I didn't have to pay for anything (except gambling, where it took me about 20 minutes to wipe out my checking account), which is extremely fortunate, since breakfast for three came to about $125 one morning.  The linens were unbelievable, and the bed was amazing.  I spent most of the last day by the pool, where the crowd was so friendly- everyone was so glad to be at such a fabulous place!  Everyone that worked there was ultra hot and genuinely warm and friendly.  I highly recommend the Aria for anybody with a lot of money to spend on unbridled luxury for a few days.  There's really no reason to leave the hotel once you get there- it has everything, and a LOT of it.  One of our waiters told us that the hotel has over 10,000 employees.   My one complaint is the horrible cell service, but then that's probably my own fault (AT&T). 4 5
A bunch of us were in town all at the same time and we decided to grab a quick bite and Shibuya was able to fit us in on short notice AND they had a pretty decent tasting menu to boot!  We were very pleased with everything, the kitchen substituted soy wrappers for seaweed without a peep OR a charge(!) and the wait staff was very helpful and friendly.  Definitely loved the kampachi sashimi but the beef on the winter tasting menu was not very tender and also cold when it came out but we still enjoyed everything else. 3 4
The experience of eating out of a plastic bag with plastic gloves is just too weird and unappetizing. Its also messy.  Ordered the clams.  Ok portion for the money but the Captain's Boils sauce was way too garlicky.  Would go again and try other offerings if they served food on proper dishware. 2 1
There are a few vegan options here, and they are labelled clearly on the chalkboard near the cashier (though they don't always write everything they're serving on the board). Service was friendly and quick, I ordered the sweet potato and rapini pie, which wasn't as tasty as the dish my friends ordered (the cauliflower and soy protein pie). They have a vegan cheesecake that is phenomenal.It's a cozy little space, and there were a few other folks there when we walked in on Saturday, but it didn't feel too crowded.I'll have to try their coffee next time. 3 4
